◆ 0ad : Unofficial. FOSS historical Real Time Strategy, RTS game of ancient warfare.
◆ 0ad-prerelease : Unofficial. FOSS historical Real Time Strategy, RTS game of ancient warfare (Pre-release).
◆ 12to11 : Unofficial, tool for running Wayland applications on an X server.
◆ 2ship : 2 Ship 2 Harkinian game.
◆ 3d-puzzles : 3D-Puzzles are Rubik, Dogic and Dogic12.
◆ 432hz-player : Because most music is recorded in 440hz, Audio Player.
◆ 5ire : 5ire is a cross-platform desktop AI assistant, MCP client. It compatible with major service providers, supports local knowledge base and tools via model context protocol servers.
◆ 7zip : 7-Zip is a file archiver with a high compression ratio.
◆ 86box : Emulator of x86-based machines based on PCem.
◆ 9launcher : An actively maintained and cross platform remake of Touhou Relauncher.
◆ aaaaxy : A nonlinear puzzle platformer, game.
◆ ab-download-manager : A Download Manager that speeds up your downloads.
◆ abiword : Unofficial. A light and free word processing software.
◆ accessimap-lecteur-der : Accessimap Lecteur DER.
◆ acestream : Створення бінарника AppImage з AceStream Media.
◆ acreom : Acreom desktop app releases.
◆ actiona : Actiona is an automation tool that allows you to execute many actions on your computer such as emulating mouse clicks, key presses, showing message boxes, editing text files, etc.
◆ actual : A super fast privacy-focused app for managing your finances.
◆ adb : Android Debug Bridge, a command line utility to handle Android devices. This script installs the full "platform-tools" suite.
◆ advanced-passgen : Advanced Password Generator.
◆ advanced-rest-client : Advanced REST Client and API console, by Mulesoft.
◆ aegisub : Cross-platform advanced subtitle editor, with new feature branches. Read the README on the feature branch. Cross-platform advanced subtitle editor Cross-platform advanced subtitle editor.
◆ aerofoil : Multiplatform port of Glider PRO.
◆ afetch : A CLI system information tool written in Rust.
◆ affine : Next-gen knowledge base that brings planning, sorting and creating.
◆ affine-beta : Next-gen knowledge base that brings planning, sorting and creating.
◆ affine-canary : Next-gen knowledge base that brings planning/sorting/creating.
◆ affinity : Affinity is a suite of professional graphic design, photo editing, and desktop publishing software. It's a common alternative to software from the Adobe Suite such as for Adobe Photoshop, Adobe Illustrator, Adobe InDesign.
◆ agregore : A minimal browser for the distributed web, Desktop version.
◆ ahk_x11 : AutoHotkey for Linux (X11-based systems).
◆ ai-bot-workspace : Electron app including testing workspaces.
◆ ai-gate : A Desktop app which brings access of popular AI apps to your desktop.
◆ aichat : AIO AI CLI tool integrating 20+ AI platforms, including OpenAI.
◆ aidm : AppImage Desktop Maker.
◆ aillio-ts : The desktop application for Aillio Bullet R1.
◆ aim : A command line download/upload tool with resume.
◆ aiming-pro : Aim trainer to practice, train and improve their FPS aim skills.
◆ air-controller-desktop : Android phone assistant,powered by Flutter.
◆ airspaces : An online map for your X-Plane flight sessions.
◆ aisap : Tool to make sandboxing AppImages easy through bwrap/bubblewrap.
◆ aisleriot : Unofficial. A card game featuring over 80 different solitaire-type card games.
◆ akasha : AKASHA community client.
◆ akuse : Simple and easy to use anime streaming desktop app without ads.
◆ alacritty : Unofficial. A modern terminal emulator that comes with sensible defaults, but allows for extensive configuration.
◆ albafetch : CLI, faster neofetch alternative, written in C. Still improving.
◆ alduin : An Atom and RSS feed aggregator.
◆ alephium-wallet : The official Alephium wallet for desktop.
◆ alexandria : eBook reader built with Tauri, Epub.js, and Typescript.
◆ alien-tec-ui : Alien-Tec Tron Matrix Like Shell Terminal User Interface.
◆ allusion : A desktop application for managing your visual library.
◆ alma : Elegant AI Provider Orchestration. A beautiful desktop application that unifies your AI experience. Seamlessly switch between OpenAI, Anthropic, Google Gemini, and custom providers.
◆ alpine-flatimage : A hybrid of Flatpak sandboxing with AppImage portability.
◆ alr2appimage : Tool for building an AppImage from an Alire crate.
◆ alt-sendme : Share files and directories anywhere - Local or Global
◆ altair : The best graphQL client you will ever need.
◆ altitude : The Altitude wallet by Linda Project Inc.
◆ altrady : Altrady Crypto Trading Terminal.
◆ altus : Client for WhatsApp Web with themes & multiple account support.
◆ alvr : Stream VR games from your PC to your headset via Wi-Fi.
◆ am-gui : AM-GUI is a graphical Front for AM.
◆ amazingmarvin : Incorporates principles from behavioral psychology.
◆ ambermoon.net : Ambermoon rewrite in C#.
◆ amdgpu_top : Tool to display AMDGPU usage.
◆ amfora : A fancy terminal browser for the Gemini protocol.
◆ amplitude-soundboard : A sleek, cross-platform soundboard, available.
◆ amusiz : Unofficial and unpretentious Amazon Music client.
◆ anavis : Tool to visualize musical form.
◆ anchor : An EOSIO Light Wallet with simple and advanced tools.
◆ android-messages-desktop : Messages for web, as a desktop app.
◆ android-studio : Unofficial. Android Studio as AppImages, stable.
◆ android-studio-latest : Unofficial. Android Studio as AppImages, release.
◆ android-tools : Unofficial AppImage for the Android Platform tools, adb, fastboot, etc.
◆ android-translation-layer : Unofficial, A translation layer that allows running Android apps on a Linux system.
◆ ani-cli : A cli tool to browse and play anime.
◆ animashooter-junior : User-friendly Stop-Motion Animation Software, FREE.
◆ animashooter-pioneer : User-friendly Stop-Motion Animation Software, PRO.
◆ animecoin : Animecoin is a free open source peer-to-peer electronic cash system that is completely decentralized, without the need for a central server or trusted parties. Users hold the crypto keys to their own money and transact directly with each other, with the help of a P2P network to check for double-spending.
◆ animeko : A one-stop platform for finding, following, and watching anime, featuring danmaku (bullet comments) and cloud-based collection synchronization (Bangumi), offline caching, BitTorrent, and cloud-based danmaku filtering.
◆ animos : Anime-streaming desktop application without any ads.
◆ aniship : Allows for easy viewing of anime on PCs and laptops.
◆ ankama-launcher : Ankama is an entertainment and digital creation group.
◆ anki : Unofficial, Anki's shared backend and web components, and the Qt frontend.
◆ anklang : MIDI and Audio Synthesizer and Composer.
◆ another-redis-desktop-manager : Faster and better redis desktop manager.
◆ ansel : An open-source photo-editing software for digital artists, designed to help you achieve your own interpretation of raw digital photographs.
◆ ant-downloader : BitTorrent Client developed by golang, angular, electron.
◆ antares : An useful SQL client based on Electron.js and Vue.js.
◆ antidot : Cleans up your $HOME from those pesky dotfiles.
◆ antimicrox : Use a gamepad to control a variety of programs.
◆ any-code : Any Code is a professional desktop application tailored for AI-driven code development workflows, supporting three major AI engines: Claude Code CLI, OpenAI Codex, and Google Gemini CLI.
◆ anydesk : Unofficial. Remote desktop application distributed.
◆ anything-llm : AI business intelligence tool. Any LLM, any document.
◆ anytype : The everything app for those who celebrate trust & autonomy.
◆ anzeigenchef : AdsChef manages your classified ads.
◆ aphelion-wallet : Aphelion desktop wallet application built with Electron.
◆ aphototoollibre : Photo editing app for GNU/Linux.
◆ apiflow : A modern API workspace that works both online and offlinecombining API documentation, testing, mock, and AI-powered automation in one lightweight tool.
◆ apifox : API manager, in Chinese. Includes documentation, API debugging, API mocking, and API automated testing.
◆ apk-editor-studio : Easy to use APK, Android reverse-engineering tool.
◆ apla : Project was bootstrapped with Create React App.
◆ app-outlet : A Universal linux app store for Flatpak/Snap/AppImage.
◆ appflowy : Bring projects, wikis, and teams together with AI. AppFlowy is the AI collaborative workspace where you achieve more without losing control of your data. The leading open source Notion alternative.
◆ apphub : App that simplifies installation/management of .appImage packages.
◆ appimage-builder : GNU/Linux packaging solution using the AppImage format.
◆ appimage-creator : GUI for easily generating AppImage packages on Linux.
◆ appimagecraft : Powerful build script generator with a focus on AppImages.
◆ appimagelauncher : CLI helper for running and integrating AppImages.
◆ appimagelint : Check AppImages for compatibility, best practices etc.
◆ appimagen : A script that generates a custom AppImage from a PPA.
◆ appimagepool : A simple, modern AppImageHub Client, powered by flutter.
◆ appimagetool : Tool to generate an AppImage from an existing AppDir.
◆ appimageupdate : Tool to update an AppImage using embedded information.
◆ appimageupdater : AppImage Updater for Humans built with QML/C++ with Qt5.
◆ appimageupdatetool : Tool to update an AppImage using embedded information.
◆ appimg : Appimg is a lightweight command-line tool that helps you manage AppImage files on Linux.
◆ appinstall : AppImage Installer, a tool integrate AppImages to a linux desktop environment.
◆ appium-inspector : A GUI inspector for mobile apps and more, powered by a (separately installed) Appium server.
◆ appmanager : MacOS style AppImage installer and management application.
◆ aptakube : A modern and lightweight Kubernetes desktop client.
◆ aptly : Debian repository management CLI tool.
◆ apx-gcs : APX Ground Control.
◆ aranym : Virtual Machine for Atari 32-bit applications.
◆ arcade-manager : Manage your rom collection, Games/Retropie & Recalbox.
◆ arch-deployer : A script to bulk download an Arch Linux package with all its dependencies to be converted in AppImage.
◆ arch-flatimage : A hybrid of Flatpak sandboxing with AppImage portability.
◆ archimage-cli : Build AppImage packages using JuNest, Arch Linux.
◆ archimede : Unobtrusive directory information fetcher.
◆ archipel : Decentralized archiving and media library system.
◆ archipelago : Archipelago Multi-Game Randomizer and Server.
◆ archisteamfarm : C# application with primary purpose of farming Steam cards from multiple accounts simultaneously.
◆ archiveweb.page : A High-Fidelity Web Archiving Extension for Chrome and Chromium based browsers.
◆ arduino-ide : Open-source electronics platform.
◆ arena-tracker : Deck Tracker for Hearthstone game with arena in focus.
◆ ares : AppImage for the ares emulator.
◆ aretext : Minimalist text editor with vim-compatible key bindings.
◆ ark : Unofficial. Archiving tool for .zip/.tar/.rar and more. This script installs the full "kdeutils" suite.
◆ ark.desktop.wallet : Ark Ecosystem Desktop Wallet.
◆ arkaway : Another Arkanoid clone and make with Pyxel.
◆ arma3-unix-launcher : ArmA 3 Unix Launcher, game.
◆ armagetronad : Multiplayer game in 3d that emulates the movie "Tron".
◆ armcord : Custom client designed to enhance your Discord experience.
◆ artifact : Win 40 levels of mayhem without getting destroyed, game.
◆ artisan : Visualizes the coffee roasting process.
◆ artix : One app. All your favorite Artix games.
◆ asarui : UI for Asar.
◆ asgardex : Thorchain wallet desktop app.
◆ aspect : Photo organization application with support for peer-to-peer based synchronization across devices.
◆ astroffers : Take offers to watch at given nights by the NGC2000 catalog.
◆ astrofox : Audio reactive motion graphics program.
◆ astroshutter : Ui to control your camera for astrophotography.
◆ asunder : Unofficial. Audio CD ripper and encoder, WAV, MP3, OGG, FLAC, Opus, AAC....
◆ atomicwallet : Atomic vue-electron.
◆ atuin : Magical shell history.
◆ audacious : Unofficial. An open source audio and music player, descendant of XMMS.
◆ audacity : Multiplatform Audio Editor.
◆ audapolis : An editor for spoken-word audio with automatic transcription.
◆ audio-sharing : Unofficial. Share audio from the desktop on local network using RTSP protocol.
◆ audiomoth-configuration-app : An Electron-based application capable of configuring the functionality of the AudioMoth recording device and setting the onboard clock.
◆ audiomoth-flash-app : An Electron-based application designed to flash the AudioMoth recording device with new firmware.
◆ audiomoth-gps-sync-app : An Electron-based application to generate WAV files synchronised with GPS time from the files generated by the AudioMoth-GPS-Sync firmware.
◆ audiomoth-live-app : An Electron-based application for recording and analysing live audio from high sample rate microphones, including the AudioMoth USB Microphone.
◆ audiomoth-time-app : An Electron-based application capable of setting the on-board clock of the AudioMoth recording device.
◆ audiomoth-usb-microphone-app : An Electron-based application capable of configuring the functionality of the AudioMoth-USB-Microphone firmware.
◆ audiorelay : Stream audio between your devices. Turn your phone into a microphone or speakers for PC.
◆ augur : Augur Desktop Application.
◆ aurora : A utility to control RGB keyboard back-light and charging threshold for Asus TUF-gaming laptops.
◆ auryo : An audio/music desktop client for SoundCloud.
◆ authenticator : Unofficial. An application which generates 2FA code in realtime.
◆ authme : Simple cross-platform two-factor authenticator app for desktop.
◆ authy : Unofficial, Protect all your accounts with 2FA.
◆ auto-claude : Autonomous multi-session AI coding framework that plans, builds, and validates software for you.
◆ autoedit2 : autoEdit2 Desktop Client for Linux.
◆ avantgarde : Avalonia XAML Preview.
◆ avidemux : Multiplatform Video Editor.
◆ avidemux-qt : Unofficial, my custom Avidemux Video Editor built to use system themes.
◆ avogadro2 : Molecular editor for computational chemistry, bioinformatics.
◆ awakened-poe-trade : Path of Exile trading app for price checking.
◆ axe-electrum : Axe Electrum Wallet.
◆ axolotl : A Signal compatible cross plattform client written in Go and Vuejs.
◆ aya : A desktop application for easily controlling android devices, which can be considered as a GUI wrapper for ADB.
◆ ayandict : Simple yet advanced multi-lingual cross-platform offline dictionary for desktop, using Qt and Go.
◆ azahar-enhanced : Unofficial AppImage of Azahar, with optimized builds for modern cpus.
◆ badlion : Most Complete All-In-One Mod Library for Minecraft with 100+ Mods.
◆ baijimangaviewer : Manga viewer that uses Material Design.
◆ balatro-multiplayer : A Multiplayer Mod for Balatro.
◆ bambustudio : PC Software for BambuLab's 3D printers.
◆ bananas : Bananas, Cross-Platform screen sharing made simple.
◆ banban : A productivity app inspired by GitHub Projects Kanban.
◆ bandwhich : Terminal bandwidth utilization tool.
◆ baobab-gtk3 : Unofficial. Disk Usage Analyser, version 3.38, for all GNOME4+ haters.
◆ barnacal : A simple menu bar app for viewing a calendar
◆ basilisk2 : Classic Macintosh emulator BasiliskII.
◆ bastyon : Decentralized social network based on the blockchain.
◆ bat : A "cat" clone with wings.
◆ bat-extras : Bash scripts that integrate bat with various command line tools.
◆ batch-explorer : A client tool to create/debug/monitor Azure Batch Apps.
◆ battop : CLI, interactive batteries viewer.
◆ bauh : GUI for managing AppImage, Arch/AUR, DEBs, Flatpak, Snap and webapps.
◆ bazecor : Graphical configurator for Dygma Raise.
◆ bbg : A static blog generator based on Electron Technology.
◆ bchat-desktop : About A decentralized cionfidential messaging app that runs on Beldex network.
◆ bdash : A simple business intelligence application.
◆ beam-wallet : Beam Desktop Wallet.
◆ bearly : The world's best AI at your fingertips.
◆ beatconnect-client : Beatconnect power for osu irc.
◆ beatmapexporter : osu!lazer beatmap exporter utility. Allowing mass export of beatmaps from the new osu!lazer file storage back into .osz files.
◆ beatsaber-mod-manager : Yet another mod installer for Beat Saber, heavily inspired by ModAssistant.
◆ beaver-notes : Build your knowledge one log at a time.
◆ beekeeper-studio : SQL query editor and database UI.
◆ beeper : All your chats in one app.
◆ beeref : BeeRef Reference Image Viewer.
◆ bemoji : Emoji picker for bemenu/wofi/rofi/dmenu, remembers your favorites.
◆ bench-cli : CLI tool to benchmark commands, written in `Fortran`.
◆ berserkerquake2 : Berserker@Quake2 game engine, ported to SDL2 library.
◆ better-osu-skills : Gets results from the osu! Using your own IRC credentials.
◆ betterbird : Unofficial, Betterbird is a fine-tuned version of Mozilla Thunderbird, a free and open-source email client.
◆ bettercrewlink : Free, open, Among Us proximity voice chat.
◆ bettersis : Modern shell for SIS.
◆ betterx : Enhance your X (formerly Twitter) experience with BetterX Desktop!
◆ beurerscalemanager : AppImage packaging project for BeurerScaleManager.
◆ beyond-all-reason : 3D Real-Time Strategy Total Annihilation Inspired, game.
◆ bezique : Plays bezique game against the AI.
◆ bforartists : 3D modeling, animation, rendering and post-production.
◆ biblemultithelife : Bible multi languages, free, offline, no advertising, in English, French, Italian, Spanish, Portuguese.
◆ biblia-sacra : A multi language bible app, with emphasis on Latin.
◆ bidirectional : Write Arabic text on apps that don't support the bidirectional text.
◆ bili-liveluckdraw : A Bilibili live stream lottery tool that draws winners based on keywords retrieved from the chat comments. It is built using Electron + React + Vite.
◆ bilibili : Bilibili official desktop client.
◆ bilibilivideodownload : Bilibili video downloader.
◆ biliup-app : Bilibili uploader.
◆ billard-gl : Unofficial. 3D billiards game, play a game of 8-ball or 9-ball.
◆ billyfrontier : Pangea Software’s Billy Frontier for modern systems.
◆ bin : Effortless binary manager.
◆ binclock : Binary clock in terminal.
◆ binfinder : Find binary files not installed through package manager.
◆ bingada : Bingo application in GTKAda.
◆ binglite : A lightweight new Bing (AI chat) desktop application based on Tauri.
◆ bioanimation : CCNY Electrochemical Gradient Simulator.
◆ biplanes-revival : An old cellphone arcade recreated for PC.
◆ birds-kitchen : Recipe manager.
◆ bitbox-wallet : Cryptocurrency hardware wallet desktop app.
◆ bitshares : Advanced wallet interface for the BitShares financial blockchain.
◆ bitwarden : Password manager for individuals, teams and business.
◆ biying : Biying Wallpaper for Linux.
◆ bk : Terminal Epub reader.
◆ black-chocobo : FF7 Save Game Editor.
◆ blacknut : Cloud gaming client.
◆ blank : Blank is a minimalist, opinionated markdown editor made for writing.
◆ blastem : Clone of Mercurial Repo.
◆ blender : Very fast and versatile 3D modeller/renderer, Stable.
◆ blender-alpha : Very fast and versatile 3D modeller/renderer, Alpha.
◆ blender-beta : Very fast and versatile 3D modeller/renderer, Beta.
◆ blender-rc : Very fast and versatile 3D modeller/renderer, Release Candidate.
◆ blensor : 3D modeling, animation, rendering and post-production.
◆ blimp : Customizable terminal UI for monitoring weather information, application status, network latency, and more.
◆ blink : GUI of live indexed grep search for source code.
◆ blizzard-4 : Emulator & toolchain for the Blizzard 4 16-bit computer.
◆ blob-dl : Blob-dl is a yt-dlp CLI interface used to download video and audio files from YouTube.
◆ blobdrop : Drag and drop files directly out of the terminal.
◆ block-dx : Exchange dApp built on top of the Blocknet Protocol.
◆ blockbench : Editor for boxy models and pixel art textures like Minecraft.
◆ blockstream-green : Bitcoin wallet compatible with Blockstream Jade.
◆ bloks : An electron-vue project.
◆ bloomee : Music app designed to bring you ad-free tunes from various sources.
◆ bloomrpc : GRPC GUI client.
◆ blowfish : Display your total Ocean Token balances.
◆ blueglow : A simple system tray application to watch github notifications.
◆ bluetuith : A TUI bluetooth manager for Linux.
◆ boardgamestar : A platform for playing digital boardgames.
◆ bodacious : A bodacious music player.
◆ bodhi : Bodhi Prediction Market app.
◆ boilr : Synchronize games from other platforms into your Steam library.
◆ bomber : Unofficial. Arcade spaceship game. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ bongocat : A chinese cute interactive desktop pet application that makes your desktop full of fun!
◆ book-manager : Simple desktop app to manage personal library.
◆ bookmarks-manager : Edit bookmarks, check url.
◆ boost-note : Document driven project management tool to speedup remote DevOps.
◆ boostchanger : Control CPU turbo boost and the settings of the cpu speed.
◆ botclient : A discord botclient built with Electron and React.
◆ botframework-emulator : Test and debug chat bots built with Bot Framework SDK.
◆ botim : Free, Secure, Reliable Messages and Calls.
◆ bottlebats : Client for the 2018 edition of the BottleBats AI competition.
◆ bottles : Unofficial. Manage wine prefixes and run Windows software & games in a new way.
◆ bottom : Yet another cross-platform graphical process/system monitor.
◆ bovo : Unofficial. Five in a row game from. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ boxxy : Put bad Linux applications in a box with only their files.
◆ brainverse : Electronic Lab Notebook for Reproducible Neuro Imaging Research.
◆ brainwaves : EEG Desktop Application.
◆ brave : Unofficial, a privacy oriented Web Browser based on Chromium, this is the "stable" release.
◆ brave-beta : Unofficial, a privacy oriented Web Browser based on Chromium, this is the "beta" release.
◆ brave-nightly : Unofficial, a privacy oriented Web Browser based on Chromium, this is the "nightly" release.
◆ bread : Install, update and remove AppImage from GitHub using your CLI.
◆ breaktimer : Save yourself from RSI and eye-strain.
◆ brickstore : An offline BrickLink inventory management tool.
◆ bridge : The perfect Bridge between Megascans and your favorite tools.
◆ brisk : Ultra-fast, moden download manager for desktop.
◆ brisqi : Offline-first Personal Kanban app.
◆ browservice : Browse the modern web on historical browsers.
◆ brs-emu-app : BrightScript Emulator, runs on browsers and Electron apps.
◆ bruno : An Opensource API Collection Collaboration Suite.
◆ brutespray : Bruteforcing from various scanner output. Automatically attempts default creds on found services.
◆ bscanfftwebcam : FDOCT tool.
◆ bsky : A desktop app of bsky.app.
◆ btop : A command line utility to monitor system resources, like Htop.
◆ bts-ce-lite : Telecommunication network management application.
◆ buche : A logger of sorts.
◆ buckets : Budgeting fast, simple and private.
◆ bugdom : Pangea Software's Bugdom game.
◆ bugdom2 : Pangea Software’s Bugdom 2 for modern systems.
◆ bulkreviewer : Identify, review, and remove private information.
◆ bulkurlopener : Desktop version of the Bulk URL Opener extension.
◆ bunnyfetch : A small and fast tool for getting info about your system.
◆ bunqdesktop : A desktop implementation for the bunq API.
◆ burning-series : Watch any series from Burning Series, Unofficial client.
◆ buttercup : Free and Open Source password vault.
◆ bypass-cors : Unlock browser’s full potential!
◆ bytespeichertrayicon : Bytespeicher Status App.
◆ c-evo : C-evo is an empire building game based on Civilization II, but with a different focus. It aims to be a pure game with all players playing to win.
◆ cabal-desktop : Cabal p2p offline-first desktop application.
◆ cables-gl : A tool for creating beautiful interactive content. With an easy to navigate interface and real time visuals.
◆ cacher : Cacher is a code snippet library for professional developers.
◆ cacoco : A (slightly, but aspirationally) finished SBARDEF editor. Mostly.
◆ cadassistant : Offline 3D CAD viewer and converter, free for personal and commercial use.
◆ cadmus : Pulse Audio real-time noise suppression plugin.
◆ caesium : Image compression software that helps you store, send and share digital pictures, supporting JPG, PNG, WebP and TIFF formats.
◆ calibre : Unofficial. The one stop solution to all your e-book needs.
◆ calibre-beta : Unofficial. The one stop solution to all your e-book needs. Beta version.
◆ calibre-preview : Unofficial. The one stop solution to all your e-book needs. Preview version.
◆ calligra : Calligra Suite is an office and graphic art suite by KDE. It contains applications for word processing, spreadsheets, presentation, vector graphics, and editing databases.
◆ calm-circles : Calm down and draw something, in Lisp.
◆ calm-fan : Calm down and draw something, in Lisp.
◆ calm-meditator : Calm down and draw something, in Lisp.
◆ calm-mondrian : Calm down and draw something, in Lisp.
◆ camelot : Camelot is cross-platform file manager written in C.
◆ candycrisis : Candy Crisis source port for modern operating systems.
◆ cannonball : Cannonball: An Enhanced OutRun Engine.
◆ caprine : Unofficial, elegant privacy focused Facebook Messenger app.
◆ carbonyl : Chromium running inside your terminal.
◆ cardo : Podcast client.
◆ cargo : Converts your crate into an AppImage.
◆ carpenters : Digital preservation ingest utility.
◆ carta : Cube Analysis and Rendering Tool for Astronomy.
◆ cartridges : Unofficial. Game launcher, which helps you visualize your game collection and easily launch games.
◆ cashonize : Cashonize: A cross-platform Bitcoin Cash Wallet.
◆ cask : A universal, distributed binary file manager.
◆ casm : Corinthian Abstract State Machine, CASM.
◆ casterr : Screen recorder, easing recording and clipping in-game.
◆ castersoundboard : Soundboard for hot-keying and playing back sounds.
◆ catalyst : Catalyst web browser.
◆ catapult : A cross-platform launcher for Cataclysm DDA and BN.
◆ catcher : Peer-testing of software projects.
◆ cavoke : Cavoke: Platform to create/host multiplayer turn-based board games.
◆ cbetar2 : ePub viewer supporting fetching and displaying HTML as ePub.
◆ cbird : Command-line program for Content-Based Image Retrieval of images and videos. Includes tools for general search and de-duplication.
◆ cccp : Cortex Command, a community-driven effort to continue the development of Cortex Command.
◆ cdogs-sdl : Classic overhead run-and-gun game.
◆ celeste64 : A game made by the Celeste developers.
◆ celestia : Real time 3D space simulator.
◆ celestia-dev : Real time 3D space simulator, developer edition.
◆ celestia-enanched : Unofficial. Real-time 3D space simulator with extra detailed maps.
◆ celoterminal-bin : Celo Terminal, AppImage version.
◆ cemu : A Nintendo Wii U emulator that is able to run most Wii U games.
◆ cemu-enhanced : Unofficial AppImage of Cemu, Nintendo Wii U emulator that is able to run most Wii U games, which is able to work on any linux distro.
◆ cerebral-debugger : Cerebral Debugger.
◆ cerebro : Open-source productivity booster with a brain.
◆ chain-desktop-wallet : Crypto.com DeFi Desktop Wallet.
◆ chainx-signer : Manage ChainX account, sign and sign transactions.
◆ chat-gpt : Unofficial. ChatGPT Desktop Application.
◆ chatall : Concurrently chat with ChatGPT, Bing Chat, bard, Alpaca and more.
◆ chatbox : Chatbox is a desktop app for GPT-4 / GPT-3.5, OpenAI API.
◆ chatgpt-next-web : A cross-platform ChatGPT/Gemini UI.
◆ chatpad-ai : Not just another ChatGPT user-interface.
◆ chatterino2 : Second installment of the Twitch chat client.
◆ chatterino2-nightly : Second installment of the Twitch chat client.
◆ cheat : Create and view interactive cheatsheets on the command-line.
◆ cheatbreaker : The free FPS boosting modpack for Minecraft 1.7 & 1.8.
◆ checkra1n : Jailbreak for iPhone 5s through iPhone X, iOS 12.0 and up
◆ chemcanvas : A very intuitive 2D chemical drawing tool.
◆ cherry-studio : Agentic AI desktop with autonomous coding, intelligent automation, and unified access to frontier LLMs.
◆ cherrytree : A hierarchical note taking application.
◆ chess-tui : Play chess from your terminal.
◆ chessmd : Open source chess training software. Play against bots, analyze with engines, explore chess openings, and more.
◆ chimeradesk : Simple, fast and flexible DIY Remote Desktop software.
◆ chimeradesk-kvm : Simple, fast and flexible DIY Remote Desktop software.
◆ chromium : Unofficial. FOSS Web Browser, base of Google Chrome, Edge and Brave, stable.
◆ chromium-beta : Unofficial. FOSS Web Browser, base of Google Chrome, beta edition.
◆ chromium-bsu : Unofficial. Fast paced arcade style scrolling space shooter, game.
◆ chromium-edge : Unofficial. FOSS Web Browser, base of Google Chrome, edge edition.
◆ chromium-rc : Unofficial. FOSS Web Browser, base of Google Chrome, release candidate.
◆ chrysalis-bin : Graphical configurator for Kaleidoscope-powered keyboards.
◆ ciaa-suite : Makefile based IDE for embedded systems.
◆ cicada : An old-school bash-like Unix shell written in Rust.
◆ cinny : Yet another matrix client for desktop.
◆ circle-z : A chat client for online math courses.
◆ circuitblocks : Helps newbies get into embedded programming.
◆ citron : Citron (fork of yuzu), with optimized builds for modern cpus.
◆ citron-nightly : Citron (fork of yuzu), with optimized builds for modern cpus (nightly builds).
◆ city-hub : Hub into everything on City Chain/Smart City Platform.
◆ ciyue : A simple mdict dictionary.
◆ clagrange : Lagrange is a cross-platform client for browsing Geminispace (CLI Version).
◆ clamtk : An easy to use, light-weight, on-demand virus scanner for Linux systems
◆ clapper : Unofficial. A modern media player designed for simplicity and ease of use.
◆ clash-nyanpasu : A Clash GUI based on tauri.
◆ clash-verge : A multiplatform Clash GUI based on tauri.
◆ classicimageviewer : A simple image viewer with some editing features.
◆ classicube : Unofficial, Custom Minecraft Classic / ClassiCube client written in C from scratch
◆ classipod : A local music player app designed to capture the nostalgic essence of the iconic iPod Classic.
◆ claude-desktop : Claude Desktop for Debian-based Linux distributions.
◆ cleepdesktop : Desktop application to manage your Cleep devices.
◆ clementine : Unofficial AppImage of the Clementine music player.
◆ clementineremote : Remote for Clementine Music Player.
◆ clifm : The shell-like, command line terminal file manager simple, fast, extensible, and lightweight as hell.
◆ cliniface : 3D Facial Image Visualisation and Analysis.
◆ clipgrab : Download and Convert Online Videos.
◆ clippy : Clipboard History.
◆ clipr : The clipboard that syncs.
◆ clipse : Configurable TUI clipboard manager for Unix.
◆ cloud-browser : Access to files located in various cloud services.
◆ clownmaped : Sonic the Hedgehog sprite editor, clone of Xenowhirl's SonMapEd.
◆ clownmdemu : Reference standalone frontend for clownmdemu.
◆ cmux : Cmux/ManaflowX is an X feed for coding agents that lets you run + compare Claude Code, Codex CLI, Amp, Gemini CLI, Cursor CLI, Opencode, and other coding agent CLIs in parallel across multiple tasks.
◆ cncjs : CNC Milling Controller.
◆ cncra2yr : C&C Red Alert 2, a real-time strategy game by Westwood Pacific.
◆ coal-launcher : A client to view and play games from the AB Coal website.
◆ code : Visual Studio, VSCode, Original Editor to build/debug web/cloud apps.
◆ code-expert-sync : Allows syncing of Code Expert projects to a local file system.
◆ code-notes : A simple code snippet amp built with Electron.
◆ code-radio : A command line music radio client for coderadio.freecodecamp.org, written in Rust.
◆ codebook-lsp : Codebook, code-aware spell checker with language server implementation.
◆ coinstac : Collaborative Informatics and Neuroimaging Suite Toolkit.
◆ collision : Unofficial. Verify the checksum/hash validity of files.
◆ colobot : Colonize with bots, game.
◆ colon : A flexible text editor.
◆ colorgenerator : Generates color palettes similar to ColorBrewer.
◆ colorpicker : Electron app that can show colors with hex/rgb.
◆ colorstatic-bash : CLI to generate a random colorful "Static"/"Matrix".
◆ comic-book-reader : Reader and converter for cbz, cbr, epub and pdf files.
◆ comic-reader : Electron based comic reader.
◆ comics-downloader : Tool to download comics and manga in pdf/epub/cbr/cbz from a website.
◆ comictagger : A multi-platform app for writing metadata to digital comics.
◆ compass : Air Traffic Surveillance DataBase.
◆ compresso : Convert any video into a tiny size.
◆ concordium-desktop-wallet : The official Concordium Dektop Wallet.
◆ conduction : Tasks? Done. That was quick.
◆ conky : Light-weight system monitor for X.
◆ consoleworkbench : Console workbench.
◆ contour : Modern C++ Terminal Emulator.
◆ conty : Easy to use unprivileged and portable Arch Linux container.
◆ conty-lite : Easy to use unprivileged and portable Arch Linux container.
◆ conty-wine : Easy to use unprivileged and portable Arch Linux container.
◆ converse-desktop : Electron-based Desktop client for Converse.js.
◆ converseen : A batch image converter and resizer.
◆ converter432hz : Converts and re-encodes music to 432hz.
◆ converternow : The Unit Converter app. Easy, immediate and multi-platform.
◆ cool-retro-term : Use the command line the old way.
◆ coolercontrol : A program to monitor and control your cooling devices.
◆ coolercontrold : Daemon for coolercontrol, to monitor your cooling devices.
◆ copytranslator : Foreign language reading and translation assistant.
◆ cordlauncher : Cord launcher based on Electron and Wep Application.
◆ coreaction : A side bar for showing widgets for CuboCore Application Suite.
◆ corearchiver : Archive manager for CuboCore Application Suite.
◆ corefm : A lightweight file-manager for C Suite.
◆ coregarage : A setting manager for CuboCore Application Suite.
◆ corehunt : A file search utility for CuboCore Application Suite.
◆ coreimage : An image viewer for CuboCore Application Suite.
◆ coreinfo : A file information viewer for CuboCore Application Suite.
◆ corekeyboard : A x11 based virtual keyboard for C Suite.
◆ corepad : A document editor for CuboCore Application Suite.
◆ corepaint : A paint app for CuboCore Application Suite.
◆ corepins : A bookmarking app for CuboCore Application Suite.
◆ corerenamer : A batch file renamer for CuboCore Application Suite.
◆ coreshot : A screen capture utility for CuboCore Application Suite.
◆ corestats : A system resource viewer from the CoreApps family.
◆ corestuff : An activity viewer for CuboCore Application Suite.
◆ coreterminal : A terminal emulator for C Suite.
◆ coretime : A time related task manager for CuboCore Application Suite.
◆ coreuniverse : Shows releated information of apps from CuboCore App Suite.
◆ corsixth : Open source clone of Theme Hospital.
◆ cosmic-comics : Web Server based Comics / Manga Collectionner & viewer.
◆ cosmonium : 3D astronomy and space exploration program.
◆ cowitness : A powerful web app testing tool that enhances the accuracy and efficiency of your testing efforts.
◆ cozydrive : File Synchronisation for Cozy, cloud.
◆ cpeditor : Code editor specially designed for competitive programming.
◆ cpod : A simple, beautiful podcast app.
◆ cpu-x : Software that gathers information on CPU, motherboard and more.
◆ cpufetch : Simple yet fancy CPU architecture fetching tool.
◆ crabfetch : Extremely fast, featureful and customizable command-line fetcher.
◆ craftos-pc : Advanced ComputerCraft emulator written in C++.
◆ crankshaft : A sensible krunker client written in typescript.
◆ crawl-ncurses : Dungeon Crawl Stone Soup: open-source, single-player, role-playing roguelike game of exploration and treasure-hunting - ncurses version (terminal)
◆ crawl-tiles : Dungeon Crawl Stone Soup: open-source, single-player, role-playing roguelike game of exploration and treasure-hunting - graphical version (SDL)
◆ creality-print : Creality Print is a slicer dedicated to FDM printers.
◆ crg-data-tool : A tool for working with Games Data files from CRG.
◆ cric : Custom Runtime Image Creator.
◆ criteria-geo : A one-dimensional agro-hydrological model, GIS interface.
◆ criteria1d : A one-dimensional agro-hydrological model.
◆ criteria1d-pro : A one-dimensional agro-hydrological model, PRO.
◆ cro-chain-desktop-bin : Crypto.com DeFi Desktop Wallet, AppImage version.
◆ croc : Easily and securely send things from one computer to another.
◆ crock : Crock is rock clock.
◆ cromagrally : The wildest racing game since man invented the wheel!
◆ cromberg : Personal accounting system.
◆ cromite : Unofficial AppImage of the Cromite web browser.
◆ crosscode-map-editor : Map Editor for CrossCode.
◆ crossmacro : A modern mouse and keyboard macro recording and playback application.
◆ crossmobile : Create native iOS/Android/Windows apps in Java.
◆ crow-translate : Translate and speak text using Google, Yandex, Bing and more.
◆ cryplicity : Electron application boilerplate.
◆ crypter : An innovative, convenient and secure crypto app.
◆ cryptocam-companion : GUI to decrypt videos taken by Cryptocam.
◆ cryptomator : Cloud Storage Encryption Utility.
◆ cryptr : A GUI for Vault.
◆ cs-demo-manager : Companion application for your Counter-Strike demos.
◆ cscrypto : A crypto app.
◆ ctool : Common Tools for Program Development.
◆ ctop : Top-like interface for container metrics.
◆ cudatext : A cross-platform text editor, written in Object Pascal.
◆ cura : An open source slicing application for 3D printers.
◆ cura-beta : An open source slicing application for 3D printers, beta.
◆ curlie : The power of curl, the ease of use of httpie.
◆ cursor : Built to make you extraordinarily productive, Cursor is the best way to code with AI.
◆ cursor-cli : Unofficial, AI-assisted development CLI tool.
◆ customrpc : An electron-vue project.
◆ cutechess : Cute Chess is a GUI, a CLI and a library for playing chess.
◆ cutepeaks : A simple sanger trace file viewer.
◆ cutevariant : A genetics variant filtering tools
◆ cutter : Free and Open Source Reverse Engineering Platform.
◆ cvrx : A standalone companion app for ChilloutVR that expands the user experience! A standalone companion app for ChilloutVR that expands the user experience! A standalone companion app for ChilloutVR that expands the user experience!.
◆ czkawka : App to find duplicates, empty folders, similar images etc.
◆ daisy : A beautiful, easy-to-use, ad-free manga and light novel client that supports both. (Anime Home).
◆ dana : A desktop client for the Dana learning box.
◆ darkplaces : The DarkPlaces Quake engine, created by LadyHavoc.
◆ darktable : Photography workflow app and raw developer.
◆ darktable-nightly : Photography workflow app and raw developer, nightly.
◆ dashy-app : Dashboard creation application.
◆ database-dossier : A User Interface for your databases.
◆ dataset-annotator : An annotation tool for a dataset.
◆ datcord : Discord client.
◆ dawnlightsearch : A Linux version of Everything Search Engine.
◆ dayon : Dayon! - A cross-platform remote desktop assistance solution for your family and friends.
◆ dbeaver-ce : Unofficial, DBeaver Community is a free cross-platform database tool for developers, database administrators, analysts, and everyone working with data.
◆ dbee : Fast & Minimalistic Database Browser.
◆ dbet-wallet : DBET Wallet.
◆ dbgate : Opensource database administration tool
◆ dbgate-premium : Opensource database administration tool (premium version)
◆ dbin : Poor man's package manager. About 3000 statically linked binaries in the repos!
◆ deadbeef : Unofficial AppImage of the DeaDBeeF music player (Stable version).
◆ deadbeef-nightly : Unofficial AppImage of the DeaDBeeF music player (Nightly version).
◆ deadgame-2048 : GUI tool available for ALL platforms.
◆ dealers-choice : Multiplayer Stud and Draw Poker game.
◆ deb2appimage : Build AppImages from deb packages on any distro.
◆ deckboard : Control your PC with your phone in easy way possible.
◆ dedop-studio : DeDop Studio
◆ deepl-linux-electron : DeepL Integration. Select & translate text in any app.
◆ deeplx : DeepL Free API, No TOKEN required.
◆ deepnotes : End-to-end encrypted visual note-taking tool.
◆ deeptags : Markdown notes manager with support for nested tags.
◆ deerportal : Full of the diamonds board game.
◆ deezer : A linux port of Deezer, allows downloading your songs, music.
◆ defichain-app : DefiChain Wallet AppImage.
◆ defold : Unofficial, Defold is a completely free to use game engine for development of games.
◆ delta : A syntax-highlighting pager for git, diff, grep, and blame output.
◆ deltachat-desktop : Desktop Application for delta.chat.
◆ demonizer : Demonic corruption fantasy shmup.
◆ densify : A GTK+ GUI Application written in Python that simplifies compressing PDF files with Ghostscript.
◆ deployer : Deploy your applications through Jenkins.
◆ deskreen : Turns any device with a web browser into a secondary screen.
◆ deskthing : The Discord Thing, Trello Thing, The Weather Thing, The Macro Thing, just not The Car Thing anymore.
◆ desmume : Unofficial AppImage of the DeSmuME emulator.
◆ destiny : Cross-platform Magic Wormhole graphical client.
◆ dethrace : Reverse engineering the 1997 game "Carmageddon".
◆ devclean : A CLI and Desktop GUI app to clean dev dependencies (node_modules, cache) and more.
◆ devdocs-desktop : Desktop client for devdocs.io.
◆ devhub : TweetDeck for GitHub
◆ devilutionx : Diablo build for modern operating systems.
◆ devpod : Codespaces but open-source, client-only and unopinionated. Works with any IDE and lets you use any cloud, kubernetes or just localhost docker.
◆ devsidecar : Dev sidecar/github/git/stackoverflow acceleration, in chinese.
◆ devtools-x : Collection of offline first developer utilities available as desktop application.
◆ devtoys : A Swiss Army knife for developers.
◆ dexter-dev-env : Dexter Development Environment.
◆ dezor : The web browser including VPN and Adblocker.
◆ dfdemo : A thin Tcl/Tk GUI around the df POSIX command.
◆ dfilemanager : File manager written in Qt and C++.
◆ dhewm3 : Doom 3 GPL source port.
◆ dicomautomaton : Tools for working with medical physics data.
◆ didder : An extensive, fast, and accurate command-line image dithering tool.
◆ die-engine : Detect It Easy, a program for determining types of files.
◆ diffuse : Music player, connects to your cloud/distributed storage.
◆ digikam : Professional and advanced digital photo management application.
◆ dingtalk : DingTalk desktop version based on electron.
◆ dinosaurplanetrecompiled : A static recompilation/native port of the game Dinosaur Planet.
◆ dinox : DinoX - Modern XMPP Chat Client with Video Calls, Voice Messages & OMEMO Encryption.
◆ dione : Explore, Install, Innovate — in 1 Click.
◆ disass : A simple disassembly tool.
◆ discord : Unofficial. All-in-one voice and text chat for gamers that's free, secure, and works on both your desktop and phone.
◆ discord-bot-client : A patched version of discord, with bot login & Vencord support.
◆ discord-qt : Unofficial. Discord client powered by Node.JS and Qt Widgets.
◆ diskfmt : A disk formatting utility for linux that is similar to the windows format utility.
◆ diskonaut : Terminal disk space navigator.
◆ dissent : Tiny native Discord app.
◆ dl-desktop : Desktop client for the Duolingo language learning application.
◆ dockstation : Developing with Docker has never been so easy and convenient.
◆ doggo : Command-line DNS Client for Humans. Written in Golang
◆ dolphin-emu : Unofficial, GameCube/Nintento Wii emulator with improvements.
◆ dolphin-emu-nightly : Unofficial nightly AppImage of the Dolphin emulator.
◆ dolt-workbench : A modern, browser-based, open source SQL workbench for your MySQL and PostgreSQL compatible database with version control features when connected to Dolt.
◆ domterm : DOM/JavaScript-based terminal-emulator/console.
◆ dooit : An awesome TUI todo manager.
◆ dopamine-preview : The audio player that keeps it simple.
◆ dorion : Tiny alternative Discord client with a smaller footprint, snappier startup, themes, plugins and more!
◆ dosemu : Run DOS programs under linux.
◆ dotto : A portable and modern pixelart editor, written from scratch.
◆ doublecmd-gtk : Two-panel file manager, also known as Double Commander.
◆ doublecmd-qt : Two-panel file manager, also known as Double Commander.
◆ downline : A cross-platform video and audio downloader.
◆ dr-robotniks-ring-racers : Kart racing video game originally based on SRB2Kart.
◆ dra : A command line tool to download release assets from GitHub.
◆ dragdrop : Small drag-and-drop file source for the command line.
◆ dragula : Free Stock Images on Steroids.
◆ draw : Draw in your terminal.
◆ draw.io : draw.io desktop.
◆ drawish : Simple, yet complete drawing program.
◆ drawpile : Drawing program to sketch on the same canvas simultaneously.
◆ drawy : Your handy, infinite, brainstorming tool.
◆ drill : Search files without indexing, but clever crawling.
◆ droidcam : A DroidCam AppImage for the Steam Deck/SteamOS 3.0.
◆ dropbox : A free cloud service, Unofficial AppImage.
◆ droppoint : Drag content without having to open side-by-side windows.
◆ drovp : Desktop app for encoding, converting, upscaling, and much more.
◆ drum-machine : Unofficial, Application for managing and playing with drum patterns.
◆ dsda-doom : This is a successor of prboom+ with extra tooling for demo recording and playback, with a focus on speedrunning and quality of life.
◆ dstask : Git powered terminal-based todo/note manager, markdown note page per task.
◆ dtmate : CLI to compute difference between date, time or duration.
◆ dua : View disk space usage and delete unwanted data, fast.
◆ duckling : A fast viewer for CSV/Parquet files and databases such as DuckDB, SQLite, PostgreSQL, MySQL, Clickhouse, etc.
◆ duckstation : PlayStation 1, aka PSX games Emulator.
◆ duelyst : A digital collectible card game and turn-based strategy hybrid.
◆ duf : Disk Usage/Free Utility, a better 'df' alternative.
◆ dukto : Easy and multi-platform file transfer tool.
◆ dune : A shell by the beach.
◆ dunst : Lightweight and customizable notification daemon.
◆ duplicate-image-finder : It is an application that can find duplicated images (jpg, png, bitmap, etc) in a collection.
◆ duskplayer : A minimal music player built on electron.
◆ dust : A more intuitive version of du in rust.
◆ dust3d : 3D modeling software for games, 3D printing, and so on.
◆ dvdisaster : Additional error protection for CD/DVD media.
◆ dwarf-fortress : The AppImage of lnp-forge built LinuxDwarfPack.
◆ dwarffortress : A Dwarf Fortress game. Build a fortress and try to help your dwarves survive against a deeply generated world.
◆ dwyco-phoo : Dwyco Phoo Chat and Video Calling.
◆ dysk : A linux utility to get information on filesystems, like df but better.
◆ e2-sat-editor : Satellite channel lists editor with tabbed nav.
◆ eaglemode : Zoomable user interface with plugin applications.
◆ easytag : Unofficial AppImage of EasyTAG tag editor.
◆ ecency-surfer : Rewarding communities built, owned and operated by its users.
◆ ecode : Lightweight code editor designed for modern hardware.
◆ ecwolf : Advanced port of Wolfenstein 3D based off of Wolf4SDL.
◆ edconv : A user-friendly FFmpeg GUI.
◆ eden : An experimental open-source emulator for Nintendo Switch (yuzu fork).
◆ eden-nightly : An experimental open-source emulator for Nintendo Switch (yuzu fork, nightly builds).
◆ edex-ui : A cross-platform, customizable science fiction terminal emulator.
◆ eduke32 : An advanced Duke Nukem 3D source port.
◆ eez-studio : Cross-platform low-code GUI and automation.
◆ effer : Encrypted CLI Notepad written in Rust
◆ eget : Easily install prebuilt binaries from GitHub.
◆ ehdev-shell : An electron based developing tool for feds.
◆ eiskaltdcpp : Client for EiskaltDC++ core.
◆ eka2l1 : A Symbian OS/N-Gage emulator
◆ eksplode.re : Bomberman game made with Godot under BSD3.
◆ elastic : Unofficial. Visualize and design physics-based animation of objects.
◆ elcalc : Cross-Platform calculator built with Electron.
◆ eldumper : A GB Cartridge Dumper.
◆ electorrent : A remote control Torrent client.
◆ electrocrud : No coding is required.
◆ electron-app-store : Simple App Store for Apps Built with Electron.
◆ electron-cash : Lightweight Bitcoin Cash Client.
◆ electron-mail : Unofficial ProtonMail Desktop App.
◆ electron-react-boilerplate : A Foundation for Scalable Cross-Platform Apps.
◆ electron-ssr : Install electron-ssr from appimage.
◆ electron-utils : Electron Utils for every day usage as a dev.
◆ electron-wechat : Wechat desktop application.
◆ electron-xiami : Xiami Electron desktop application.
◆ electronreact : Desktop application using Electron and React.
◆ electronwmd : Upload music to NetMD MiniDisc devices.
◆ electrum : Lightweight Bitcoin Client.
◆ electrum-ltc : A simple, but powerful Litecoin wallet.
◆ electrum-neurai : Neurai is a decentralized open source protocol optimized to transfer cryptoassets from one party to another on Layer1. The project aims to integrate NFT and Tokens with IoT and artificial intelligence applications.
◆ electrum-ravencoin : Forked from the Electrum Bitcoin base client.
◆ electrumfair : Lightweight FairCoin Client.
◆ electrumsvp : Bitcoin BSV wallet, fork of ElectrumSV.
◆ element : A feature-rich client for Matrix.org.
◆ elementary-code : AppImage version of Elementary OS "Code" by Maksym Titenko.
◆ elements : App which displays the periodic table, Education, Science.
◆ elk : Native version of Elk, a nimble Mastodon web.
◆ ellas-war : Explore Ancient Greece on Ellas-War.
◆ elphyre-walletshell : Elphyrecoin GUI Wallet.
◆ elvish : Powerful modern shell scripting.
◆ elyprismlauncher : This fork of Prism Launcher adds integrated support for Ely.by accounts.
◆ elzabrowser : Elza incognito web browser.
◆ emacs : Unofficial. FOSS text editor for complete programming language.
◆ emacs-nox : Unofficial. FOSS text editor for complete programming language.
◆ embedded-ide : Makefile based IDE for embedded systems.
◆ emoji-keyboard : Virtual keyboard-like emoji palette for Linux.
◆ emudeck : EmuDeck Desktop Electron Wrapper.
◆ emulsion : Better gaming through chemistry.
◆ en-croissant : The Ultimate Chess Toolkit.
◆ encryptpad : Secure text editor and binary encryptor with passwords.
◆ endless-sky : Space exploration and combat game.
◆ enoseannotator : View, annotate and store measurements of the eNose sensor.
◆ ente-auth : Fully open source, End to End Encrypted alternative to Google Photos and Apple Photos.
◆ ente-photos : Binary releases of the Ente Photos desktop app.
◆ enve : Create 2D Animations.
◆ envkey : EnvKey’s cross-platform native app.
◆ eosvc : Application for management of self-employeed people.
◆ eplee : Sweet, simple epub reader.
◆ epsxe : Unofficial, enhanced PSX emulator.
◆ eqonomize : Manage your personal finances.
◆ equibop : Equibop is a custom Discord App aiming to give you better performance and improve linux support.
◆ era : ERA is your note-taking tool.
◆ erscaffold : A code generator for websites.
◆ es-de : EmulationStation Desktop Edition.
◆ escrcpy : Graphical Scrcpy to display and control Android, devices powered by Electron.
◆ esearch : Screenshot OCR search translate search for picture paste...
◆ espanso : Cross-platform Text Expander written in Rust.
◆ espi : Software recreation of the SP-1200 drum machine.
◆ etcher : Flash OS images to SD cards and USB drives, Balena Etcher.
◆ eternal-lands : 3D fantasy multiplayer online role playing game.
◆ eternalmodmanager : A cross platform mod manager for DOOM Eternal.
◆ etherealengine-cc : App for managing Ethereal Engine cluster.
◆ etichetta : A YOLO annotator, for human beings.
◆ eudic : Chinese app to learn english, listen statistics/note synch....
◆ evalit : A notepad calculator application with JavaScript configuration.
◆ everdo : A powerful cross-platform GTD app with focus on privacy.
◆ everinst : An installer for the Everest mod loader.
◆ evince : Unofficial. Document viewer for popular document formats.
◆ evoplex : Agent-based modeling.
◆ excel-parser-processor : Generates an array of items from the rows.
◆ exe : A Elearning XHTML/HTML5 editor.
◆ exeqt : Cross platform tray manager.
◆ exifcleaner : Clean exif metadata from images, videos, and PDFs.
◆ eximchain-wallet : Eximchain Wallet web and electron app.
◆ exodus : Send, receive & exchange cryptocurrency. Bitcoin wallet.
◆ explorook : Rookout’s site addon to support local files and folders.
◆ exportoo : Read and search your exports.
◆ exsplode.re : A Bomberman game made with Godot under BSD3.
◆ extension-manager : A native tool for browsing, installing, and managing GNOME Shell Extensions.
◆ extraterm : The swiss army chainsaw of terminal emulators.
◆ extrema : Data visualisation and analysis.
◆ extremetuxracer : Unofficial. 3D racing game with Tux, the Linux penguin.
◆ exult : A project to recreate Ultima 7 for modern operating systems.
◆ eyedropper : Unofficial. Simple color picker, with support for various color palettes.
◆ eyestalker : Video-based eye tracking using recursive estimation of pupil.
◆ ez-tree : EZ Tree – Procedural tree generator.
◆ eza : A modern, maintained replacement for ls.
◆ ezup : Easy File Upload to Cloud Storage.
◆ f-crm : Customer Relations Management for Freelancers.
◆ f1mv-lights-integration : Connect your smart home lights to MultiViewer.
◆ fafarunner : A game developed using flutter and flame.
◆ fairshare : Simplifying the curation and sharing of biomedical research.
◆ fakedata : CLI utility for fake data generation.
◆ falkon : Unofficial. A fast Qt web browser from KDE.
◆ fantascene-dynamic-wallpaper : Dynamic wallpaper software for Linux.
◆ fantasia-archive : A database manager for world building.
◆ farmhand : A resource management game that puts a farm in your hand.
◆ fastboot : Tool to flash Android devices. This script installs the full "platform-tools" suite.
◆ fastcompmgr : A fast compositor for X11.
◆ fastfetch : Like neofetch, but much faster because written mostly in C.
◆ fasttrack : Fast tracking of multiple objects.
◆ fat-wallet : Wallet for FAT tokens.
◆ fbreader : Your Favourite eBook Reader
◆ fchat-horizon : The Best F-Chat 3.0 Client, No exceptions!.
◆ fcp : CLI, a significantly faster alternative to the classic Unix cp(1) command, copying large files and directories in a fraction of the time.
◆ fd : A simple, fast and user-friendly alternative to 'find'.
◆ fdc3-sail : Open implementation of the FDC3 standard using Electron.
◆ fdm : Free Download Manager, multiplatform powerful modern download accelerator and organizer.
◆ feather-wallet : Monero wallet.
◆ feebas : Screenshot comparison tool for identifying visual regressions.
◆ feedseries : Follow your series enthusiast news, in french.
◆ feishin : Sonixd Rewrite, a desktop music player.
◆ ferdium : All your services in one place, built by the community.
◆ ferrix : Fast, modern, cross-platform download manager built with Rust and Tauri, supports resumable downloads, clean UI, and blazing performance.
◆ fetchit : A system fetch tool for Linux, written in Rust.
◆ ff-password-exporter : Export your saved passwords from Firefox.
◆ ffdec : JPEXS Free Flash Decompiler.
◆ ffdec-nightly : JPEXS Free Flash Decompiler.
◆ fflogs-uploader : FFLogs Uploader appimage.
◆ ffmpeg : Unofficial, A complete, cross-platform solution to record, convert and stream audio and video.
◆ ffsend : Easily and securely share files from the command line. A fully featured Firefox Send client.
◆ ffvim : FIVIM is an editor for encrypted notes and files.
◆ ffwa-facebook : WebApp & Firefox Profile for Facebook.
◆ ffwa-github : WebApp & Firefox Profile for GitHub.
◆ ffwa-gmail : WebApp & Firefox Profile for Gmail.
◆ ffwa-netflix : WebApp & Firefox Profile for Netflix.
◆ ffwa-reddit : WebApp & Firefox Profile for Reddit.
◆ ffwa-twitter : WebApp & Firefox Profile for Twitter.
◆ ffwa-whatsapp : WebApp & Firefox Profile for WhatsApp.
◆ ffwa-wikipedia : WebApp & Firefox Profile for Wikipedia.
◆ ffwa-youtube : WebApp & Firefox Profile for YouTube.
◆ ficus : A software for editing and managing markdown documents.
◆ fiddler-everywhere : Debug your network traffic to deliver high-quality products.
◆ fidias-database-migration-app : Migrate SQL-based databases.
◆ fifo : A modern web browser, built on top of modern web technologies.
◆ figma-linux : First interface design tool based in the browser, graphics.
◆ file-commander : CLI, cross-platform Total Commander-like orthodox file manager.
◆ file-converter : Convert between various file formats.
◆ file-to-c : Tool for generating a C header from a spir-v binary file.
◆ filebrowser : Web File Browser.
◆ filebrowser-quantum : Web File Browser.
◆ filelight : Unofficial. View disk usage information, by KDE.
◆ filen : Desktop client for Filen.io, end-to-end encrypted cloud storage.
◆ filen-cli : Filen CLI for Windows, macOS and Linux
◆ filezilla : Unofficial. The free FTP solution with support for FTP over TLS and SFTP.
◆ filmulator-gui : Simplified raw editing with the power of film, graphics.
◆ fingrom : Financial accounting application
◆ firealpaca : A Free and Multiplatform Digital Painting Software.
◆ firecamp : Developer-first OpenSource API DevTool, Postman/Insomnia alternative.
◆ firedragon : A web browser based on Floorp (the Vivaldi of Firefox's) with many opiniated settings by default.
◆ firefly-desktop : The official IOTA and Shimmer wallet.
◆ firefox : Fast, powerful and extensible Web Browser, Stable.
◆ firefox-appimage : Unofficial, AppImage of the Web Browser, Stable.
◆ firefox-beta : Fast, powerful and extensible Web Browser, Beta Edition.
◆ firefox-beta-appimage : Unofficial, AppImage of the Web Browser, Beta.
◆ firefox-dev : Fast, powerful and extensible Web Browser, Developer Edition.
◆ firefox-devedition-appimage : Unofficial AppImage of the Web Browser, Dev.
◆ firefox-esr : Fast, powerful and extensible Web Browser, ESR Edition.
◆ firefox-esr-appimage : Unofficial AppImage of the Web Browser, ESR.
◆ firefox-nightly : Fast, powerful and extensible Web Browser, Nightly Edition.
◆ firefox-nightly-appimage : Unofficial AppImage of the Web Browser, Nightly.
◆ fireminipro : GUI for minipro CLI.
◆ firetail : An open source music player.
◆ firetv-toolkit : Android-Toolkit, a GUI for adb, modify android devices.
◆ firework : Easiest way to turn web applications and sites into desktop applications.
◆ fish : The user-friendly command line shell.
◆ fishing-funds : Fund, big market, stock, virtual currency status, in chinese.
◆ fishterm : A open-soruce Terminal remote access.
◆ fixit : A utility to fix mistakes in your commands.
◆ fjordlauncher : Prism Launcher fork with support for alternative auth servers.
◆ flacon : Audio File Encoder. Extracts audio tracks from audio CDs.
◆ fladder : A Simple Jellyfin frontend built on top of Flutter.
◆ flameshot : Tool to take screenshots with many built-in features, graphics.
◆ flare : Fantasy action RPG game using the FLARE engine.
◆ flashpoint : Flashpoint Archive is a community effort to preserve games and animations from the web.
◆ flawesome : Flawesome is a modern productivity tool.
◆ flb : A beautiful Feature Rich Music Player and Downloader,cross platform.
◆ flclash : A multi-platform proxy client based on ClashMeta,simple and easy to use, open-source and ad-free.
◆ flightcore : A Northstar installer, updater, and mod-manager.
◆ flightgear : Free, open source flight simulator developed since 1997.
◆ flightgear-airports : A software to design Flightgear groundnets.
◆ flippy-qualitative-testbench : Music sheet reader.
◆ floorp : Floorp Web Browser, the most Advanced and Fastest Firefox derivative.
◆ flow : Flow Control: a programmer's text editor.
◆ flowinity : The versatile all-in-one online platform, for everyone.
◆ fluent-reader : Modern desktop RSS reader.
◆ fluffychat : The cutest instant messenger in the matrix.
◆ fluxer : A free and open source instant messaging and VoIP platform built for friends, groups, and communities.
◆ flycast : A Sega Dreamcast, Naomi, Naomi 2 and Atomiswave emulator.
◆ flycast-dojo : Flycast fork, multiplatform Sega Dreamcast, Naomi and Atomiswave emulator for netplay, training & online tournament gameplay.
◆ flyctl : Command line tools for fly.io services.
◆ flyingcarpet : Cross-platform AirDrop. File transfer between Android, iOS, Linux, macOS, and Windows over ad hoc WiFi. No network infrastructure required, just two devices with WiFi chips in close range.
◆ fman : TUI CLI File Manager.
◆ fmradio : Cross platform FM Radio App for RTL2832U dongles.
◆ fms-file-explorer : Access and exploration of data produced.
◆ focalizzare : A Timer for Pomodoro Technique.
◆ focus : A fully featured productivity timer for the command line, based on the Pomodoro Technique.
◆ focusatwill : Combines neuroscience and music to boost productivity.
◆ focuswriter : Simple fullscreen word processor.
◆ folo : Folo is the AI Reader.
◆ fontbase : A lightning fast, beautiful and free font manager for designers.
◆ fontforge : Free, libre font editor.
◆ fontlet : A package manager for fonts.
◆ foobar2000 : Unofficial, an advanced freeware audio player for Windows, includes WINE.
◆ foot : Unofficial, A fast, lightweight and minimalistic Wayland terminal emulator (This AppImage can work on x11 as well).
◆ forkgram : Fork of Telegram Desktop messaging app.
◆ four : Electron App to access All4/Channel4, UK.
◆ foxfolio : Cryptocurrency portfolio management application.
◆ fpm : Faster Project Plus on Linux.
◆ fractale : 2D modeling of the Von Koch fractal.
◆ fraidycat : Follow blogs, wikis, YouTube, Twitter, Reddit, Instagram and more.
◆ fraktal : Podcast Manager in Electron.
◆ frame : Fast FFmpeg GUI.
◆ frame-eth-dev : A privacy focused Ethereum wallet.
◆ francetv : The france.tv site in an application.
◆ francis : Pomodoro technique, get more productive. This script installs the full "kdeutils" suite.
◆ franz : Messaging app for WhatsApp, Slack, Telegram, HipChat and much more.
◆ frappebooks : Book-keeping software for small-businesses and freelancers.
◆ freac : fre:ac, free audio converter and CD ripper for various encoders.
◆ freecad : Free and open source AutoCAD alternative.
◆ freecad-assembly3 : Assembly3 workbench for FreeCAD.
◆ freefilesync : folder comparison and synchronization software.
◆ freeman : A free, extensible, cross-platform file manager for power users.
◆ freeshow : User-friendly presenter software.
◆ freetexturepacker : Creates sprite sheets for you game or site, graphics.
◆ freetube : An Open Source YouTube app for privacy.
◆ freetube-enhanced : Unofficial, An Open Source YouTube app for privacy.
◆ freeze : Generate images of code and terminal output.
◆ freezer : An unofficial client for Deezer.
◆ fresh : Text editor for your terminal: easy, powerful and fast.
◆ freshfetch : An alternative to Neofetch in Rust with a focus on customization.
◆ fretboard : Unofficial. Application which helps you find your favorite guitar chord.
◆ friction : Flexible, user expandable 2D animation software.
◆ friture : Real-time audio visualizations, spectrum, spectrogram, etc..
◆ fromscratch : Simple autosaving scratchpad.
◆ frontimer : Desktop timer application always displayed in the forefront of the screen.
◆ fspy : An open source, cross platform app for still image camera matching.
◆ fukayo : Manga reader.
◆ funkin : A rhythm game made with HaxeFlixel
◆ funkin-legacy : Legacy GLibC Linux support for Friday Night Funkin. A rhythm game made with HaxeFlixel.
◆ funterm : A Linux Terminal Emulator.
◆ furnace : A multi-system chiptune tracker compatible with DefleMask modules.
◆ fx : Terminal JSON viewer & processor.
◆ fynodoro : Fynodoro, the Pomodoro Widget.
◆ fzf : A command-line fuzzy finder.
◆ g-v2ray : Advanced V2Ray/Xray GUI Client for Linux.
◆ gaiasky : Gaia Sky, a real-time 3D space simulator & astronomy visualisation.
◆ gale : A modern mod manager for Thunderstore.
◆ gallery-dl : Command-line program to download image galleries and collections.
◆ gameconqueror : Unofficial. Memory scanner designed to isolate the adress of an arbitrary variable in an executing process (gtk GUI).
◆ gamehub : Unified library for all your games from different platforms.
◆ gameimage : Pack a runner/emulator/game and it's configs in a single AppImage.
◆ gams-studio : Development environment of General Algebraic Modeling System.
◆ ganache : Personal Blockchain for Ethereum, latest AppImage for Linux.
◆ gaphor : A UML and SysML modeling application written in Python.
◆ gapless : Unofficial. Simple music player with blur and gapless playback.
◆ gargoyle-bin : Interactive Fiction multi-int. for all major IF formats.
◆ gaucho : Minimalist task launcher
◆ gdesktopsuite : Google Suite as a desktop app, made possible with Electron.
◆ gdevelop : Cross-platform game engine designed to be used by everyone.
◆ gdlauncher : Simple, yet powerful Minecraft custom launcher.
◆ gdm-settings : A settings app for GNOME's Login Manager, GDM.
◆ geany : Unofficial, a fast and lightweight IDE.
◆ gearboy : Game Boy / Gameboy Color emulator.
◆ gearcoleco : ColecoVision emulator.
◆ geargrafx : PC Engine / TurboGrafx-16 emulator and debugger.
◆ gearlever : Unofficial. An utility to organize and manage AppImage files for you, generate desktop entries and app metadata, update apps in-place or keep multiple versions side-by-side.
◆ gearsystem : Sega Master System / Game Gear / SG-1000 Emulator.
◆ gedit : Unofficial. The popular GNOME text editor Gedit.
◆ geeqie : Claiming to be the best image viewer and photo collection browser.
◆ geforce-infinity : Enhance the Nvidia GeForce NOW experience.
◆ geforcenow-electron : Desktop client for Nvidia GeForce NOW game streaming.
◆ gemalaya : A keyboard-driven Gemini browser written in QML.
◆ gemget : Command line downloader for the Gemini protocol.
◆ gemrb : GemRB is a portable open-source implementation of Bioware's Infinity Engine.
◆ genact : A nonsense activity generator.
◆ genesis : Open source blockchain platform.
◆ geofs : GeoFS flight sim as a desktop application.
◆ geometrize : Images to shapes converter, graphics.
◆ gerbil : A desktop app for running Large Language Models locally.
◆ gerbv : Gerber file viewer for PCB design.
◆ gert : A command line tool to download media from Reddit.
◆ getthermal : Cross-platform Thermal Camera Viewer.
◆ gextractwinicons : Extract cursors, icons and images from MS Windows files.
◆ gh : GitHub’s official command line tool.
◆ gh-eco : gh cli extension to explore the ecosystem.
◆ gharmonize : A cross-platform media conversion app with a built-in YouTube downloader and Spotify downloader, powered by yt-dlp and ffmpeg — now featuring FPS adaptation support for AC3, EAC3, and AAC codecs.
◆ ghdl : A much more convenient way to download GitHub release binaries on the command line.
◆ ghostship : Unofficial, Another definitive port of Super Mario 64.
◆ ghostty : Unofficial, 👻 ⚙️ AppImage for Ghostty Terminal Emulator (Stable)
◆ ghostty-glfw : Unofficial, 👻 ⚙️ AppImage for Ghostty Terminal Emulator (glfw version)
◆ ghostty-glfw-nightly : Unofficial, 👻 ⚙️ AppImage for Ghostty Terminal Emulator (Tip, Nightly) (glfw version)
◆ ghostty-nightly : Unoffical, 👻 ⚙️ AppImage for Ghostty Terminal Emulator (Tip, Nightly)
◆ ghrel : Download and verify GitHub release.
◆ giada : Hardcore audio music production tool and drum machine for DJs.
◆ gibs : Generally In-source Build System, build C++ projects without a project.
◆ gickup : Backup your Git repositories with ease.
◆ gifcurry : The open-source, Haskell-built video editor for GIF makers.
◆ gimp : GNU Image Manipulation Program, cross-platform image and photo editor. Multiple-choices.
◆ gimp-git : Unofficial, Cross-platform image and photo editor, built from GIT.
◆ gimp-hybrid : Unofficial, GIMP including third-party plugins and python2 support.
◆ gingko : Gingko client rewritten in Elm.
◆ git-cliff : A highly customizable Changelog Generator that follows Conventional Commit specifications.
◆ git-credential-oauth : A Git credential helper that securely authenticates to GitHub, GitLab and BitBucket using OAuth.
◆ git-good : Just a simple git client using electron and nodegit.
◆ gitbutler : The GitButler version control client, backed by Git, powered by Tauri/Rust/Svelte.
◆ githoard : Hoard git repositories with ease.
◆ github-desktop-plus : Electron-based GitHub Desktop fork with advanced functionality and Bitbucket, GitLab integration.
◆ gitify : GitHub notifications on your menu bar.
◆ gitjournal : Mobile first Note Taking integrated with Git.
◆ gitkraken : GitKraken Client including an intuitive GUI & powerful CLI.
◆ gitleaks : Protect and discover secrets using Gitleaks.
◆ gitlight : GitHub & GitLab notifications on your desktop.
◆ gitnote : A modern note taking app based on GIT.
◆ gitql : A git query language.
◆ gitqlient : Multi-platform Git client written with Qt.
◆ gittyup : GUI Git client designed to help you understand and manage your source code history.
◆ gitui : Blazing fast terminal-ui for git written in rust.
◆ gl-warp2mp4 : Utility to pre-warp a movie similar to TGAWarp.
◆ glab : A GitLab CLI tool bringing GitLab to your command line.
◆ glaxnimate : A simple and fast vector graphics animation program.
◆ glow : Render markdown on the CLI, with pizzazz!
◆ gltf-insight : C++11 based glTF 2.0 data insight tool.
◆ glulxe : AppImage of the glulxe interactive fiction interpreter.
◆ glyphr-studio-desktop : Professional font design programs.
◆ gm-companion : A tool for rpg gamemasters.
◆ gmail-desktop : Unofficial. Nifty Gmail desktop app.
◆ gnatstudio : GNAT Studio is a powerful and lightweight IDE for Ada and SPARK.
◆ gncdu : Implements NCurses Disk Usage(ncdu) with golang.
◆ gnome-boxes : Unofficial, A simple GNOME application to access virtual machines.
◆ gnome-calculator : Unofficial, Perform arithmetic, scientific or financial calculations.
◆ gnome-pomodoro : A productivity tool designed to help you manage your time effectively using the Pomodoro Technique.
◆ gnome-system-monitor : Unofficial. View current processes and monitor system state.
◆ gnome-system-monitor-gtk3 : Unofficial, Version 3.38.0, for all those who hate GNOME4+ UIs.
◆ gnome-text-editor : Unofficial AppImage of the Gnome's Text Editor application.
◆ gnome-tweaks : Unofficial, Experimental AppImage port of advanced GNOME 3 settings GUI.
◆ gnumeric : Unofficial. An open-source spreadsheet program.
◆ go-pd : A free easy to use pixeldrain.com go client pkg and CLI upload tool.
◆ go-pd-gui : DRAINY is a free easy to use cross plattform upload tool for pixeldrain.com.
◆ go-spotify-cli : Control Spotify with CLI commands.
◆ gobuster : A high-performance directory/file, DNS and virtual host brute-forcing tool written in Go. It's designed to be fast, reliable, and easy to use for security professionals and penetration testers.
◆ godmode : AI Chat Browser fast, full webapp access to ChatGPT/Claude/Bard/Bing/Llama2.
◆ godot : Multi-platform 2D and 3D game engine with a feature-rich editor.
◆ godot-appimage : Unofficial, Advanced cross-platform 2D and 3D game engine
◆ gojq : Pure Go implementation of jq.
◆ gokey : A simple vaultless password manager in Go.
◆ goland : Capable and Ergonomic Go IDE.
◆ goldencheetah : Cycling Power Analysis Software.
◆ goldendict : A feature-rich dictionary lookup program.
◆ goldendict-ng : Unofficial, an advanced dictionary lookup program, supporting many formats.
◆ gooboxfileshare : Goobox File Share App.
◆ goodls : This is a CLI tool to download shared files and folders from Google Drive.
◆ goofcord : Take control of your Discord experience with GoofCord.
◆ google-chrome : Unofficial, Web Browser, Stable version.
◆ google-chrome-beta : Unofficial, Web Browser, Beta version.
◆ google-chrome-dev : Unofficial, Web Browser, Unstable version.
◆ google-docs : Unofficial, Google Docs Desktop App made with electron.
◆ google-task-tauri : An Unofficial Desktop Client for Google Tasks.
◆ google-tasks-desktop : Unofficial Google Tasks Desktop Client.
◆ gooseberry : A command line utility to generate a knowledge base from Hypothesis annotations.
◆ gopass : The slightly more awesome standard unix password manager for teams.
◆ gopeed : A modern download manager that supports all platforms.
◆ gospel : Poppler based fast pdf viewer written in PyQt5.
◆ gost-shred : GOST R 50739-95 Data Sanitization Method (2 passes).
◆ got : Simple golang package and CLI tool to download large files faster than cURL and Wget!
◆ gotimer : A simple terminal based digital timer for Pomodoro.
◆ goto : A simple terminal SSH manager that lists favorite SSH servers.
◆ goverlay : An opensource project that aims to create a Graphical UI to help manage Linux overlays.
◆ gozen : A lightweight, stable, minimalistic and performant video editor with simplicity in mind.
◆ gpg-tui : CLI, manage your GnuPG keys with ease!
◆ gpgfrontend : A Cross-Platform OpenPGP Frontend Software.
◆ gping : Ping, but with a graph.
◆ gpredict : A satellite tracking application.
◆ gpt-anywhere : Use GPT anywhere with just one shortcut.
◆ gpu-screen-recorder : Unofficial, AppImage of GPU Screen Recorder
◆ gpu-t : A comprehensive graphics card information utility for Linux.
◆ gpupad : A flexible GLSL shader editor and IDE.
◆ gqrx : Software defined radio receiver, SDR.
◆ grabscr : Yet another screenshot maker.
◆ gradia : Unofficial, screenshot/picture editor and uploader.
◆ granatier : Bomberman clone. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ graphest :  A faithful graphing calculator.
◆ graphql-playground : GraphQL IDE for better development workflows.
◆ graphs : Unofficial. A simple, yet powerful tool that allows you to plot and manipulate your data with ease.
◆ graviton : A simple code editor.
◆ greenlight : Client for xCloud and Xbox home streaming made in Typescript.
◆ gridcoin-research : POS-based cryptocurrency.
◆ gridea : A static blog writing client, 一个静态博客写作客户端.
◆ gridix : A simple, fast, and secure cross-platform database management tool with Helix or Vim-style keybindings.
◆ gridplayer : Play videos side-by-side.
◆ gridsync : Synchronize local directories with Tahoe-LAFS storage grids.
◆ grinplusplus : A C++ Grin Node & Wallet.
◆ grist-desktop : Desktop Grist, packaged with Electron.
◆ gron : Make JSON greppable! Transform JSON into discrete assignments to grep.
◆ gron.awk : True JSON parser in pure Awk. fast with Gawk/Mawk/GoAWK.
◆ groot : Graphical Editor to create BehaviorTrees.
◆ gsequencer : Tree based audio processing engine.
◆ gsubs : Finds you the perfect subtitle match.
◆ guarda : A secure, easy-to-use open source multi-platform cryptocurrency wallet.
◆ guglielmo : A FM, DAB/DAB+ decoder using Qt and C++.
◆ guiscrcpy : GUI integration for android screen mirroring system.
◆ guitar : Graphical git client.
◆ gum : A tool for glamorous shell scripts.
◆ gvim : Edit text files.
◆ gxc-smart-contract-ide : Gxchain smart contract IDE alpha.
◆ gyroflow : Video stabilization using gyroscope data.
◆ hades-emu : A Nintendo Game Boy Advance Emulator.
◆ hamsket : Free and Open Source messaging and emailing app.
◆ handbrake : Unofficial, An open-source multiplatform video transcoder.
◆ handlr : fork of the original handlr, with support for regular expressions.
◆ handy : A free, open source, and extensible speech-to-text application that works completely offline.
◆ hapee : Best cross-platform downloader ever.
◆ harmonoid : Plays & manages your music library. Looks beautiful & juicy. Playlists, visuals, synced lyrics, pitch shift, volume boost & more.
◆ hascard : Flashcard TUI CLI with markdown cards.
◆ hashsum : A universal tool for finding file duplicates and modified files.
◆ hastyheroes : An endless 2D jumping game.
◆ haveno-reto : Decentralized P2P exchange built on Monero and Tor.
◆ hctl : A tool to control your Home Assistant devices from the command-line.
◆ hdrmerge : Merge several raw images into a single DNG raw image.
◆ heat1d : UI for testing the soilFluxex3D library, CRITERIA1D.
◆ heimer : Simple cross-platform mind map, diagram, and note-taking tool.
◆ helio : One music sequencer for all major platforms, desktop and mobile.
◆ helion : A modern fast paced Doom FPS engine.
◆ helioslauncher : Custom launcher for modded minecraft written in Electron.
◆ helium : The Chromium-based web browser made for people, with love. Best privacy by default, unbiased ad-blocking, no bloat and no noise.
◆ helix : A post-modern modal text editor.
◆ henson : A puppet manager for NationStates.
◆ hermesmessenger : Desktop client version for Hermes Messenger.
◆ hero-display : App for display on HERO robot.
◆ heroic-games-launcher : A Native GOG and Epic Games Launcher for Linux.
◆ hexinator : Hex editor for reverse engineering & binary file analysis.
◆ hexoclient : A cross-platform hexo client, build on electron.
◆ hexoeditor : Markdown editor for Hexo built with Electron.
◆ heynote : A dedicated scratchpad for developers.
◆ hiddify-next : Auto-proxy client, supporting Sing-box, X-ray, TUIC, Hysteria.
◆ hide.me : Hide.me CLI VPN client for Linux.
◆ hidpi-fixer : Fractional scaling configuration on X11 desktops.
◆ highlite : A RuneLite-esque Client for the game High Spell.
◆ hilbish : The Moon-powered shell! A comfy and extensible shell for Lua fans!
◆ himalaya : CLI to manage emails.
◆ hmcl : A Minecraft Launcher which is multi-functional, cross-platform and popular.
◆ hotspot : The Linux perf GUI for performance analysis.
◆ houdoku : Manga reader and library manager for the desktop.
◆ hpack : A fine tool to convert any data into C header.
◆ hsinstall : Pack a haskell project into a deployable directory structure.
◆ htmldoc : HTML & Markdown Conversion Software to output PostScript and PDF.
◆ htop : Unofficial, CLI utility to monitor system resources.
◆ httpie-desktop : HTTPie for Desktop.
◆ httptoolkit : HTTP Toolkit is an open-source tool for debugging, testing and building with HTTP.
◆ hugin : Stitch photographs together.
◆ hugor : A cross-platform, multimedia interpreter for Hugo adventure games.
◆ humanlog : Logs for humans to read.
◆ huwinterpreter : HuwCode interpreter.
◆ hw-probe : Probe for hardware and upload result to the Linux hdw database.
◆ hydra : Game launcher with its own embedded bittorrent client.
◆ hydrogen-music : The advanced drum machine.
◆ hyper : A terminal built on web technologies.
◆ hyperdex : BarterDEX desktop app.
◆ hyperfine : A command-line benchmarking tool.
◆ hyperionide : Hyperion IDE for JIRA.
◆ hyperkeys : Unleash you keyboard shorcuts.
◆ hyperspace : A fluffy client for Mastodon in React.
◆ hypnotix : Unofficial. An IPTV streaming application with support for live TV.
◆ i3 : Unofficial, A tiling window manager for X11.
◆ i3-auto-layout : Automatic, optimal tiling for i3wm. Fork of dead version.
◆ i3lock-color : The world's most popular non-default computer lockscreen.
◆ iagoncloudapp : Iagon Cloud Application.
◆ ibus-rime : Zhongzhou Yun input method, ibus-rime in AppImage format.
◆ icalingua++ : A client for QQ and more.
◆ icecat : GNU IceCat is the GNU version of the Firefox web browser.
◆ icestudio : A real gamechanger in the world of Open Source FPGAs.
◆ identity : Unofficial. Compare images and videos with one another to check for differences.
◆ idescriptor : A free, open-source, and cross-platform iDevice management tool.
◆ igdm : Desktop application for Instagram DMs.
◆ iheartradio-webapp : Election WebApp for iHeartRadio.
◆ iloader : User friendly sideloader.
◆ imagemagick-clang : CLI to create, edit, compose, or convert digital images.
◆ imagemagick-gcc : CLI to create, edit, compose, or convert digital images.
◆ imagemosaicwall : Create an image based on a bunch of other images.
◆ imagine : PNG/JPEG optimization.
◆ imapsyncclient : An electron-vue project.
◆ imfile : A full-featured download manager.
◆ imgbrd-grabber : Very customizable imageboard/booru downloader.
◆ imgcat : Display images and gifs in your terminal.
◆ imhex : A Hex Editor for Reverse Engineers and Programmers.
◆ impact : Music Management and Playback.
◆ impactor : Feature rich iOS/tvOS sideloading application written in Rust. Formerly known as PlumeImpactor.
◆ implay : A Cross-Platform Desktop Media Player, built on top of mpv and ImGui.
◆ impposter : Post to my own development blog.
◆ impression : Unofficial. Simple USB image writer application.
◆ inboxer : Simple client for Google Inbox.
◆ infection-monkey : An automated penetration test tool, security.
◆ infinitex : Editor for academics with cryptography.
◆ infra-app : Infra App for Linux.
◆ inkdown : A WYSIWYG Markdown editor, improve reading and editing experience and generate your Markdown files.
◆ inkscape : Unofficial. Vector-based drawing program and graphics editor for both artistic and technical illustrations. It can import and export various file formats, including SVG, AI, EPS, PDF, AutoCAD, PS and PNG.
◆ innerbreeze : Guided breathing meditation app based on the Wim Hof breathing method.
◆ insight : The GUI front-end of GDB with Tcl/Tk.
◆ insomnia : API client for GraphQL, REST, WebSockets and gRPC.
◆ insomnium : A local API testing tool privacy-focused, fork of Kong/insomnia.
◆ instead : Simple Text Adventures Interpreter.
◆ international-doom : Small, functional and simple source ports, created with help, efforts and bits of code from people around the world.
◆ internxt-drive : Electron React Boilerplate uses Electron and React.
◆ interstellar : An app for Mbin/Lemmy/PieFed, connecting you to the fediverse.
◆ intiface : Desktop Intiface Application.
◆ invoice-generator : Invoice Generator in Electron.
◆ inxi : A full featured CLI system information tool.
◆ iota1k : IOTA based messenging app.
◆ ipfs-desktop : An unobtrusive and user-friendly app for IPFS on Linux.
◆ iptracker : Desktop tool to keep track of your IP address and update you when it changes.
◆ iptvnator : IPTV player application.
◆ ipuissance-4d : Connect Four video game with a 3-Dimentional rendering.
◆ iqpuzzle : A challenging pentomino puzzle.
◆ irccloud-desktop : IRCCloud Desktop Client.
◆ irscrutinizer : Capture/generate/analyze/import/export infrared signals.
◆ isd : Isd (interactive systemd) – a better way to work with systemd units.
◆ isle-editor : Editor for Integrated Statistics Learning Environment lessons.
◆ isle-portable : Unofficial, a portable version of LEGO Island (1997).
◆ isoimagewriter : Write an ISO Image to a USB Disk. This script installs the full "kdeutils" suite.
◆ isolate : Lightweight image browser.
◆ itusb1-manager : Control the ITUSB1 USB Test Switch.
◆ jabref : Graphical Java application for managing BibTeX and biblatex (.bib) databases.
◆ jag : Program for telemetry veiwing.
◆ james : HTTP/HTTPS proxy built in Electron and React.
◆ jan : FOSS Alternative to ChatGPT that runs 100% offline on your computer.
◆ janice : A desktop app for viewing large JSON files.
◆ janus : Simple text editor.
◆ jazz2 : Open-source reimplementation of Jazz Jackrabbit 2.
◆ jdappstreamedit : A graphical Program to create and edit AppStream files.
◆ jddesktopentryedit : A graphical Program to create and edit Desktop Entries.
◆ jdminecraftlauncher : Unofficial classic styled Minecraft Launcher.
◆ jdmrpackinstaller : Install Modrinth modpacks.
◆ jdnbtexplorer : A Editor for Minecraft NBT files.
◆ jdownloader2 : JDownloader is a free download management tool with a huge community that makes downloading as easy and fast as it should be.
◆ jdreplace : With jdReplace you can replace a text in all files of a directory.
◆ jdtextedit : jdTextEdit is a powerful texteditor with a lot of features.
◆ jellyamp : A client for listening to music from a Jellyfin server.
◆ jellyfin : Media player. Stream to any device from your own server.
◆ jexiftoolgui : Java/Swing graphical frontend for ExifTool.
◆ jfcord : An Jellyfin rich presence client for Discord.
◆ jgenesis : Sega Genesis, Sega CD, SNES, Master System, Game Gear emulator (GUI).
◆ jgenesis-cli : Sega Genesis, Sega CD, SNES, Master System, Game Gear emulator (CLI).
◆ jgrasp : An IDE with Visualizations for Improving Software Comprehensibility.
◆ jimud : MUD client for ShadowMUD.com, based on webclient.
◆ jira-timer : Menubar app for JIRA time logging.
◆ jitsi-meet : Jitsi Meet Desktop App.
◆ jklubtv : Chess Round Robin Tournament Manager.
◆ jless : CLI JSON viewer designed for reading, exploring, and searching.
◆ jnv : Interactive JSON filter using jq.
◆ joaldesktop : Electron application boilerplate.
◆ join-desktop : A companion app for the Join website.
◆ joplin : Note and to-do application with synchronization capabilities.
◆ joplin-beta : A cross-platform note taking and to-do app.
◆ jottem : A lean, low friction terminal app for managing markdown notes.
◆ journalv : Journaling app for your days and dreams.
◆ joy2droidx : Turn Android phones into virtual Xbox 360 controller.
◆ jpg-glitch-electron : Desktop app for glitching images.
◆ jq : Command-line JSON processor.
◆ jqp : A TUI playground to experiment with jq.
◆ jreleaser : The quick way to release your project.
◆ jrom-manager : A Rom Manager entirely written in Java and released under GPL-2.
◆ jscad-desktop : Jscad desktop application.
◆ juggernaut : Decentralized messaging and payments.
◆ julius : An open source re-implementation of the Caesar III game.
◆ junest : Arch Linux based distro that runs rootless on any other Linux distro.
◆ kade : A desktop application for Q Methodology.
◆ kadium : App for staying ontop of YouTube channels' uploads.
◆ kaffeine : Unofficial, Media player with support for digital television (DVB-C/S/S2/T, ATSC, CI/CAM).
◆ kage : GUI for Metasploit Meterpreter and Session Handler.
◆ kaidan : A QtQuick Jabber client.
◆ kajongg : Unofficial, An ancient Chinese board game for 4 players. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ kalba : Sentence mining tool.
◆ kalc : Complex numbers, 2d/3d graphing, arbitrary precision cli calculator.
◆ kalker : Scientific calculator with math syntax for user-defined variables.
◆ kalm : Unofficial, Teach you different breathing techniques. This script installs the full "kdeutils" suite.
◆ kando : The Cross-Platform Pie Menu.
◆ kanji-dojo : A multi-platform application for memorizing Japanese language.
◆ kanon : Maturita GPJP designed for use with kanon web app.
◆ kanri : Modern offline Kanban board app. Built with simplicity and user experience in mind.
◆ kapman : Pac-Man clone. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ karbonized : 💫 Awesome Image Generator for Code Snippets & Mockups
◆ kardi : Application for taking notes with capabilities to view all content from any device while keeping all data accessible by you only.
◆ kate : Unofficial, A multi-document editor part of KDE. This script installs the full "kdeutils" suite.
◆ katomic : Edu. game based around molecular geometry. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ katvan : A bare-bones editor for Typst files, with a bias for Right-to-Left editing.
◆ kbackup : Back up your data. This script installs the full "kdeutils" suite.
◆ kblackbox : Unofficial, A game of hide and seek. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ kblocks : Unofficial, Classic Tetris / falling blocks game. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ kboard : Terminal game to practice keyboard typing.
◆ kbounce : Unofficial, Fill the field game. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ kbreakout : Unofficial, Destroy bricks without losing the ball. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ kcalc : Unofficial, Scientific Calculator. This script installs the full "kdeutils" suite.
◆ kcharselect : Unofficial, Character Selector. This script installs the full "kdeutils" suite.
◆ kclock : Unofficial, A universal clock application. This script installs the full "kdeutils" suite.
◆ kcov : Unofficial, An AppImage of Kcov code coverage tool.
◆ kdebugsettings : Unofficial, Edits displayed QLoggingCategory. This script installs the full "kdeutils" suite.
◆ kdeconnect : Unofficial, A project that enables all your Android devices to communicate with each other.
◆ kdegames : Unofficial, Full & updatable KDE Games suite, metapackage.
◆ kdenlive : A powerful Video Editor provided by KDE.
◆ kdenlive-daily : A powerful Video Editor provided by KDE (daily builds).
◆ kdenlive-enhanced : Unofficial AppImage of Kdenlive Video Editor which is able to work on any linux distro.
◆ kdeutils : Unofficial, Full & updatable KDE Utils suite, metapackage.
◆ kdf : Unofficial, view Disk Usage. This script installs the full "kdeutils" suite.
◆ kdialog : Unofficial, a dialog utility. This script installs the full "kdeutils" suite.
◆ kdiamond : Unofficial, Diamond game. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ kdiskmark : A simple open-source disk benchmark tool for Linux distros.
◆ keditbookmarks : Unofficial, Bookmarks editor. This script installs the full "kdeutils" suite.
◆ keepassxc : Port of the Windows application “Keepass Password Safe”.
◆ keepassxc-devel : Port of the Windows application “Keepass Password Safe”, dev-edition.
◆ keepkey-desktop : An all-in-one suite for using your KeepKey hardware wallet.
◆ keeweb : Free cross-platform password manager compatible with KeePass.
◆ keibo-moneytracker-x86-64 : Track your income and expenses easily.
◆ kettleclient : Client for Kettle REST service.
◆ kevedit : ZZT Editor.
◆ keyboardclient : Keyboard Settings Client.
◆ keycombiner : Learn exactly the keyboard shortcuts you need.
◆ keymanager : One-stop certificate app and certificate key management.
◆ keypunch : Unofficial, keyboard writing speed test application.　
◆ keyrier-json : A CLI/library/webapp to perfom SQL queries on JSON & CSV.
◆ keys : Key management, signing and encryption.
◆ keysmith : Generates tokens for your two-factor logins. This script installs the full "kdeutils" suite.
◆ kfind : A search tool. This script installs the full "kdeutils" suite.
◆ kfourinline : Unofficial, 4 in row game. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ kftray : Kubectl port-forward manager and reverse tunnel (ngrok-like) for exposing local services publicly, with TLS termination, HTTP traffic inspection, UDP forwarding, multi-hop proxy routing through k8s clusters, stateful config via filesystem or git.
◆ kgoldrunner : Unofficial, A game with a runner and gold. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ kgpg : A GnuPG frontend. This script installs the full "kdeutils" suite.
◆ kibi : A text editor in ≤1024 lines of code, written in Rust.
◆ kicad : Electronic Design Automation suite.
◆ kid3 : Unofficial, efficient audio tagger that supports a large variety of file formats.
◆ kigo : Unofficial, Go strategic board game for two players. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ kiibohd-configurator : Configuration utility for Input Club keyboards.
◆ kiku : Play music from youtube on desktop. Supports local api, invidious and piped as source.
◆ killbots : Unofficial, Port of the classic console game Robots. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ kimitzu-client : Kimitzu Client.
◆ kinopio : Thinking canvas for new ideas and hard problems.
◆ kiri-moto : Browser-based Slicer for 3D Printing, CAM, Laser and mesh editor.
◆ kiriki : A dice game. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ kitsas : Finnish bookkeeping software for small organizations.
◆ kitty : Cross-platform, fast, feature-rich, GPU based terminal (also provides "kitten" CLI utility).
◆ kitupiikki : Bookkeeping software for small organizations.
◆ kiwix : An offline reader for Web content, primarily designed to make Wikipedia available offline. It reads archives in the ZIM file format, a highly compressed open format with additional metadata.
◆ kjumpingcube : A game of dices on a board. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ klickety : Color matching like SameGame. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ klines : Inspired by well known game of Color Lines. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ klogg : A smart interactive log explorer.
◆ km-recplayer : Recorder and player of keyboard and mouse input (HID)
◆ kmahjongg : Unofficial, Mahjongg game. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ kmines : Unofficial, Classic mine game. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ kmon : Linux Kernel Manager and Activity Monitor.
◆ kmonad : An advanced keyboard manager.
◆ knavalbattle : Unofficial, Battle Ship game. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ knetwalk : Unofficial, Net constructing game. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ knights : Unofficial, Chess interface for the KDE Platform. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ knowte : Note taking.
◆ koboldcpp : Simple 1-file way to run GGML and GGUF models with KoboldAI's UI.
◆ koishi-desktop : Launch Koishi from your desktop.
◆ kolf : Unofficial, Mini Golf game. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ kollision : Unofficial, Dodge red balls in the field. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ kondo : Cleans dependencies and build artifacts from your projects.
◆ kongress : Unofficial, A companion application for conferences. This script installs the full "kdeutils" suite.
◆ konquest : Game of planets. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ koodo-reader : Modern ebook manager and reader with sync & backup capacities.
◆ kopia : Cross-platform backup tool.
◆ koreader : A document viewer for E Ink devices. Supported fileformats include EPUB, PDF, DjVu, XPS, CBT, CBZ, FB2, PDB, TXT, HTML, RTF, CHM, DOC, MOBI and ZIP files. It’s available for Kindle, Kobo, PocketBook, Android and desktop Linux.
◆ koreader-nightly : A document viewer for E Ink devices. Supported fileformats include EPUB, PDF, DjVu, XPS, CBT, CBZ, FB2, PDB, TXT, HTML, RTF, CHM, DOC, MOBI and ZIP files. It’s available for Kindle, Kobo, PocketBook, Android and desktop Linux. Nightly build.
◆ kpat : Unofficial, Klondike, Spider, Free Cell and other Solitaire. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ krecorder : Unofficial, An audio recording application. This script installs the full "kdeutils" suite.
◆ kreversi : Reversi game. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ krita : A professional FREE and open source painting program, graphics.
◆ krita-devel : A professional FREE open source painting program, dev-edition.
◆ kronos : Unofficial, Sega Saturn emulator.
◆ krunker : Krunker (.io) is a fast-paced first-person shooter game with pixel graphics.
◆ kshisen : A game similar to Mahjongg. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ ksirk : A strategy board game. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ ksnakeduel : A snake race game. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ ksnip : Screenshot tool inspired by Windows Snipping Tool and made with Qt.
◆ kspaceduel : Unofficial, Battleship with satellites in the space. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ ksquares : Unofficial, Win with most number of completed squares. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ ksudoku : Unofficial, Sudoku game. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ kteatime : Unofficial, A handy timer for steeping tea. This script installs the full "kdeutils" suite.
◆ ktimer : Unofficial, Countdown Launcher. This script installs the full "kdeutils" suite.
◆ ktrip : Unofficial, KTrip helps you navigate in public transport. This script installs the full "kdeutils" suite.
◆ ktuberling : Unofficial, Simple Mr. Potato game for children. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ kubeman : The Hero that Kubernetes deserves.
◆ kubenav : The navigator for your Kubernetes clusters right in your pocket.
◆ kubrick : Unofficial, A logic game based on Rubik's Cube. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ kunkun : An open source, cross-platform, extensible app launcher.
◆ kure : CLI password manager with sessions.
◆ kuro : An elegant Microsoft ToDo desktop client for Linux, a fork of Ao.
◆ kvrt : Official Kaspersky Virus Removal Tool for Linux.
◆ kwave : A sound & audio editor designed for the KDE Desktop Environment.
◆ kweather : A convergent weather application. This script installs the full "kdeutils" suite.
◆ kwrite : Unofficial, KWrite is a text editor by KDE. This script installs the full "kdeutils" suite.
◆ labplot : Data Visualization and Analysis software accessible to everyone and trusted by professionals.
◆ ladybird : A truly independent web browser, using a novel engine based on web standards.
◆ lagrange : Lagrange is a cross-platform client for browsing Geminispace (GUI Version).
◆ laidout : Laidout, desktop publishing software
◆ laigter : Tool to generate normal/specular/occlussion/parallax 2D maps.
◆ lambda-lantern : A 3D game about functional programming patterns.
◆ lan-mouse : Mouse & keyboard sharing via LAN.
◆ landrop : Drop any files to any devices on your LAN.
◆ langly : Manage Laravel json language files.
◆ lanshare : LAN file transfer app for any kind and size of files and folders.
◆ lapce : Lightning-fast and Powerful Code Editor written in Rust.
◆ laravel-kit : Easy Laravel application management.
◆ launcher : Generic application's launcher.
◆ lazpaint : Cross-platform image editor with raster and vector layers similar to Paint.Net written in Lazarus (Free Pascal).
◆ lazygit : Simple terminal UI for git commands.
◆ lazytyper : LazyTyper desktop client (repackaged from the official AppImage, including built-in dependencies).
◆ lbry-desktop : A browser and wallet for LBRY.
◆ lcedit : Editor, unknown.
◆ ldtk : Modern and efficient 2D level editor.
◆ leaflet : POSP official notes application, written in flutter, beautiful, fast and secure.
◆ leapp : The DevTool to access your cloud.
◆ led.custom.palette : Design the lights on your Model01 with an ease.
◆ ledger-live-desktop : Ledger Wallet crypto app. Secure your crypto assets such as Bitcoin, Ethereum, XRP, Monero, and more. Give yourself peace of mind by knowing that your cryptocurrencies are safe.
◆ legcord : Legcord is a custom client designed to enhance your Discord experience while keeping everything lightweight.
◆ legendary-kingdoms : Implementation of Legendary Kingdoms Gamebooks in C++.
◆ lemon : A tiny judging environment for OI contest based on Project_LemonPlus.
◆ lens : App you need to take control of your Kubernetes clusters.
◆ leocad : Create virtual LEGO models.
◆ leonflix : Multi-platform desktop application for watching movies & TV shows.
◆ lepton : Democratizing Code Snippets Management.
◆ lescovex : Lescovex decentralized exchange, wallet and contract issuer.
◆ leshade : An unofficial Reshade Installer for Linux.
◆ levior : Converts web pages on-the-fly to the gemtext format.
◆ lexido : A terminal assistant, powered by Generative AI.
◆ lf : lf, as in "list files" is a terminal file manager written in Go.
◆ libassist : Library Assistant.
◆ libation : Unofficial, application for downloading and managing your Audible audiobooks.
◆ libertem : Pixelated scanning transmission electron microscopy.
◆ librecad : 2D CAD program written in C++11 using the Qt framework.
◆ libreoffice : Free and powerful office suite, and a successor to OpenOffice.
◆ librepcb : Design Schematics and PCBs.
◆ librescore : The open source (GPLv3), serverless (IPFS-based), offline-first, and totally free alternative to musescore.com
◆ libresprite : Animated sprite editor & pixel art tool. Fork of the last GPLv2 commit of Aseprite.
◆ librewolf : Firefox-based Web Browser focused on privacy, security, freedom.
◆ lightning : Lightning Wallet Application.
◆ lightning-peach-wallet : Wallet for lightning network
◆ liground : A mordern Chess Variant Analysis GUI, game.
◆ liketaskmanager : Process/performances monitor, CPU, RAM, Disks and Network.
◆ linedancer : Arcade game and entry for Ludum Dare 35.
◆ linked : Daily journaling without distraction.
◆ linkora : Link organizer for Android and desktop with self-hosted sync.
◆ linphone : A libre SIP client.
◆ linux-intel-undervolt-gui : Undervolting GUI for Intel Linux Systems.
◆ linuxaircombat : Free open source combat flight simulator.
◆ linuxdeployqt : Convert a linux program to an AppDir or an AppImage.
◆ linuxqq : New Linux QQ based on Electron.
◆ linuxtoys : A collection of tools for Linux in a user-friendly way.
◆ linuxwallpaper : Bing wallpaper of the day.
◆ linwood-butterfly : Powerful, minimalistic, cross-platform, note-taking app.
◆ liquidlauncher : The official Minecraft launcher for LiquidBounce.
◆ lisk-desktop : Lisk graphical user interface for desktop.
◆ listen.moe : Official LISTEN.moe Desktop Client.
◆ listen1-desktop : One for all free music in China.
◆ lite-xl : A lightweight text editor written in Lua.
◆ liteide : LiteIDE is a simple, open source, cross-platform Go IDE.
◆ litime : A terminal literature clock telling time with quotes from literature.
◆ liveme-pro-tools : Browse, search and manage accounts, replays and more.
◆ lmms : FL Studio® alternative that allows you to produce music with the PC.
◆ lmstudio : Experimenting with local and open-source Large Language Models.
◆ lobe-chat : LobeHub - an open-source, modern design AI Agent Workspace. Supports multiple AI providers, Knowledge Base (file upload / RAG ), one click install MCP Marketplace and Artifacts / Thinking. One-click FREE deployment of your private AI Agent application.
◆ local-browser : Share your localhost in a unique way.
◆ localsend : An open source cross-platform alternative to AirDrop
◆ lockbook-cli : The private, polished note-taking platform, CLI.
◆ lockbook-desktop : The private, polished note-taking platform.
◆ lofi : A mini Spotify player with WebGL visualizations.
◆ loginized : Loginized Gnome GDM Login Theme Manager.
◆ logseq : A privacy-first platform for knowledge management and collaboration.
◆ looofix : Minimalist Desktop Lofi Player To Relax and Enjoy.
◆ loopauditioneer : Software for loop and cue handling in .wav files.
◆ lore-forge : The app for writers & worldbuilders.
◆ lorien : Infinite canvas drawing/whiteboarding app.
◆ losslesscut : The swiss army knife of lossless video/audio editing.
◆ love : The unquestionably awesome 2D game engine.
◆ lovelive : A LoveLiver Music Player.
◆ lovesay : Cowsay, but full of love and now a little rusty.
◆ lovr : Lua Virtual Reality Framework.
◆ lowfi : An extremely simple lofi player. CLI.
◆ lpub3d : An LDraw Building Instruction Editor.
◆ lsd : The next gen ls command.
◆ lskat : Unofficial, Fun and engaging card game for two players. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ luanti : Multiplayer infinite-world block sandbox.
◆ ludo : Ludo is a work in progress libretro frontend written in go.
◆ lumi : A tool to create and display interactive content with H5P.
◆ luna : Manage npm dependencies through a modern UI.
◆ lunar-client : Free Minecraft Client, a modpack for all versions of Minecraft.
◆ lunatask : All-in-one encrypted to-do list, notebook, habit and mood tracker.
◆ lutris : Unofficial. Install and play video games from all eras and from most gaming systems, by leveraging and combining existing emulators, WINE included.
◆ lutris-gamepad-ui : A simple, TV-friendly, gamepad-navigable frontend for the Lutris game launcher on Linux.
◆ lvgl-editor : LVGL Pro is a complete toolkit to build, test, share and ship embedded UIs efficiently.
◆ lx-music-desktop : 一个基于electron的音乐软件.
◆ lxtask : Unofficial. A lightweight and desktop-independent task manager.
◆ lyricistant : A helpful writing assistant for lyricists.
◆ m : Data oriented programming language for game developers.
◆ macchina : A system information frontend with an emphasis on performance.
◆ magento2-upgrade-gui : Magento 2 Upgrade GUI.
◆ mages : Multiplatform Matrix chat client (experimental CMP+rust app).
◆ magicfountain : A novel and screenwriting program.
◆ makagiga : To-do manager, notepad, RSS reader and much more.
◆ makhber : Makhber is a free application for Visualization and Analysis of Scientific Data.
◆ makoureactor : Can edit field from Final Fantasy VII, PS & PC.
◆ malice : GUI Programming Tool for iCE40.
◆ mame : Unofficial AppImage of MAME emulator.
◆ manager-io : Free Accounting Software for Linux, Server.
◆ mandelbulber2 : Explore trigonometric, hyper-complex and other 3D fractals.
◆ manga-tui : Terminal-based manga reader and downloader with image support.
◆ mangadesk : Terminal client for MangaDex.
◆ mangal : Most advanced, yet simple CLI manga downloader in the universe!
◆ mangayomi : Free and open source application for reading manga, novels, and watching animes available.
◆ mangbandclient : A free online multi-player realtime roguelike game.
◆ mangojuice : It's a great alternative to GOverlay.
◆ mangoverlay : Mangohud configuration tool.
◆ manta : Flexible invoicing app with beautiful & customizable templates.
◆ mapeo : Local-first mapping and monitoring in remote environments.
◆ mapollage : Photo kml generator for Google Earth.
◆ mapton : Some kind of map application.
◆ mark-mind : Multiplatform mind map and outliner editor with markdown support.
◆ markflowy : Modern markdown editor application, Build fast and efficient workflows.
◆ markman : A markdown editor.
◆ marktext : A simple and elegant markdown editor multiplatform.
◆ marlin-conf : Configuration tool for Marlin project.
◆ martian : Websocket testing tool.
◆ marvin : Open Source record and playback test automation for the web.
◆ master-pdf-editor : Master PDF Editor allows you to create, edit, preview, encrypt, sign and print PDF documents.
◆ mastervyrn : MasterVyrn is a clean dedicated GBF loader.
◆ mate-system-monitor : Unofficial, Process viewer and system resource monitor, from MATE.
◆ materialious : Modern material design for Invidious.
◆ mathcha-notebook : Desktop version of Mathcha, built for your privacy.
◆ matm : Watch anime, movies, tv shows and read manga from comfort of the cli.
◆ mattermost-desktop : Secure collaboration across entire software development.
◆ mayo : 3D CAD viewer and converter based on Qt + OpenCascade.
◆ mazesolver : A tool which shows how different algorithms solves mazes.
◆ mbcord : An Emby/Jellyfin rich presence client for Discord.
◆ mcfly : Fly through your shell history. Great Scott!
◆ mcpelauncher : The main repo for the Linux Bedrock edition Minecraft launcher.
◆ mcpodcast : Electron app for tasks around Podcast mp3 files.
◆ mdcat : Command line, "cat" for markdown.
◆ mdl : MDL wallet.
◆ mdsilo-app : Lightweight Knowledge Base and Feed Reader.
◆ mdview : Application that renders and displays Markdown files.
◆ measur : Energy efficiency calculation app for use with industrial equipment.
◆ mechtype : A lightweight app designed to elevate your typing experience by allowing you to enjoy custom soundtracks with every keystroke.
◆ mechvibes : Play mechanical keyboard sounds as you type.
◆ media-downloader : Cross-platform audio/video downloader.
◆ media-dupes : Content duplicator for common media services like YouTube.
◆ media-hoarder : Media Hoarder - THE media frontend for data hoarders and movie lovers
◆ mediachips : Manage your videos, add any metadata to them and play them.
◆ mediaelch : Media Manager for Kodi.
◆ mediaharbor : Cross-platform MediaHarbor
◆ median-xl : Launcher for Median XL mod, Diablo II overhaul.
◆ mediathekview : Searches the online media libraries of various broadcasters.
◆ mednafen : Unofficial AppImage. Mednafen is a portable, utilizing OpenGL and SDL, argument(command-line)-driven multi-system emulator.
◆ megaglest : MegaGlest real-time strategy game engine (cross-platform, 3-d).
◆ mellowplayer : Cloud music integration for your desktop.
◆ melodie : Simple-as-pie music player.
◆ melonds : DS emulator, sorta.
◆ melonds-enhanced : Unofficial, AppImage of melonDS which is able to work on any linux distro.
◆ melonmix : KH Melon Mix (DS Emulator) DS emulator, sorta DS emulator, sorta.
◆ memento : A video player for studying Japanese.
◆ memocast : Yet another elegant Wiz Note Client.
◆ memospot : Memospot is a self-contained desktop version of Memos -a privacy-first, lightweight note-taking service.
◆ memoto : DevOps oriented modeling tool.
◆ mendeley : Search over 100 million cross-publisher articles and counting.
◆ menyoki : Screen{shot,cast} and perform ImageOps on the command line.
◆ meow-sql : An attempt to port HeidiSQL to C++/Qt.
◆ mercury : Firefox fork with compiler optimizations and patches from Librewolf.
◆ meshlab : Processor and editor of large 3D triangular meshes.
◆ meshmill : The world's greatest open source 3D CAM software, maybe one day.
◆ meta-grabber : A tool to grab metadata for tv shows and rename files on PC.
◆ mgba : Game Boy Advance Emulator.
◆ micropad : µPad is an open digital note taking app.
◆ microsoft-edge : Web Browser provided by Microsoft, Stable Edition.
◆ microsoft-edge-beta : Web Browser provided by Microsoft, Beta Edition.
◆ microsoft-edge-dev : Web Browser provided by Microsoft, Developer Edition.
◆ midori : Surf lightly, quickly and safely with Midori Web Browser.
◆ miesimulatorgui : MieSimulatorGUI by Virtual Photonics.
◆ mightymike : Pangea Software's Mighty Mike, Power Pete for modern systems.
◆ migu : Stream anime torrents, real-time with no waiting for downloads.
◆ milkytracker : An FT2 compatible music tracker.
◆ mindmapp : Electron application to draw mind maps.
◆ mine-craft.io : Minecraft and even more!
◆ minecraft-launcher : Game downloader and launcher for Minecraft.
◆ minetime : Smart scheduling assistant.
◆ mini-diary : Simple and secure journal app.
◆ mini-qml : Minimal Qt deployment.
◆ mini-vmac : A miniature Macintosh 68K emulator.
◆ minififa : OpenGL-powered third-person football, soccer game.
◆ minimal-podcasts-player : Subscribe, listen and download your podcasts.
◆ minions : A productive tool inspired by LaunchBar in macOS.
◆ minizinc-ide : A free and open-source constraint modeling language.
◆ mira-backup : Mira Auto Database Backup app.
◆ mirage : Matrix chat client for encrypted and decentralized communication.
◆ mission-center : Monitor your CPU, Memory, Disk, Network and GPU usage.
◆ miteiru : An open source Electron video player to learn Japanese.
◆ mjml-app : The desktop app for MJML.
◆ mk : Interactive Task Runner for Makefile.
◆ mki3dgame : A game of searching, in 3D stages.
◆ mkvtoolnix : Matroska files creator and tools.
◆ mlv-app : All in one MLV processing app, audio/video.
◆ mmapper : Graphical MUD client for the game MUME.
◆ mmseqs2-search : MMseqs2 app to run on your workstation or servers.
◆ moarperf : Front-end for MoarVM's / Rakudo's profilers.
◆ mob : A handsome Himalayan desktop client.
◆ mochi : A simple markdown-powered SRS app.
◆ mockman : Manage and start the mock servers on your local platform easily.
◆ mockoon : Mock servers in seconds.
◆ moderndeck : A beautiful, powerful Twitter client for desktop.
◆ modrinth : Open source launcher that allows you to play your favorite mods.
◆ modv : Modular audio visualisation powered by JavaScript.
◆ monit : Desktop widgets displaying various information, in chinese.
◆ moniteur-admin : The admin panel for the lightweight info screen solution.
◆ monokle : Lets you create, analyze, and deploy YAML manifests.
◆ monoline : Your personal micro journal.
◆ mood-fi : App with 30+ lo-fi live streams between 8 different lo-fi types.
◆ moolticute : Mooltipass crossplatform daemon/tools.
◆ moondeck-buddy : A server-side part of the MoonDeck plugin for the SteamDeck.
◆ moonlight : Stream games from your NVIDIA GameStream-enabled PC.
◆ moonplayer : AIO video player to play Youtube, Bilibili... and local videos.
◆ moose : An application to stream, cast and download torrents.
◆ moosync : Music player capable of playing local audio or from Youtube/Spotify.
◆ motrix : A full-featured download manager.
◆ mousai : Unofficial. Application for identifying songs using libre utilities.
◆ movie-monad : Free and simple to use video player made with Haskell.
◆ moyu : An online collaborative api interface management tool.
◆ mp3-tagger : An Electron app to edit metadata of mp3 files.
◆ mp4grep : CLI for transcribing and searching audio/video files.
◆ mpc-qt : Media Player Classic Qute Theater.
◆ mpv : Unofficial, A free, open source, and cross-platform media player, Multiple-choices.
◆ mqtt-explorer : Explore your message queues.
◆ mqttcute : An advanced desktop MQTT client for binary protocol development.
◆ mqttx : MQTT 5.0 Desktop, CLI, and WebSocket client tools.
◆ mr.dclutterer : Minimal App To Aggregate And Rename Files In Bulk.
◆ mrcode : An opinionated editor based on VSCodium / VSCode.
◆ mrrss : A modern, cross-platform, and free AI RSS reader.
◆ mrwriter : Notetaking and blackboard replacement application. Inspired by Xournal. Written in C++/Qt.
◆ ms-365-electron : Unofficial Microsoft 365 Desktop Wrapper made with Electron.
◆ mtcelledit : Lightweight spreadsheet program.
◆ mudita-center : Mudita Center Electron App.
◆ mudlet : Mudlet is a platform for gaming and enhancing game-play primarily with MUDs.
◆ muffon : Music streaming browser,retrieves audio, video and metadata.
◆ mullvad-browser : A Tor-based Web Browser.
◆ multimc : A Minecraft launcher.
◆ munt : The payment system of the future.
◆ mupdf : Lightweight PDF, XPS, and E-book viewer.
◆ muse : A digital audio workstation with support for both Audio and MIDI.
◆ museeks : A simple, clean and cross-platform music player.
◆ musescore : An open source and free music notation software.
◆ music-assistant : The desktop companion app for Music Assistant.
◆ music-blocks : .Exploring Math, Music, and Programming.
◆ music-kitten : Use your own soundtrack in Counter-Strike.
◆ music-player : Desktop Electron app for playing and downloading music.
◆ music-quiz : Jepardy like game, guess as many songs as possible.
◆ musicalypse : Audio/Music player and server built with Web technologies.
◆ mutool : All purpose tool for dealing with PDF files.
◆ muwire : A file sharing client for I2P.
◆ my-budget : Offline cross-platform budgeting solution built with Electron.
◆ my-jira : A lite jira desktop.
◆ mybelka : Accounting system written in C++ with QTCore.
◆ mycroft-ai : Qt5 Frontend for Mycroft Ai
◆ mycrypto : MyCrypto web and electron app.
◆ mypaint : Simple drawing and painting program, graphics.
◆ mystiq : Qt5/C++ FFmpeg Media Converter.
◆ mytonwallet : Feature-rich web wallet and browser extension for TON Network.
◆ n3h : Nodejs implementation of holochain networking / p2p backend process.
◆ naev : A 2d action/rpg space game that combines elements from the action.
◆ nami : A clean and tidy decentralized package manager.
◆ nanokvm-usb : Finger-sized 4K USB KVM for Server/SBCs.
◆ nanosaur : Pangea Software’s game, adventure of a cybernetic dinosaur.
◆ nanosaur2 : Pangea Software’s Nanosaur II for modern systems.
◆ nanovault : Wallet for interacting with Nano.
◆ nap : Code spippets in your terminal.
◆ naruto-arena : Naruto-based online multiplayer strategy game.
◆ nault-bin : Official Nault AppImage client.
◆ nauz-file-detector : Nauz File Detector is a portable linker/compiler/packer identifier utility.
◆ navi : An interactive cheatsheet tool for the command-line.
◆ nazuna : Download Twitter videos using your terminal!
◆ nblood : Blood port based on EDuke32.
◆ ncsa-mosaic : One of the first graphical web browsers.
◆ ncspot : Cross-platform ncurses Spotify client written in Rust, inspired by ncmpc and the likes.
◆ neanes : A scorewriter for notating Byzantine chant in Byzantine notation.
◆ neko : Neko is a cross-platform cursor-chasing cat.
◆ neohtop : htop on steroids.
◆ neon : Light wallet for NEO blockchain.
◆ neovide : No Nonsense Neovim Client in Rust
◆ nepaliunicode : An Unicode Converter app.
◆ nerdfetch : A POSIX *nix fetch script using Nerdfonts.
◆ nerimity-desktop : Electron desktop app for Nerimity.
◆ nest-desktop : A web-based GUI application for NEST Simulator.
◆ netbeans : Apache NetBeans installers.
◆ netpad : A cross-platform C# editor and playground.
◆ netpanzer : Online multiplayer tactical warfare game for fast action combat.
◆ newlogic : A circuit builder.
◆ newsflash : Unofficial. RSS reader with support for local and web RSS feed.
◆ newton-adventure : A 2D game with a twist, player can rotate gravity at 360°.
◆ nextcloud : Client-server software for creating & using file hosting services.
◆ nextplayer : A blue-ray player, originally named TheNewPlayerFree.
◆ nexus-mods : A mod installer, creator and manager for all your popular games.
◆ nexus-wallet : Official interface layers of the Nexus Software Stack.
◆ nfctools : A library which allows userspace application access to NFC devices.
◆ ngpost : Usenet poster for binaries developped in C++/QT.
◆ ngrev : Reverse Engineering for Angular.
◆ nheko : Desktop client for Matrix.
◆ niffler : A grin gui wallet.
◆ nightpdf : Dark Mode PDF Reader built using Electron and PDF.js.
◆ nightwave-plaza-electron : https://plaza.one/ radio station desktop app.
◆ nimbus-weather : A beautiful weather app built using the Dark Sky API.
◆ nitch : Incredibly fast system fetch written in nim.
◆ nitrokey : Manage your Nitrokey devices.
◆ nix-bucks : A money tracker. Your income and expenses at your control. Finance.
◆ nix-portable : Use nix on any linux system, rootless and configuration free.
◆ nixnote : Use with Evernote to remember everything.
◆ nmeasimulator : NMEA sentence generator utility to broadcast via TCP.
◆ nnn : n³ The unorthodox terminal file manager
◆ no-fwl : NoFWL Desktop Application.
◆ node : This is the official suite of Node.js tools, also known as "NodeJS", a JavaScript runtime built on Chrome's V8 JavaScript engine.
◆ nodeflow : An Editor for creating simple or complex OCR workflows.
◆ nodes : A new way to create with code.
◆ noi : 🚀 an AI-enhanced, customizable browser designed to streamline your digital experience.
◆ nomacs : Unofficial, nomacs is a free, open source image viewer, which supports multiple platforms.
◆ nootka : Application for learning musical score notation.
◆ nora : An elegant music player built using Electron and React.
◆ normcap : OCR powered screen-capture tool to capture info instead of images.
◆ nosqlbooster : Essential admin GUI for mongodb.
◆ notable : The Markdown-based note-taking app that doesn't suck.
◆ notedown : Note taking with react + rust.
◆ notekit : A GTK3 hierarchical markdown notetaking app with tablet support.
◆ notemaster : Note-taking app to help boost productivity.
◆ notepad++ : Unofficial Appimage of Notepad++, with WINE prefix.
◆ notepadnext : A cross-platform, reimplementation of Notepad++.
◆ noter : Simple serial terminal application.
◆ notes : Note-taking application, write down your thoughts.
◆ notes-nc : Cross-platform Notes desktop application for markdown notes.
◆ noteshrink-qt : GUI for noteshrink.py with preview and pre-processing opt.
◆ notesnook : Private note-taking app that encrypts everything on client side.
◆ novelwriter : Plain text editor designed for writing novels, supports a minimal markdown-like syntax for formatting text.
◆ npm : Package manager for Node.js. This script installs the full "node" suite.
◆ nrf-connect : Framework for desktop apps for development kits.
◆ nsz : Unofficial, Homebrew compatible NSP/XCI compressor/decompressor.
◆ nteract : An open-source organization.
◆ ntfydesktop : A desktop client for ntfy. Allows you to subscribe to topics from any ntfy server and recieve notifications natively on the desktop.
◆ ntsc-rs : Free, open-source VHS effect. Standalone application + plugin (After Effects, Premiere, and OpenFX).
◆ nu : A new type of shell.
◆ nuclear : Streaming music player that finds free music for you.
◆ nuclia : A low-code API to build an AI multi-language semantic search engine.
◆ nuclino : Bring knowledge, docs, and projects together in one place.
◆ nudelta : Open source NuPhy Console alternative.
◆ numara : Simple notepad calculator built on Electron.
◆ nunchuk : Desktop bitcoin wallet with multisig, hardware, nfc and air-gapped key support.
◆ nvim : NeoVim, Vim fork focused on extensibility and usability.
◆ nvim-nightly : NeoVim, Vim fork, the most recent development build.
◆ nvtop : GPUs process monitoring for AMD, Intel and NVIDIA.
◆ nx-software-center : A GUI to install and manage AppImages, Nitrux OS.
◆ nxshell : An easy to use new terminal.
◆ nyaa : A nyaa.si tui tool for browsing and downloading torrents.
◆ nyan : CLI, colored "cat" command.
◆ nychess : A python Chess Engine and AI.
◆ nym-vpn : Cross-platform open source VPN client built in Rust, with mixnet anonymity and WireGuard speed. Protects metadata, not just IP addresses. Zero-knowledge payments for unlinkable online activities.
◆ nym-wallet : Use the Nym network and take advantage of it.
◆ nyrna : Suspend games and applications.
◆ obliqoro : A cross-platform tauri gui where Oblique Strategies meets Pomodoro.
◆ oblivion-desktop : Unofficial Warp Client, Oblivion provides a secure, optimised internet access.
◆ obs-studio : Unofficial. Software for video recording and live streaming.
◆ obsidian : A powerful knowledge base, plain text Markdown files.
◆ obsidian-cli : Interact with Obsidian in the terminal. Open, search, create, update, move and delete notes!
◆ obsidianirc : Modern IRC Client for the web, desktop and mobile.
◆ ocat : OpenCore Auxiliary Tools, editing config.plist files for Acidanthera.
◆ ocenaudio : Unofficial. Multiplatform Audio Editor.
◆ ocvvid2fulldome : Take flat videos, distort them to fit fulldome.
◆ ocvwarp : Warping images and videos for planetarium fulldome display.
◆ odicto : An offline English dictionary app for desktop.
◆ oh : A new Unix shell.
◆ oh-mymd : A markdown editor,support cloud sync.
◆ okteta : Unofficial. Hex editor for viewing and editing the raw data of files.
◆ olive : Free open-source non-linear video editor, nightly build.
◆ olive-legacy : Free non-linear video editor, version 0.1.
◆ ollama : Get up and running with Llama 3, Mistral, Gemma, and other LLMs.
◆ omekasy : Command line application that converts alphanumeric characters to various styles 𝚍𝚎𝚏𝚒𝚗𝚎𝚍 𝚒𝚗 𝚄𝚗𝚒𝚌𝚘𝚍𝚎.
◆ ommpfritt : Semantic, procedural, non-destructive vector modelling.
◆ omnipull : Pull Everything. Everywhere. OmniPull is a powerful, cross-platform download manager.
◆ omnispeak : Re-implementation of "Commander Keen in Goodbye Galaxy".
◆ one-gpt : Aggregate ChatGPT official version, Wenxin Yiyan, Poe, chatchat.
◆ oneanime : A clean, ad-free anime viewing app. A third-party client for Anime1 with subtitles and a Material You-compliant interface.
◆ onedrive-gui : Microsoft OneDrive Client GUI.
◆ onefetch : Command-line Git information tool.
◆ onekey-wallet : Open source crypto wallet.
◆ onenote : P3X Onenote Linux.
◆ oneweb : OneWeb - free, private and secure web browser! POLSKA GUROM.
◆ onionmediax : OnionMedia X. Convert and download videos and music quickly and easily.
◆ onlyoffice : Office Suite with full support for MS Windows formats and cloud.
◆ onlyrefs : Organize all of your references, notes, bookmarks and more.
◆ onnx2bnn : Binary neural networks inference framework for mobile platform.
◆ onnx2daq : Wrapper of NNAPI, "DNNLibrary" is for "daquexian's NNAPI libs.
◆ onshape : Onshape desktop app, web application shell.
◆ onthespot : A GUI music downloader for Apple Music, Bandcamp, Deezer, Qobuz, Spotify, Tidal, and More.
◆ onyx : Decentralized messaging application based on PSS.
◆ opal : Plays relaxing music in the background.
◆ open-ai-translator : Browser extension for translation based on ChatGPT API.
◆ open-markup-editor : Pluggable markup editor.
◆ open-typer : A free and open source typing tutor program.
◆ open-video-downloader : A cross-platform GUI for youtube-dl made in Electron.
◆ openapi-tui : Terminal UI to list, browse and run APIs defined with openapi.
◆ openarena : Violent & sexy, multiplayer first person shooter game, ioquake3.
◆ openaudible : Download and manage your Audible audiobooks.
◆ openblok : A customizable falling block puzzle game like tetris.
◆ openbor : Ultimate 2D side scrolling engine for beat em ups, shooters...
◆ openclaw : Reimplementation of Captain Claw (1997) platformer.
◆ opencloud : Desktop application to synchronize files from OpenCloud with your computer.
◆ opencode : Unofficial, The open source coding agent.
◆ opencomic : Comic and Manga reader, written with Node.js and using Electron.
◆ openhv : A mod for OpenRA based on the Hard Vacuum, game.
◆ openjazz : A free, open-source version of the classic Jazz Jackrabbit™ games.
◆ openlara : Classic Tomb Raider open-source engine.
◆ openlens : OpenLens Binary Build Repository.
◆ openlibextended : An Open source app to download and read books from shadow library (Anna’s Archive).
◆ openmw : OpenMW is an open-source open-world RPG game engine that supports playing Morrowind.
◆ openop2 : Re-implementation of the game Outpost 2, using the OpenRA engine.
◆ openosrs-launcher : Open-source client for Old School RuneScape.
◆ openpilot-workbench : Fix problems with EON/Openpilot.
◆ openra-dune : Real-time strategy game engine, MOD Dune 2000.
◆ openra-red-alert : Real-time strategy game engine, MOD Red Alert.
◆ openra-tiberian-dawn : Real-time strategy game engine penGL, MOD TD.
◆ openramodsdk : Dev Kit for building your own games using the OpenRA engine.
◆ openrct2 : Re-implementation of RollerCoaster Tycoon 2 (RCT2), expanding the game with new features.
◆ openrgb : RGB lighting control that doesn't depend on manufacturer software.
◆ openscad : The Programmers Solid 3D CAD Modeller.
◆ openscreen : Create stunning screen recordings for free. Open-source, no subscriptions, no watermarks, and free for commercial use. An alternative to Screen Studio.
◆ openshot : A powerful Video Editor.
◆ openstream-music : The OpenStream Music source.
◆ openterface-qt : Openterface Mini-KVM.
◆ opentodolist : A note and task managing application.
◆ opentrons : Opentrons desktop application.
◆ opentyrian2000 : An open-source port of the DOS shoot-em-up Tyrian.
◆ openxcom : Open-source clone of the original UFO: Enemy Unknown licensed under the GPL and written in C++ / SDL.
◆ openxcom-extended : OXCE, extended version of openXcom provide better mod support, QoL improvements, new game mechanics, improved and new GUIs.
◆ opera : Unofficial. Fast and secure web browser, Stable version.
◆ opera-beta : Unofficial. Fast and secure web browser, Beta version.
◆ opera-dev : Unofficial. Fast and secure web browser, Developer version.
◆ orange : Cross-platform local file search engine.
◆ oras : OCI registry client managing content like artifacts, images, packages.
◆ orca-note : A note taking application that is good both for outlining and long-form writing.
◆ orcaslicer : G-code generator for 3D printers, Stable release.
◆ orcaslicer-any : G-code generator for 3D printers, the most recent release.
◆ orcaslicer-beta : G-code generator for 3D printers, Beta release.
◆ orcaslicer-rc : G-code generator for 3D printers, Release Candidate.
◆ osrs-tools : Several tools for OSRS.
◆ ossia-score : Sequencer for audio-visual artists for interactive shows.
◆ ostara : To monitor and interact with Spring Boot Applications via Actuator.
◆ osu : A free-to-win rhythm game. Rhythm is just a click away!
◆ ots : Share end-to-end encrypted secrets with others via a one-time URL.
◆ ottomatic : Pangea Software’s Otto Matic, a game of robots.
◆ outer-wilds-mod-manager : The mod manager for the Outer Wilds Mod Loader
◆ outline-client : Lean on the Cordova and Electron frameworks.
◆ outline-manager : Create and manage access to Outline servers.
◆ overbind : A utility that allows binding keyboard buttons to virtual Xbox360 controller joystick outputs.
◆ overlayed : A modern, open-source, and free voice chat overlay for Discord.
◆ oversteer : Unofficial, Steering Wheel Manager for Linux.
◆ overte : Overte open source virtual worlds platform.
◆ ovideo : Video Editor.
◆ ow-mod-man : The mod manager for the Outer Wilds Mod Loader.
◆ owallet : A comprehensive Ontology desktop wallet.
◆ owncloud : Desktop Syncing Client for ownCloud. ownCloud, a Kiteworks Company, offers file sharing and collaboration trusted by 200+ million users worldwide regardless of device or location.
◆ owte : Anime girl dancing on your screen.
◆ oxen-gui-wallet : Oxen electron GUI wallet.
◆ p2p-chat : P2P LAN chatting and file sharing tool.
◆ p2pderivatives : Enables users to enter into Discreet Log Contracts.
◆ p3x-redis-ui : A very functional handy database GUI and works in your pocket.
◆ packetsender : Network utility for sending/receiving TCP/UDP/SSL/HTTP.
◆ packsquash : A Minecraft Java Edition resource and data pack optimizer.
◆ paclear : CLI, paclear is a clear command with PAC-MAN animation.
◆ padloc : Electron Wrapper for Padloc app.
◆ pageedit : EPub XHTML Visual Editor.
◆ painel-web : Novo SGA panel.
◆ paket : A simple and fast package manager for the Fish shell written in Rust.
◆ palapeli : Jigsaw puzzle game. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ palemoon : Web browser, a Firefox fork with a classic UI and modern APIs.
◆ panini : Perspective views from panoramic images.
◆ pano-scrobbler : Feature packed cross-platform music tracker for Last.fm, ListenBrainz, Libre.fm, Pleroma and other compatible services.
◆ panwriter : Markdown editor with pandoc integration.
◆ paper : A CLI Tool to set a random wallpaper from Unsplash.com.
◆ papercraft : A tool to unwrap 3D models.
◆ paperlib : An open-source academic paper management tool.
◆ parallelcoin : Parallelcoin qt wallet appimage binary.
◆ parchment : A minimal minimal text editor written using web technologies.
◆ parity-fether : Fether Wallet.
◆ parsec : Open source Dropbox-like file sharing with full client encryption.
◆ parsec-linux : Parsec game streaming client.
◆ passky : Simple and secure password manager.
◆ passphraser : Phrase-based password generator that can use your own list of words.
◆ pastel : A command-line tool to generate, analyze, convert and manipulate colors.
◆ patchbay : An alt. Secure Scuttlebutt client compatible with Patchwork.
◆ patchelf : Utility to modify the dynamic linker and RPATH of ELF executables.
◆ patchwork : Messaging and sharing app built on top of Secure Scuttlebutt.
◆ pathephone : Distributed audio player.
◆ pavo : A mini desktop wallpaper application.
◆ pavucontrol-qt : Qt port of pavucontrol Pulseaudio mixer, unofficial AppImage.
◆ pay-respects : Terminal command correction, alternative to thefuck written in Rust.
◆ pb-for-desktop : Pushbullet Desktop app.
◆ pboy : A small .pdf management tool with a command-line UI.
◆ pcexhumed : Port of the PC version of Exhumed based on EDuke32.
◆ pcloud : pCloud Drive Client, cloud service, built using electron and node.js.
◆ pcsx2 : The Playstation 2 Emulator.
◆ pdf-diff : A CLI tool for visualizing differences between two pdf files.
◆ pdf-sync : PDF Reader in JavaScript with Sync.
◆ pdf2htmlex : Convert PDF to HTML without losing text or format.
◆ pdf4qt : Open source PDF editor.
◆ pdfcompress : A utility to compress PDF documentas based on Ghostscript and YAD.
◆ pdfcrackgui : GUI overlay for the popular and highly regarded pdfcrack.
◆ pdfquirk : Creating PDFs from images or scanner made easy.
◆ pdmaner : A relational database modeling tool.
◆ peazip : Unofficial. PeaZip Appimage for linux 64bits.
◆ peep : The CLI text viewer tool that works like less command on small pane within the terminal window.
◆ pelusica : Action game, control the blue dot with your keyboard/create music.
◆ pencil : Pencil2D is an easy, intuitive tool to make 2D hand-drawn animations.
◆ penguins-eggs : A professional and universal remastering tool for all major distributions.
◆ pennywise : Open any website or media in a floating window.
◆ perl-executing-browser : HTML5 user interface for Perl 5 desktop apps.
◆ permastead : Desktop software for managing a homestead using permaculture design.
◆ perplexity-ai-app : Perplexity AI Desktop app eases the process to access Perplexity AI.
◆ pet : Simple command-line snippet manager.
◆ pext : Python-based extendable tool.
◆ pfetch-rs : A rewrite of the pfetch system information tool in Rust.
◆ pget : The fastest, resumable file download CLI client.
◆ phinch : Phinch is a framework for visualizing biological data.
◆ pho : The AppImage Manager that Linux always deserved.
◆ phoenix-x-server : Unofficial, a new X server, written from scratch in Zig (not a fork). Designed to be a modern alternative to the Xorg server.
◆ photocrea : Unofficial Photopea wrapper, image editor that includes all the familiar features like layers, filters, magic wand selection, etc.
◆ photoflare : A simple but featureful image editor.
◆ photoflow : Edit images from digital cameras.
◆ photogimp : A patched version of GIMP for Adobe Photoshop users.
◆ photon : Cross-platform file-transfer application built using flutter. It uses http to transfer files between devices.
◆ photoname : Rename photo image files based on EXIF shoot date.
◆ photopealoader : Photopea desktop app that loads local files and plugins.
◆ photoqt : View and manage images.
◆ photoquick : Light-weight image viewer, resize, collage, filters....
◆ phreshplayer : Electron based media player app.
◆ pia : Version Portable Outil PIA.
◆ picacg-qt : PicACG Comic PC Client For Linux.
◆ picard-daily : Inofficial daily development builds for MusicBrainz Picard.
◆ picgo : Easy to upload your pic & copy to write.
◆ piclist : Cloud storage platform management & file upload tool based on PicGo.
◆ picmi : Single player logic-based puzzle game. This script installs the full "kdegames" suite.
◆ picocrypt : A very small, very simple, yet very secure encryption tool.
◆ picocrypt-ng : A very small, very simple, yet very secure encryption tool.
◆ picsimlab : PICsimLab - Programmable IC Simulator Laboratory.
◆ picterm : CLI, TUI image viewer.
◆ picturama : Digital image organizer powered by the web.
◆ pigs-n-cows : A relaxing game for children and adults alike.
◆ pika-backup : Doing backups the easy way. Plugin your USB drive and let the Pika do the rest for you.
◆ pikapika : A comic browser.
◆ pile : App to organize your piled work at one place.
◆ pince : Reverse engineering tool for linux games.
◆ pingendo : ???
◆ pingnoo : An open source network ping analyser.
◆ pingu : CLI, ping command but with pingu.
◆ pingviewer : Ping viewer interface.
◆ pinokio : AI Browser.
◆ pinta : Unofficial, Simple GTK Paint Program clone of Paint.Net 3.0.
◆ pinta-dev : Simple GTK Paint Program (developer edition).
◆ pipes-rs : An over-engineered rewrite of pipes.sh in Rust. CLI.
◆ pixelhopper : Animated GIF player for Linux (X11).
◆ pixelorama : A powerful and accessible open-source pixel art multitool. Whether you want to create sprites, tiles, animations, or just express yourself in the language of pixel art.
◆ pixfetch : Another CLI fetch program with pixelized images written in Rust.
◆ pixsrt : Pixel sorter.
◆ pizarra : A digital, vectorial and infinite chalkboard.
◆ pkg2appimage : Utility to convert .yml recipes to AppDir, see appimagetool.
◆ plagpatrol : Detecting documents tampered to bypass plagiarism detectors.
◆ planes : Variant of battleships game.
◆ planet-blupi : A delirious spell-binding game.
◆ platform-tools : Official Suite of command line utilities to manage Android devices.
◆ platinum-md : Graphical MiniDisc NetMD conversion and upload.
◆ play-2048 : Another implementation of the 2048 game.
◆ playback : Play and manage your cartridges and replay your childhood games.
◆ playbox : An audio playback system for the live production industry.
◆ playerctl : Unofficial, MPRIS media player command-line controller.
◆ playit : Want to run an online game server? playit.gg is a global proxy that allows anyone to host a server without port forwarding.
◆ playme : Elegant YouTube Music desktop app.
◆ playyourdamnturn : Desktop Client to assist with playing your damn turns.
◆ plebchan : A GUI for plebbit similar to 4chan.
◆ plex : The ultimate home theater experience.
◆ plexamp : The best little audio player on the planet.
◆ plotjuggler : The Time Series Visualization Tool that you deserve.
◆ plotly-orca : CLI generating static images of interactive charts.
◆ plover : Stenographic input and translation.
◆ plume : A note-taking app written in Qt C++ and QML.
◆ png2svg : CLI, convert small PNG images to SVG Tiny 1.2.
◆ pnpm : A single file, powered by AppImage.
◆ pocket-browser : A FOSS browser made for privacy and going towards security.
◆ pocketcasts-electron : Pocket Casts wrapper with mapped media keys.
◆ poddr : Podcast client that uses iTunes RSS feeds and Search API.
◆ podium : A Markdown-based native presentation tool.
◆ podman : Free & open source tool to manage containers, pods, and images.
◆ podman-desktop-companion : Podman command line interface.
◆ poe-ladder : Path of Exile ladder viewer.
◆ poedit : Unofficial. Powerful and intuitive translation editor.
◆ pog : A Kmk firmware flashing and configuration tool.
◆ poi : Scalable KanColle browser and tool.
◆ pointless : An endless drawing canvas desktop app made with Tauri (Rust) and React.
◆ pokeclicker : PokéClicker with quality of life changes.
◆ pokeget-rs : A better rust version of pokeget. CLI.
◆ pokego : Command-line tool that lets you display Pokémon sprites in color directly in your terminal.
◆ pokete : A terminal based Pokemon like game.
◆ polar : One-click Bitcoin Lightning networks for local app development.
◆ polkakey : A secure way to generate Polkadot/Kusama/Edgeware address.
◆ polybar : Unofficial AppImage of polybar. A fast easy-to-use status bar.
◆ polypane : Browser for web developers.
◆ pomatez : Stay Focused. Take a Break.
◆ pomodorolm : A simple, good looking and multi-platform pomodoro tracker.
◆ pomotroid : Simple and visually-pleasing Pomodoro timer.
◆ pop : Send emails from your terminal.
◆ popsicle : Multiple USB File Flasher.
◆ positron : Manage your movie and show watchlist.
◆ postcat : An extensible API tool.
◆ postman : API platform for building and using APIs, AppImage.
◆ postybirb : Multimedia crossposter for multimedia websites.
◆ postybirb-plus : Helps artists post art to multiple websites more quickly.
◆ pot-desktop : A cross-platform software for text translation and recognition.
◆ potatopresenter : Create presentation slides and exported as PDF.
◆ powder-toy : AppImage build of The Powder Toy built from source.
◆ powerliminals-player : Powerliminal audios in the background, Audio player.
◆ powershell : Microsoft PowerShell.
◆ ppet3 : Put a cute girl on your desk for more fun.
◆ ppsspp : PSP emulator written in C++.
◆ pragtical : The practical and pragmatic code editor.
◆ pretty-handy-privacy : User interface for basic encryption tasks.
◆ primate : A modern dashboard for Kong Gateway admins.
◆ prime-world-editor : Edit world assets from games by Retro Studios.
◆ principia : Open source physics-based sandbox game.
◆ printerclient : A printer client.
◆ printventory : The ultimate tool for managing your 3D printing collection with ease. Sort, tag, and track your models in one place.
◆ prisma-studio : The easiest way to explore and manipulate your data.
◆ prismlauncher : Launcher for Minecraft, manage multiple installations.
◆ prismlauncher-qt5 : Launcher for Minecraft, manage multiple installations (Qt5 version).
◆ privacy.sexy : Tool to enforce privacy & security best-practices.
◆ privaxy : The next generation tracker and ads/advertisement blocker.
◆ probe-desktop : The next generation OONI Probe desktop app.
◆ procdepmonitor : Obtaining information about loaded process dependencies.
◆ procs : A modern replacement for ps written in Rust.
◆ procspin : CLI to create a process/progress animation with text.
◆ procyon : Note Keeper.
◆ programmer-browser : A fast-searching and space-saving browser specially designed for programmers.
◆ promethium : Extensible and innovative web browser with built-in AdBlock.
◆ proofkeeper : Desktop tool to automate proof management.
◆ prospect-mail : An Outlook mail desktop client powered by Electron.
◆ protocol_10 : A mod decompiler for frosty tool suite.
◆ protoman : A Postman-like API client for protobuf-based messages.
◆ protonmail-desktop : Unofficial Electron wrapper for ProtonMail.
◆ protonup-qt : Manage Proton-GE/Luxtorpeda for Steam/Wine-GE for Lutris.
◆ proxy-master : Set and reset your proxy settings EVERYWHERE.
◆ proxyman : Modern and Delightful HTTP Debugging Proxy.
◆ proxypal : A desktop app that lets you use your AI subscriptions (Claude, ChatGPT, Gemini, GitHub Copilot) with any coding tool. Wraps CLIProxyAPI with a clean UI for managing connections and tracking usage.
◆ prusa-slicer : Prusa3d/PrusaSlicer, G-code generator for 3D printers.
◆ psi+ : Communicate over the XMPP network.
◆ pstube : Watch and download videos without ads.
◆ psydoom : A backport of PSX Doom to PC.
◆ publii : A desktop-based CMS that makes creating static websites fast.
◆ puddletag : Unofficial, Powerful, simple, audio tag editor for GNU/Linux.
◆ pullp : Pull request monitoring app for Github.
◆ pulsar : A Community-led Hyper-Hackable Text Editor.
◆ pulse : Pulse desktop client.
◆ pulseview : PulseView (sometimes abbreviated as "PV") is a Qt based logic analyzer, oscilloscope and MSO GUI for sigrok.
◆ punes : Qt-based Nintendo Entertaiment System emulator and NSF/NSF2/NSFe Music Player.
◆ puppetry : Solution for non-developers on top of Puppeteer and Jest.
◆ pureref : All your reference images in one place.
◆ puush-qt : A GUI frontend for puush on Linux.
◆ pyappimage : Simple appimage builder for Python applications.
◆ pycharm : Unofficial, PyCharm-community-edition in AppImage.
◆ pyfa : EVE Online Fitting Assistant.
◆ pyglossary : Unofficial, A tool for converting dictionary files aka glossaries.
◆ python : AppImage distributions of Python, an interactive high-level object-oriented language.
◆ qaddapp : Qt5 Gui app that helps you add AppImages and binary archives into your Desktop environment.
◆ qarma : Unofficial, Qarma is a tool to create dialog boxes, based on Qt. It's a clone of Zenity.
◆ qaterialgallery : Demonstrate Qaterial library.
◆ qaterialhotreload : Qml HotReload software.
◆ qawl : Read the Holy Qur’ān whenever, wherever, however you like.
◆ qbittorrent : A powerful QT-based Bittorrent Client, official AppImage.
◆ qbittorrent-enhanced : Unofficial qBittorrent Enhanced, based on qBittorrent.
◆ qdiskinfo : QDiskInfo is a frontend for smartctl. It provides a user experience similar to CrystalDiskInfo.
◆ qdriverstation : Cross-platform clone of the FRC Driver Station.
◆ qelectrotech : Edit electrical diagrams.
◆ qemu-appimage : Unofficial. Prove of the concept to run a virtual machine from Appimage.
◆ qemu-ppc : Run PowerPC operating systems on 64-bit Intel Linux hosts.
◆ qflipper : Flipper Zero multitool for pentesters and geeks in a toy-like body.
◆ qfsm : Qt Finite State Machine Designer.
◆ qgroundcontrol : Ground control for unmanned vehicles.
◆ qikqr : Minimal desktop app to create QR codes.
◆ qimgv : Unofficial, Image viewer. Fast, easy to use. Optional video support.
◆ qmasterpassword : A password manager based on Qt.
◆ qmediathekview : An alternative front-end to the MediathekView database.
◆ qmidictl : MIDI Remote Controller via UDP/IP Multicast.
◆ qmidinet : MIDI Network Gateway via UDP/IP Multicast.
◆ qmplay2 : Video and audio player whit support of most formats and codecs.
◆ qnapi : Qt-based, multi-engine, multi-platform subtitle downloader.
◆ qortal-ui : Decentralize the world, data storage, communications.
◆ qownnotes : Plain text notepad and todo list manager.
◆ qpdf : CLI tool to perform content-preserving transformations on PDF files.
◆ qppcad : Molecule and crystal editor written in c++
◆ qprompt : Personal teleprompter software for all video creators.
◆ qr-code-generator : Create custom QR Codes, resize, save them as PNG image.
◆ qradiolink : Multimode SDR transceiver for GNU radio.
◆ qrop : Crop planning and recordkeeping software.
◆ qrscan : Scan a QR code in the terminal using the system camera or an image.
◆ qsdrswr : Qt SWR analyser using an SDR and soapy_power.
◆ qt-dab : Listening to terrestrial Digital Audio Broadcasting.
◆ qt-raster-lines : Lines between points using rasterization, DDA, Bresenham.
◆ qtads : A cross-platform, multimedia interpreter for TADS adventure games.
◆ qtalarm : Alarm clock for Computers.
◆ qtchan : 4chan browser in qt5.
◆ qtjsondiff : Json difference checker widget and viewer.
◆ qtox : Qt 5 based Tox instant messenger for secure communication.
◆ qtrfpowermeter : Improve usage of chinese RF power meter RF8000.
◆ quamodbusclient : Modbus to OPC UA Gateway
◆ quark : Sketchbook for rapid prototyping and development of your projects.
◆ quark-player : An Electron based Web Video Services Player.
◆ quarto-cli : Scientific and technical publishing system built on Pandoc.
◆ quaternion : A Qt5-based IM client for Matrix.
◆ quba : A viewer for electronic invoices.
◆ qucs-s : An Universal GUI for Circuit Simulators.
◆ quentier : Note taking app integrated with Evernote.
◆ quick-clone : Search through gitlab and clone git-repositories.
◆ quickgui : An elegant virtual machine manager for the desktop.
◆ quicknote : QuickNote helps to paste some random text or take some notes right from your taskbar!
◆ quickredis : A free Redis Desktop manager.
◆ quicktwitch : Electron React Redux Boilerplate.
◆ quickviewer : A image viewer application for folders/archives.
◆ quiet : A private, p2p alternative to Slack and Discord built on Tor & IPFS
◆ quokkagit : A small, TortoiseGit inspired git log viewer for linux.
◆ quran-companion : Free and open-source desktop Quran reader and player.
◆ qv2ray : Cross-platform v2ray GUI Client in Qt.
◆ qview : Practical and minimal image viewer.
◆ qxgedit : QXGEdit is a Qt GUI XG editor application.
◆ r2modman : Mod manager for several Unity games using Thunderstore.
◆ r3play : High-value third-party Netease cloud player, chinese.
◆ rabix-composer : A desktop IDE for working with Common Workflow Language.
◆ radioit : Automation software for Radios.
◆ radix-wallet : Radix DLT desktop wallet.
◆ rainbow-board : 22nd Century Whiteboard App.
◆ rambox : Free and Open Source messaging and emailing app.
◆ rapidraw : A beautiful, non-destructive, and GPU-accelerated RAW image editor built with performance in mind.
◆ rare : GUI for legendary. An Epic Games Launcher open source alternative.
◆ raspberry-pi-imager : The home of Raspberry Pi Imager, a user-friendly tool for creating bootable media for Raspberry Pi devices. Desktop edition.
◆ raspberry-pi-imager-cli : The home of Raspberry Pi Imager, a user-friendly tool for creating bootable media for Raspberry Pi devices. CLI edition.
◆ raspirus : A user and resources-friendly signatures-based malware scanner.
◆ rasterdraw : Simple shape drawn using rasterisation.
◆ rasterview : Raster Viewer for CUPS-Raster, Apple-Raster and PWG-Raster.
◆ rats-search : P2P BitTorrent search engine.
◆ raven-reader : Simple Desktop RSS Reader made using VueJS.
◆ rawtherapee : An advanced raw photo development program.
◆ rbdl-toolkit : Application for visualizing and working with rbdl models.
◆ rbdoom-3 : Doom 3 BFG Edition source port with updated DX12/Vulkan renderer.
◆ rbw : Unofficial Bitwarden password manager cli.
◆ rclone : "rsync for cloud storage", CLI that supports Google Drive, S3, Dropbox, Backblaze B2, One Drive, Swift, Hubic, Wasabi, Google Cloud Storage, Azure Blob, Azure Files, Yandex Files.
◆ rclone-browser : Simple cross platform GUI for rclone.
◆ rclone-gui-manager : A simple, modern graphical user interface for managing rclone remotes for Linux.
◆ rclone-ui : The cross-platform desktop GUI for rclone & S3.
◆ rcloneview : The ultimate GUI for Cloud Data Sync and File Management. Effortlessly browse, organize, transfer files across your cloud storages.
◆ reactotron : Reactotron desktop mode engage.
◆ readest : Readest is a modern, feature-rich ebook reader designed for avid readers offering seamless cross-platform access, powerful tools, and an intuitive interface to elevate your reading experience.
◆ real-video-enhancer : Interpolate and Upscale easily.
◆ realm-studio : A tool for everything Realm.
◆ reaper : A complete digital audio production app, offering a full multitrack audio and MIDI recording, editing, processing, mixing and mastering toolset.
◆ rebaslight : An easy to use special effects video editor.
◆ rebos : Rebos is a tool that aims at mimicking what NixOS does (repeatability), for any Linux distribution.
◆ reco : Unofficial, An audio recorder focused on being concise and simple to use
◆ recoll : Full-text search for your desktop.
◆ record-compare : Record Compare.
◆ recordscript : Cross-platform screen recorder, transcript, subtitle.
◆ redact : Application to mass delete your account posts from different social media.
◆ redeclipse : A great first person 3D arena shooter with online support, game.
◆ redis-gui : Modern graphical user interface to peek into redis DB.
◆ redis-viewer : A Redis visualization client tool.
◆ rednukem : A port of serveral BUILD Engine games based on EDuke32.
◆ rehex : Reverse Engineers' Hex Editor.
◆ remind-me-again : Toggleable cron reminders app.
◆ remnote : Make flashcards in your notes. Cut study time in half. Use evidence-based memory techniques to create flashcards that resurface at the best time for retention.
◆ rendertune : Electron app that uses ffmpeg to combine audio.+image files into video files.
◆ reor : AI note-taking app that runs models locally.
◆ repath-studio : A cross-platform vector graphics editor.
◆ repetier-host : Repetier-Host is a 3D printing application developed by Hot-World GmbH & Co. KG.
◆ reqable : Advanced API Debugging Proxy and REST Client.
◆ requestly : Free and open-source API Client & Interceptor.
◆ responsively : A browser for developing responsive web apps.
◆ retroarch : Frontend for emulators, game engines and media players.
◆ retrom : A centralized game library/collection management service with a focus on emulation.
◆ retroshare : Securely share files with your friends.
◆ revealgo : Markdown driven presentation tool written in Go!
◆ revolt : Revolt Desktop App.
◆ rewaita : Unofficial, rewaita gives your Adwaita apps a fresh look by tinting them with popular color schemes.
◆ rhb : Rapid HTML Builder/Prototyper.
◆ rhythmbox : The popular Audio Player Rhythmbox.
◆ ricochet : Anonymous peer-to-peer instant messaging.
◆ ricochlime : Satisfying slime shooter.
◆ ridereceipts : Automation app to download and organize your tax invoices.
◆ rigelengine : Modern re-implementation of DOS game Duke Nukem II.
◆ rimage : This is CLI tool inspired by squoosh.
◆ ripcord : Chat client for group-centric services like Slack and Discord.
◆ ripes : Graphical processor simulator and assembly editor for the RISC-V ISA.
◆ ripgrep : Search directories for regex pattern while respecting gitignore.
◆ ripgrep-all : A ripgrep version to also search in documents and archives.
◆ riseup-vpn : Unofficial, RiseupVPN is an easy, fast, and secure VPN service from riseup.net.
◆ rmg : Rosalie's Mupen GUI.
◆ rmg-enhanced : Unofficial AppImage of RMG N64 emulator wtih x86-64-v3 optimizations and smaller size.
◆ rmw : A safe-remove utility for the command line.
◆ rnote : Unofficial, Rnote is a vector-based drawing app for sketching, handwritten notes and to annotate documents and pictures.
◆ roborock-control-center : Control Your Xiaomi Vacuum.
◆ robrix : A multi-platform Matrix chat client written in Rust, using the Makepad UI toolkit and the Robius app dev framework.
◆ rock.so : Messaging + Tasks.
◆ rocketfetch : A WIP command line system information tool written with multithreading in rust for performance with toml file configuration.
◆ rofi : Unofficial, A window switcher, runs dialogs, dmenu like, etc.
◆ roller : Reverse engineering the 1995 game Whiplash/Fatal Racing.
◆ roloviewer : Image slideshow viewer.
◆ root : Voice, video, and chat plus powerful apps that help your community organize, grow, and thrive. An alternative to Discord.
◆ rotki : A portfolio tracking, asset analytics and tax reporting app.
◆ rpan-studio : OBS Studio with RPAN integration.
◆ rpcs3 : An open-source PlayStation 3 emulator/debugger written in C++.
◆ rquickshare : Rust implementation of NearbyShare/QuickShare from Android.
◆ rrip : Bulk image downloader for reddit.
◆ rsdkv3 : A Full Decompilation of Sonic CD (2011) & Retro Engine v3.
◆ rsdkv4 : A complete decompilation of Sonic 1 & Sonic 2 (2013) & Retro Engine v4.
◆ rssguard : Feed reader which supports RSS/ATOM/JSON, no-webengine version.
◆ rstudio : RStudio is an integrated development environment, IDE for R.
◆ rtneuron : Framework for geometrically detailed neuron simulations.
◆ rubikscube : Rubik's cube in OpenGL.
◆ rucola : Terminal-based markdown note manager.
◆ ruffle : A Flash Player emulator written in Rust.
◆ runanode : Lets run a node.
◆ runelite : Open source Old School RuneScape client.
◆ runjs : JavaScript playground. Write code with Node.js & browser APIs access.
◆ running-dinner-tool : Running Dinner Tool.
◆ rustdesk : Virtual/remote desktop infrastructure, like TeamViewer/Citrix.
◆ rustdict : A dictionary CLI tool in Rust inspired by BetaPictoris's dict.
◆ rusty-rain : CLI, a cross platform matrix rain made with Rust.
◆ rustypaste : A minimal file upload/pastebin service.
◆ rx-bin : A modern and extensible pixel editor implemented in Rust.
◆ ryowallet : Modern GUI interface for Ryo Currency.
◆ ryujinx : An open-source Nintendo Switch emulator, originally created by gdkchan, written in C#.
◆ ryujinx-canary : An open-source Nintendo Switch emulator, originally created by gdkchan, written in C# (Canary builds).
◆ s : Open a web search in your terminal.
◆ s3drive : Convert S3, SFTP, WebDAV or Rclone back-end into your encrypted storage.
◆ sabaki : Modern, elegant, cross-platform Go/Baduk/Weiqi game board.
◆ saber : A work-in-progress cross-platform libre handwritten notes app.
◆ safe-multisig : Allowing crypto users manage funds in a safer way.
◆ samira : Steam achievement manager for Linux written with Tauri and Rust.
◆ samrewritten : Steam Achievement Manager For Linux. Rewritten in C++.
◆ sanicball : An extraordinarily fast racing game.
◆ saphyr : A C++ like compiler.
◆ sas : Tool to sandbox AppImages with bubblewrap easily.
◆ sat : Simple AppImage thumbnailer in POSIX shell
◆ satisfactory : Satisfactory Mod Manager.
◆ satty : Modern Screenshot Annotation.
◆ saucedacity : Audio editor based on Audacity focusing on general improvements.
◆ savvycan : Facilitates reverse engineering of canbus captures.
◆ sayonara : Music player and music library admininstration.
◆ sbe : An unofficial Scrapbox desktop app.
◆ sblauncher : Minecraft Launcher.
◆ sc-controller : User-mode driver and GTK3 based GUI for Steam Controller.
◆ scatter : Scatter desktop signature server.
◆ scavengers : Unity Roguelike tutorial, game.
◆ schildi-revenge : Matrix client for desktop written in Kotlin and using the Matrix Rust SDK.
◆ school-sections : This project was generated with Angular CLI v1.7.4.
◆ scilab : Scientific software package for numerical computations.
◆ sciqlop : SciQLop is an ergonomic and efficient application to browse and label in situ plasma measurements from multi-mission satellite data.
◆ scopy : A software oscilloscope and signal analysis toolset.
◆ scraper : Simple desktop scraper app.
◆ scratux : Linux client for scratch programming.
◆ scrcpy : Display and control your Android device.
◆ scrcpygui : A user-friendly GUI for scrcpy with added functionalities.
◆ screencloud : Capture and share screenshots easily.
◆ scribus : Powerful desktop publishing software.
◆ scrite : Multilingual Screenplay Writing App from TERIFLIX.
◆ scrum-retroboard : Electron application based on React.
◆ scummvm : Unofficial, A 'virtual machine' for several classic graphical point-and-click adventure games
◆ scytale : Scytale Desktop Client for Linux.
◆ sd : Intuitive find & replace CLI, sed alternative.
◆ sdlpop : An open-source port of Prince of Persia.
◆ seafile : Seafile GUI version. Beyond just syncing and sharing files, it lets you add custom file properties and organize your files in different views. With AI-powered automation for generating properties, Seafile offers a smarter, more efficient way to manage your files.
◆ seafile-cli : Seafile CLI version. Beyond just syncing and sharing files, it lets you add custom file properties and organize your files in different views. With AI-powered automation for generating properties, Seafile offers a smarter, more efficient way to manage your files.
◆ seanime : Open-source media server with a web interface and desktop app for anime and manga.
◆ secops : A Linux Desktop Application for managing security.
◆ secrets : Unofficial AppImage of the Secrets keepass and 2FA password manager.
◆ seedit : A GUI for plebbit similar to old.reddit.
◆ seismic : A taskbar app for displaying USGS magnitude 2.5+ earthquakes from the past day.
◆ selenium-ide : Open Source record and playback test automation for the web.
◆ sengi : A multi-account desktop client for Mastodon and Pleroma.
◆ senpa-io-client : Official Client for Senpa.io
◆ sentinel : An open-source decentralized VPN network application.
◆ ser-player : Video player for SER files used for astronomy-imaging.
◆ serial-studio : Multi-purpose serial data view program.
◆ serialplot : Small and simple software for plotting data from serial port.
◆ serioussamtfe : Game engine for Serious Sam Classic, TFE.
◆ serioussamtfe-vk : Game engine for Serious Sam Classic, Vulkan support, TFE.
◆ serioussamtse : Game engine for Serious Sam Classic, TSE.
◆ serioussamtse-vk : Game engine for Serious Sam Classic, Vulkan support, TSE.
◆ servo : Unofficial AppImage builds of the Servo web browser engine.
◆ session-desktop : Onion routing based messenger.
◆ setcolors : Another way to set colors in Linux shells.
◆ sevicebus-browser : A cross platform tool to manage your Azure Service Bus instances.
◆ sf-tube : Watch and download videos without ads.
◆ sfbrename : Bulk file renamer.
◆ sfp : This utility is designed to allow you to apply skins to the modern Steam client.
◆ sfrt-attendance : The attendance tracking program for robotics.
◆ shadow-tech : Shadow.tech, cloud computing service.
◆ shadowsocks : Shadowsocks GUI client.
◆ shadps4 : An early PlayStation 4 emulator written in C++.
◆ shadps4-qtlauncher : The official Qt launcher for shadps4 PlayStation 4 emulator.
◆ shannon-calculator : Self-information content of a message text.
◆ sharemyhost : One click to share your files in your local network.
◆ sharp-tune : Music player build upon the node using the electron.
◆ sheepshaver : Classic Macintosh emulator SheepShaver.
◆ sheikah : A Witnet compatible desktop wallet.
◆ shellcheck : ShellCheck, a static analysis tool for shell scripts.
◆ shellharden : The corrective bash syntax highlighter.
◆ shipwright : Ship of Harkinian.
◆ shoopdaloop : A (live) looping application with DAW elements.
◆ shotcut : A powerful Video Editor.
◆ shradiko : Make Portable AppImages from Distro Packages.
◆ shutter-encoder : Professional converter & compression tool designed by video editors.
◆ shuttle : The fastest access to your favorite applications.
◆ shvspy : Qt GUI tool for shvbroker administration and browsing.
◆ sideka : Platform Tata Kelola Desa
◆ sidenote : A CLI tool that helps to manage plain text notes per working directory.
◆ sigdigger : Signal analyzer, using Suscan core and Sigutils DSP library.
◆ sigil : Sigil is a multi-platform EPUB ebook editor.
◆ sigma-file-manager : A free, open-source, modern file manager.
◆ sigmaspectra : Semi-automated selection and scaling of time series.
◆ signal : Unofficial AppImage package for Signal (communication).
◆ silex-desktop : This is the official Silex desktop version.
◆ siliconsneaker : View runs from your Garmin brand watch
◆ silverkey : The best Qt Application Ever.
◆ simdock : Small dock with pseudo-transparency and good window handling.
◆ simdsp : DSP Simulator.
◆ simple-s3-uploader : Easily uploading files and sharing links via AWS S3.
◆ simple-scan-gtk3 : Unofficial. A simple document scanner, version 3.38.1, for all GNOME4+ haters.
◆ simple-timer : A really simple timer with a customizable logo and heading.
◆ simplechroot : Simple command line chroot with ease.
◆ simpleinstabot : Simple Instagram bot.
◆ simplenote-electron : Simplenote.
◆ simpleos : EOS Blockchain Interface & Wallet.
◆ simplescreenrecorder : Unofficial. Feature-rich screen recorder supporting X11 & OpenGL.
◆ simplest-file-renamer : Simplest file renamer, rename your files quickly and easily.
◆ simplex-chat : First messaging platform operating without user identifiers.
◆ simplex-solver : Simplex for optimization problems.
◆ simtoolkitpro : The all-in-one flight simulation EFB.
◆ singlebox : AppView template for WebCatalog.
◆ sinon : A handy video tool.
◆ sioyek : PDF viewer designed for reading research papers and technical books.
◆ sipgate-softphone : The sipgate softphone is developed directly by sipgate.
◆ siyuan : A local-first personal knowledge management system.
◆ skanpage : A simple scanning application. This script installs the full "kdeutils" suite.
◆ skyemu : Game Boy Advance, Game Boy, Game Boy Color, and DS Emulator.
◆ skype : Unofficial. VoIP-based videoconferencing, voice calls and instant messaging app.
◆ slackbackup : An app to archive Slack messages.
◆ slacktronic : Connect your Slack workspace to Arduino.
◆ slang-ed : An Electron/Ionic app to edit i18n language translations files.
◆ sleek : Multiplatform todo.txt manager.
◆ slic3r : Open Source toolpath generator for 3D printers.
◆ slippi : Slippi Launcher program for browsing and playing replays.
◆ slogidex : Task management and automation tool.
◆ smallbasic : A fast and easy to learn BASIC language interpreter.
◆ smartgit : A Git-Client.
◆ smartservogui : Scan for servo devices easily view.
◆ smassh : Smassh your Keyboard, TUI Edition.
◆ smath-studio : Tiny, but powerful mathematical program with WYSIWYG editor.
◆ smf-dsp : Standard MIDI file player.
◆ smplayer : Media Player with built-in codecs for all audio and video formats.
◆ smuview : A Qt based source measure unit GUI for sigrok.
◆ snake-js : Canvas/JavaScript based Snake Game with support for controllers.
◆ snapclear : Remove Image Background with AI for Free Offline.
◆ snapmaker-orca : G-code generator for 3D printers (Bambu, Prusa, Voron, VzBot, RatRig, Creality...).
◆ snapshot-slider : Present/print/email Snapshots of modern mathematics.
◆ snes9x : Snes9x - Portable Super Nintendo Entertainment System TM emulator.
◆ sniffnet : Sniffnet is a network monitoring tool to help you easily keep track of your Internet traffic. Whether you want to gather statistics, you’re curious to see who you are exchanging data with, or you need to inspect more in depth what's going on in your network, this app will get you covered.
◆ snippetstore : A snippet management app for developers.
◆ snomcontrol : An application to control snom D3xx phones from the desktop.
◆ snowball : Find and filter literature, fast.
◆ soapy-sdr : I/Q recorder and processor using SoapySDR as backend.
◆ soar : A fast, modern package manager for Static Binaries, Portable Formats, AppImage, AppBundle, FlatImage, Runimage & More.
◆ socnetv : Social Network Analysis and Visualization software.
◆ soft-serve : The mighty, self-hostable Git server for the command line.
◆ software-challenge-gui : GUI für die Software-Challenge.
◆ soil-editor : A tool to edit the soil properties, CRITERIA1D.
◆ solars : Visualize the planets of our solar system.
◆ solarwallet : Stellar wallet. Secure and user-friendly.
◆ sonic-mania-decompilation : A complete decompilation of Sonic Mania (2017).
◆ sonicvisualiser : Viewing and analysing the contents of music audio files.
◆ sonixd : A full-featured Subsonic/Jellyfin compatible desktop music player.
◆ sonos-controller : An Electron based linux app for controlling your sonos system.
◆ sonusmix : Next-gen Pipewire audio routing tool.
◆ soul-arena : Bleach-based online multiplayer strategy game.
◆ sound-space-plus : Unofficial AppImage of sound-space-plus, Rhythm-based aim game.
◆ soundcloud-rpc : A SoundCloud client with Discord Rich Presence and AdBlock.
◆ sourcetrail : Source explorer to get you productive on unfamiliar source code.
◆ sozi : A "zooming" presentation editor.
◆ spacebar : Themeable and extendable discord-compatible native Spacebar client.
◆ spacebar-debug : Extendable discord-compatible native Spacebar client, debug.
◆ spacecadet : Unofficial. Reverse engineered port of 3D Pinball for Windows XP Space Cadet.
◆ spacewars : A re-imagining of the classic game Spacewar using Amethyst engine.
◆ spaghettikart : Unofficial Mario Kart 64 PC game Port.
◆ spark-wallet : A wallet GUI for c-lightning, accessible over web/mobile/pc.
◆ speak-to-ai : Speak to AI - native Linux voice-to-text app.
◆ speaky-miniplayer : A miniplayer with a synthetic radio speaker.
◆ special-eureka : A desktop mangareader built in Tauri and React
◆ speed-dreams : A Torcs fork, 3d motorsport simulation and race cars game.
◆ speedcrunch : Unofficial, a high-precision scientific calculator featuring a fast, keyboard-driven user interface.
◆ speedyloader : Speeduino universal firmware loader.
◆ speek : Privacy focused messenger.
◆ sphia : A Proxy Handling Intuitive Application.
◆ spicy-launcher : Cross-platform launcher for Spicy Lobster games.
◆ spivak : Karaoke player based on GStreamer and Qt5.
◆ splayer : A simple music player that supports word-by-word lyrics, song downloads, comment section display, music cloud storage and playlist management, music spectrum analysis, and basic mobile adaptation. NetEase Cloud Music.
◆ spm : A simple CLI package manager written in bash mainly for AppImages.
◆ spmp : A YouTube Music client with a focus on customisation of colours and song metadata.
◆ spotifetch : A simple and beautiful CLI fetch tool for spotify, now rusty.
◆ spotify : Unofficial. A proprietary music streaming service.
◆ spotify-dl : A command-line utility to download songs and playlists directly from Spotify's servers.
◆ spotify-player : A Spotify player in the terminal with full feature parity.
◆ spotify-qt : Lightweight Spotify client using Qt.
◆ spotify-tui : Spotify for the terminal written in Rust.
◆ spotube : Open source Spotify client that doesn't require Premium.
◆ spritemate4electron : A simple Electron-wrapper for Esshahn's awesome Spritemate-webapp.
◆ sptlrx : Synchronized lyrics in your terminal.
◆ spyglass : A personal search engine to create a searchable library from your personal documents, interests, and more.
◆ sqlitebrowser : DB Browser is a light GUI editor for SQLite databases.
◆ squirrel-disk : Cross-Platform and Super Fast Disk Usage Analysis Tool.
◆ srb2k : AppImage Package for Sonic Robo Blast 2 Kart, game.
◆ ssh-mitm : Server for security audits supporting public key authentication.
◆ ssplot : A simple plotting utility for dynamical systems.
◆ stacer : Linux System Optimizer and Monitoring.
◆ stack-wallet : Stack Wallet, a multicoin, cryptocurrency wallet.
◆ stackandconquer : A challenging tower conquest board game "Mixtour" inspired.
◆ standard-notes : A simple and private place for your notes.
◆ starc : Story Architect, reinventing the screenwriting software.
◆ starship : The minimal, blazing-fast, and infinitely customizable prompt for any shell.
◆ starship-port : SF64 PC Port.
◆ stash-electron : The friendly secret storage made for teams.
◆ station : A single place for all of your web applications.
◆ statsbook-tool : A tool for error checking WFTDA Statsbooks.
◆ statuspilatus : Monitor your PC like never before.
◆ steam : Unofficial. The ultimate destination for playing, discussing, and creating games.
◆ steam-rom-manager : An app for managing ROMs in Steam.
◆ steam-tui : Rust TUI client for steamcmd.
◆ steamcad : 2D CAD especially designed to draw steam locomotives.
◆ steamdepotdownloadergui : Easily download older versions of games from Steam.
◆ steem-messenger : Messer for Steem.
◆ stele : Kiosk app wrapper for museum media exhibits.
◆ stella : Unofficial, A multi-platform Atari 2600 Emulator.
◆ stellarium : Planetarium that shows a realistic sky in 3D.
◆ stellarmaps : Stylized maps from Stellaris saves.
◆ stew : An independent package manager for compiled binaries.
◆ sticker-convert : Convert animated stickers.
◆ stirling-pdf : Unofficial. Powerful, open-source PDF editing platform.
◆ stockstalk : Your stocks on your desktop.
◆ stoplight : The kickass API platform.
◆ storadit : Minimalistic Todo list/notes taking app.
◆ storaji : The Light/Responsive Inventory Management System.
◆ storyboarder : Visualize a story as fast you can draw stick figures.
◆ strans : A powerful command-line utility.
◆ strata : Semi-automated selection and scaling of time series.
◆ strawberry : Unofficial AppImage of the strawberry music player.
◆ streamcapture2 : Download video streams.
◆ streamdock : Streaming service viewer.
◆ streamlink : Command-line which pipes video streams from various services.
◆ streamlink-twitch-gui : A multi platform Twitch.tv browser for Streamlink.
◆ streamon : Create streaming links to instagram live.
◆ stremio-enhanced : Electron-based Stremio client with support for plugins and themes. This is a community project and is not affiliated with Stremio in any way.
◆ stretchly : App that reminds you to take breaks when working on your PC.
◆ strongbox : A World of Warcraft Addon Manager aimed at Linux players.
◆ structure : A knowledge management tool.
◆ studymd : Flashcards from Markdown.
◆ stunt-car-remake : Remake of the old game Stunt Car Racer.
◆ subillmanager : A simple Flutter app to manage electricity bill.
◆ substrate-ide : Graphic IDE for developing Substrate blockchains.
◆ subsurface : Official upstream of the Subsurface divelog program.
◆ subtitld : Transform your video content creation with Subtitld, the open source software that streamlines your video content creation process.
◆ subtitle-composer : KF5/Qt Video Subtitle Editor for KDE.
◆ subtitler : Quickly download subtitles.
◆ sudachi : Unofficial. Nintendo Switch emulator.
◆ sultanpos : Simple POS for minimarket.
◆ summoners.war.exporter : To parse intercepted data from Summoners War.
◆ sumoco : Simple Unified Model for Orthopaedics.
◆ sunny : Screenshot software that supports OCR and image translation features.
◆ sunsama : The daily planner for elite professionals.
◆ sunshine : Sunshine is a Gamestream host for Moonlight.
◆ sunvox : Unofficial. Small, fast and powerful modular synthesizer with pattern-based sequencer (tracker).
◆ sup : A Slack client with WhatsApp like UI.
◆ superbacked : Don’t lose your secrets. A secret management platform used to back up and pass on sensitive data from one generation to the next.
◆ supercell-wx : Supercell Wx is a free, open source advanced weather radar viewer.
◆ superfile : Pretty fancy and modern terminal file manager.
◆ supermodel : Sega Model 3 arcade emulator.
◆ supernotes : Enjoy efficient note-taking without the hassle.
◆ superpaper : A cross-platform multi monitor wallpaper manager.
◆ superproductivity : An advanced todo list app with integrated Timeboxing.
◆ superslicer-bin : G-code generator for 3D printers.
◆ superslicer-prerelease-bin : G-code generator for 3D printers.
◆ supersonic : A lightweight and full-featured cross-platform desktop client for self-hosted music servers.
◆ supertag : A tag-based filesystem written in Rust.
◆ supertux : Classic 2D jump'n run sidescroller game inspired to Super Mario.
◆ supertuxkart : Free kart racing game focused on Fun!
◆ supertuxkart-dev : Free kart racing game focused on Fun! Pre-release.
◆ surrealist : Surrealist is the ultimate way to visually manage your SurrealDB database.
◆ suwayomi : A rewrite of Tachiyomi for the Desktop.
◆ svelte-electron : Create desktop apps with this Svelte boilerplate.
◆ svgwall : SVG Wallpaper Utility for Xorg.
◆ sview : 3D Stereoscopic media player for videos and images.
◆ swaglyrics : SwagLyrics AppImage, unofficial.
◆ swc-minecraft-launcher : SWC Minecraft Launcher.
◆ sweeper : Unofficial. System Cleaner. This script installs the full "kdeutils" suite.
◆ sweethome3d : An interior design app to draw house plans & arrange furniture.
◆ swell : Testing for streaming APIs, right at your desktop.
◆ swiftnessx : Electron application boilerplate based on React/Webpack.
◆ swifty : Free Offline-first Password Manager.
◆ swish : Command Line Interface for Swisstransfer Infomaniak's free service.
◆ switchcraft : Switchcraft watches GNOME's light/dark preference and runs your shell commands when the theme changes.
◆ switchhosts : Switch hosts quickly!
◆ switchshuttle : Run predefined commands in various terminal applications.
◆ swradio : Shortwave receiver for use with sdrplay/hackrf/dabsticks/pmsdr.
◆ symphonium : A tool to help when learning to play the piano.
◆ syncmyl2p : L2P synchronisation tool.
◆ syncplay : Synchronize video playback over network.
◆ syncthing-tray : Tray application for Syncthing.
◆ synfig : Unofficial. Synfig Studio animation software.
◆ synthein : A space ship building and combat game.
◆ synthv1 : An old school polyphonic synthesizer.
◆ system-monitoring-center : Unofficial. Multi-featured system monitor.
◆ sysz : An fzf terminal UI for systemctl.
◆ szyszka : Szyszka is fast and powerful file renamer.
◆ t.viewer : Cross Platform Tizen Log Viewer.
◆ tabby : A terminal for a more modern age
◆ tablo-tools : Tools to Bulk Delete and Export from Tablo DVR.
◆ tag-editor : Tag Editor, supports MP4, ID3, Vorbis, Opus, FLAC and Matroska.
◆ tagger : Unofficial. Simple audio tagger with support for various audio formats.
◆ tagspaces : An offline, open source, document manager with tagging support.
◆ tagtime-desktop : Time tracking for space cadets, desktop edition.
◆ talktype : Linux speech to text app.
◆ tangent : A clean and powerful open source notes app.
◆ taradino : Unofficial, SDL2 port of Rise of the Triad.
◆ taskade : AI-Powered productivity.
◆ taskell : Command-line Kanban board/task manager with support for Trello boards and GitHub projects.
◆ taskizer : A task management app.
◆ tastee-ui : Tool helping you write executable specifications in your lang.
◆ tb : Tasks, boards & notes for the command-line habitat.
◆ tbc-video-export : Tool for exporting S-Video and CVBS-type TBCs to video files.
◆ tc : A desktop chat client for Twitch.
◆ tdlib-rs : Rust wrapper around the Telegram Database Library.
◆ teams : Unofficial, Business communication platform developed by Microsoft.
◆ teamviewer : Deliver remote IT support to your customers and colleagues, anytime, anywhere. Communication, network.
◆ teamviewer-host : Host utility for TeamViewer, if you want to set up unattended access to a device.
◆ teamviewer-qs : QuickSupport utility for TeamViewer, if you want to receive support.
◆ teledrive : Automatically backup Telegram Saved Messages.
◆ telegram : Official desktop version of Telegram messaging app.
◆ telly-skout : A convergent Kirigami TV guide. This script installs the full "kdeutils" suite.
◆ tenacity : An easy-to-use, cross-platform multi-track audio editor/recorder.
◆ tere : Terminal file explorer.
◆ terminalos-sim : A terminalOS simulator.
◆ termora : A terminal emulator and SSH client.
◆ termshot : Creates screenshots based on terminal command output.
◆ teslacam-browser : A minimal TeslaCam Browser.
◆ tesler : The Tesla Sentinel Viewer.
◆ tess : A hackable, simple, rapid and beautiful terminal.
◆ tesseract : Tesseract Open Source OCR Engine AppImage.
◆ testdisk : TestDisk & PhotoRec, tools to recover lost partitions and files.
◆ texmacs : Free scientific text editor, inspired by TeX and GNU Emacs.
◆ texstudio : LaTeX development environment.
◆ textnote : Simple tool for creating and organizing daily notes on the command line.
◆ textosaurus : Cross-platform text editor based on Qt and Scintilla.
◆ tgpt : AI Chatbots in terminal without needing API keys.
◆ the-way : A code snippets manager for your terminal.
◆ thedesk : Mastodon Client for PC.
◆ theframe : Animation tool.
◆ theia-blueprint : Building desktop-based products based on Eclipse Theia.
◆ thermusqt : Calculate particle composition of hadronic state.
◆ theweb : Web Browser.
◆ thief : An innovative cross-platform fishing tool, in chinese.
◆ thinreports-section-editor : A template editor for Thinreports.
◆ thlink : Touhou Project Game Netplay Tool.
◆ thoptv : Enjoy Ultimate Movies, sports Matches, IPL and Latest Shows.
◆ thorium : Web Browser, a Chromium fork including Widevine and FFmpeg support.
◆ thorium-client : A locked-down electron kiosk for Thorium.
◆ thorium-reader : Desktop application to read ebooks.
◆ thunderbird : Free and open source eMail client, Stable.
◆ thunderbird-appimage : Unofficial. Free and open source eMail client, Stable.
◆ thunderbird-beta : Free and open source eMail client, Beta Edition.
◆ thunderbird-beta-appimage : Unofficial. Free and open source eMail client, Beta Edition.
◆ thunderbird-nightly : Free and open source eMail client, Nightly Edition.
◆ thunderbird-nightly-appimage : Unofficial. Free and open source eMail client, Nightly Edition.
◆ ticker : Terminal stock ticker with live updates and position tracking.
◆ ticktick : A To-Do List and Calendar to keep you organized.
◆ tidal-hifi : The web version of listen.tidal.com running in electron.
◆ tidybit : TidyBit is a simple handy tool that can organize messy collection of files and move them to a chosen folder.
◆ tilde-podcast : Podcast client to listen to all you favorite podcasts.
◆ tiled : Tile map editor.
◆ tilinggenerator : Generator of regular and irregular tilings.
◆ timely : The release branch for Timely electron apps.
◆ timenaut : Desktop time tracking application.
◆ tipitaka-pali-reader : A Pali Reading app made in Flutter.
◆ tixati : A New and Powerful P2P System 100% Free, Simple and Easy to Use Bittorrent Client.
◆ tkmm : TotK Mod Manager, a mod manager and merger for Tears of the Kingdom.
◆ tlock : Two-Factor Authentication Tokens Manager in Terminal.
◆ tlum : Tlum - open-source cross-platform language learning application leverages the power of natural language processing to pinpoint pronunciation gaps and enhance articulation, machine learning to boost vocabulary proficiency.
◆ tmon : A simple CLI tool for monitoring/reporting CPU temperatures.
◆ tmux : Tmux AppImage build via Docker.
◆ tnt : A computer-assisted translation tool.
◆ tockler : An application that tracks your time by monitoring.
◆ tod : An unofficial Todoist command line client written in Rust.
◆ todesktop : Take your web app codebase and transform it into a cross platform desktop app with native functionality.
◆ todo-bash : Todo list for the Bash command line.
◆ todoist : The to-do list to organize work & life.
◆ todorant : Todorant releases.
◆ todorust : Simple ToDoList made in rust.
◆ toerings : A clone of Conky Seamod using Tauri.
◆ toipe : yet another typing test, but crab flavoured.
◆ tomatox : An online free VIP video analysis player, in chinese.
◆ tonuino-toolbox : SD card manager for your Tonuino.
◆ topgrade : Upgrade all the things, this is the universal upgrade manager.
◆ tor-browser : Privacy-oriented Web Browser for sites blocked in your country.
◆ tor-browser-alpha : Privacy-oriented Web Browser for sites blocked in your country.
◆ torcs : The 3D Open Racing Car Game and Simulator.
◆ torrents_digger : Torrents Digger searches already available torrents from internet.
◆ torrenttools : Cli tool to inspect/create/edit BitTorrent metafiles.
◆ toru : Bittorrent streaming CLI tool. Stream anime torrents real-time.
◆ torzu : Unofficial AppImage of Torzu (fork of yuzu), with optimized builds for modern cpus.
◆ touchhle : Unofficial, High-level emulator for iPhone OS apps.
◆ trackaudio : A next generation Audio-For-VATSIM ATC Client.
◆ trans : CLI translator using Google/Bing/Yandex Translate, etc...
◆ transfernow : TransferNow is a simple, quick and secure free solution to send large files and big documents up to 250 GB per transfer. No registration required.
◆ translatium : Translate Any Languages like a Pro.
◆ transmission-gtk : Unofficial. Fast, easy, and free BitTorrent client, GTK+ GUI.
◆ transmission-qt : Unofficial, Fast, easy, and free BitTorrent client, Qt GUI.
◆ transmissionic : Remote for Transmission Daemon.
◆ trenchbroom : A modern, cross-platform level editor for Quake engine based games.
◆ trezor-suite : Trezor Suite desktop application.
◆ trgui-ng : Remote GUI for Transmission torrent daemon.
◆ triagem-touch : Novo SGA triage client.
◆ trilium : Build your personal knowledge base with Trilium Notes.
◆ trinity-desktop : Desktop wallet for IOTA.
◆ tropy : Research photo management.
◆ tssh : trzsz-ssh is an alternative to ssh client, offers additional features.
◆ tt : A simple Time Tracker to stay basic and intuitive.
◆ tts-now : A chinese text-to-speech assistant based on the speech synthesi.
◆ ttth : An electron based desktop app for online services.
◆ ttyper : Terminal-based typing test.
◆ tulip : Large graphs analysis, drawing and visualization framework.
◆ tumblr-downloader-gui : Download Tumblr posts that you liked.
◆ tumblr-scraper : Scrape a Tumblr profile for user uploadede posts.
◆ tunepack : Finding and download HQ audio files.
◆ turbowarp : Scratch mod with a compiler to run projects faster.
◆ tusk : Evernote desktop app.
◆ tutanota : Tuta is an email service with a strong focus on security and privacy that lets you encrypt emails, contacts and calendar entries on all your devices.
◆ tutanota-enhanced : Unofficial AppImage for Tutanota, an email service with a strong focus on security and privacy that lets you encrypt emails, contacts and calendar entries on all your devices.
◆ tuxfootball : Unofficial, is a great 2D football game for Windows and Linux.
◆ tuxplorer : Tuxplorer is a terminal based file explorer.
◆ tuxpuck : Unofficial, hockey-like table game.
◆ twake : Desktop App for Twake.
◆ tweaksophia : An app to automatically renew the books of the SophiA system.
◆ tweet-tray : Tweet quickly from the desktop without any distractions.
◆ twetter : Client for the pubsub app.
◆ twitch-wrapper : An Electron wrapper for Twitch.tv.
◆ typioca : Cozy typing speed tester in terminal.
◆ uad-ng : GUI Rust wrapper for ADB to debloat non-rooted Android devices.
◆ uad-ng-appimage : Unofficial, GUI Rust wrapper for ADB to debloat non-rooted Android devices.
◆ ubiquity : A cross-platform markdown editor.
◆ ubports-installer : A simple tool to install Ubuntu Touch on UBports devices
◆ uefitool : UEFI firmware image viewer and editor.
◆ ueli : Cross-Platform Keystroke Launcher.
◆ uhk.agent : Configuration app of the Ultimate Hacking Keyboard.
◆ uivonim : Fork of the Veonim Neovim GUI.
◆ ultragrid : UltraGrid low-latency audio/video network transmission system.
◆ ultrascreen : Share your screens with friends.
◆ ums : Universal Media Server. A DLNA, UPnP and HTTP(S) Media Server.
◆ uncov : A tool that collects and processes code coverage reports.
◆ undertaker141 : A free and open-source game-center for linux. Pre-configured Wine and Native Games for Linux.
◆ unetbootin : Install Linux/BSD distributions to a partition or USB drive.
◆ ungoogled-chromium : Chromium Web Browser without Google services.
◆ unishellect : JSON parser file and menu customizez Hyper-inspired.
◆ unleashedrecomp : Unofficial AppImage of UnleashedRecomp (Sonic Unleashed port)
◆ unofficial-homestuck-collection : An offline collection of Homestuck and its related works.
◆ unofficial-zalo : Unofficial Zalo App.
◆ unreel : A GUI to create Reveal presentations.
◆ unveil : Unveil Rs is a tool to create presentations from markdown inspired by reveal.js, mdbook and zola.
◆ unyo : Anime streaming and Manga reader desktop app without ads.
◆ updatedeployqt : Tool to deploy auto update for qt applications.
◆ upgit : CLI, another upload hub that supports clipboard. It works well with Typora, Snipaste, VSCode.
◆ upnote : Stay focused and productive with a clean and clutter-free note space.
◆ upnotes : A notes app for software developers.
◆ upscayl : Free and Open Source AI Image Upscaler.
◆ urbanterror : A team-based tactical game shooter based on the Quake 3 Engine.
◆ utilso : Regex Tester, JWT Verify, Image Converter, Format JSON, Decode...
◆ uv : An extremely fast Python package and project manager, written in Rust.
◆ uwufetch : A meme system info tool for Linux, based on nyan/uwu trend.
◆ uyou : This is a todo list with electron.
◆ uzdoom : UZDoom is a feature centric port for all Doom engine games, based on GZDoom, adding an advanced renderer and powerful scripting capabilities.
◆ v2ray-desktop : V2Ray GUI client for Linux.
◆ valeronoi : Companion app for Valetudo for generating WiFi heat maps.
◆ vapour : An alternative open source Steam client.
◆ varia : Unofficial. Aria2-based advanced download manager with support for downloading files, torrents, video and audio + support for Chromium and Firefox extension.
◆ vcard-studio : A contact management application with support for vCard file format (.vcf).
◆ vcloudcam : Solution for the camera systems of gas and fuel stations.
◆ vcmi : Unofficial AppImage of vcmi open-source engine for Heroes of Might and Magic III
◆ vechain : A browser that empowers DApps on VeChain.
◆ vector : Vector is a decentralized communication platform built on the Nostr Protocol.
◆ vegeta : HTTP load testing tool and library. It's over 9000!
◆ ventoy : Tool to create bootable USB drive for ISO/WIM/IMG/VHDx/EFI files.
◆ veracrypt : VeraCrypt is a free open source disk encryption software.
◆ verto : A multi-currency crypto wallet with support for EOS & VTX.
◆ vesktop : Vesktop gives you the performance of web Discord.
◆ vgmtrans : A tool to convert proprietary, sequenced videogame music.
◆ vhc-viewer-wayland : Vulkan Hardware Capability Viewer.
◆ vhc-viewer-x11 : Vulkan Hardware Capability Viewer.
◆ vhs : Your CLI home video recorder.
◆ via : Your keyboard's best friend.
◆ via-desktop : VIA Desktop is an Electron application designed to provide an offline experience for VIA.
◆ vial : GUI and a QMK fork for configuring your keyboard in real time.
◆ viber : Proprietary cross-platform IM and VoIP software.
◆ viber-enhanced : Unofficial. Enhanced AppImage of proprietary cross-platform IM and VoIP software.
◆ vicinae : A high-performance, native launcher for your desktop built with C++ and Qt. Native, fast, extensible.
◆ vicut : A Vim-based, scriptable, headless text editor for the command line.
◆ vidbee : Download videos from almost any website worldwide.
◆ vidcutter : Simple and fast video cutter and joiner.
◆ viddy : A modern watch command line utility. Time machine and pager etc.
◆ video-hub : A fastest way to browse and search for videos on your computer.
◆ video-trimmer : Unofficial. Simple video trimming, with option to trim precisely or to trim without loosing video quality.
◆ videomass : Free, open source and cross-platform GUI for FFmpeg.
◆ vieb : Vim Inspired Electron Browser.
◆ vifm : File manager with curses interface providing Vim-like environment.
◆ vigad : Extract live-data from your screen.
◆ vikunja : The open-source, self-hostable to-do app.
◆ vimeo-dl : A cli tool to download private videos on vimeo. Written in golang.
◆ viper : Launcher and Updater for TF2 Northstar.
◆ viper-browser : Fast and lightweight Qt web browser.
◆ vipster : Visual periodic structure editor.
◆ vircadia : Open Source continuation of the High Fidelity metaverse.
◆ virt-manager : Unofficial AppImage of virt-manager, interface for managing virtual machines.
◆ virtscreen : Make your iPad/tablet/computer into a secondary monitor on Linux.
◆ virtualbox : Powerful x86 virtualization for enterprise as well as home use.
◆ visipics : Windows software to find and remove duplicate pictures. Unofficial AppImage built using "wine32-deploy" and powered by "wine".
◆ visual-define-xml-editor : Editor for CDISC Define-XML standard.
◆ visual-lvm : Visual LVM the remote gui lvm manager for all linux platform.
◆ visualfamilytree : Create a family tree with information and pictures.
◆ vita3k : Experimental PlayStation Vita emulator.
◆ vitomu : Easy to use video to audio converter.
◆ viu : Terminal image viewer with native support for iTerm and Kitty.
◆ vivaldi-snapshot : Unofficial. Advanced Web Browser, Testing Version.
◆ vivaldi-stable : Unofficial. Advanced Web Browser, Stable Version.
◆ vivifyscrum : Agile Tool for Professionals.
◆ vizgraph : A simple tool for Using Graphviz.
◆ vk-desktop : Cross-platform client VKontakte.
◆ vk-music-fs : Listen to the music from VK.
◆ vkquake : Vulkan Quake game port based on QuakeSpasm.
◆ vlc : Unofficial. Free and Open Source Video & Media player for Audio, streaming and more.
◆ vlc-git : Unofficial. Free and Open Source Video & Media player, GIT version.
◆ vnote : Note-taking application for pleasant Markdown.
◆ vocabsieve : Simple sentence mining tool for language learning.
◆ voicevox : Offical Frontend for the free VOICEVOX TTS Engine.
◆ volaris : Volaris-Gui is the wrapper for Volaris, a secure file encryption software.
◆ vpaint : Experimental vector graphics and 2D animation editor.
◆ vrcft-avalonia : Cross-platform VRCFaceTracking made with Avalonia.
◆ vrcx : Friendship management tool for VRChat.
◆ vrest-ng : Zero code API test automation solution.
◆ vrew : Your first video editor, your easiest choice.
◆ vscodium : Community-driven, freely-licensed binary distribution of MS VSCode.
◆ vt : VirusTotal Command Line Interface.
◆ vtm : Text-based desktop environment.
◆ vue-calc : A Simple VueJS's Calculator built with ElectronJS.
◆ vuerd : A desktop ERD app.
◆ vup : Private and decentralized cloud storage.
◆ w2vgrep : semantic-grep for words with similar meaning to the query.
◆ walc : WhatsApp Linux Client, Unofficial.
◆ walk : Terminal file manager.
◆ walker : Multi-Purpose Launcher with a lot of features. Highly Customizable and fast.
◆ wallettech : BytechCoin GUI Wallet.
◆ warp : Unofficial. Fast and secure file transfer through internet or local network exchanging a word-based code.
◆ warp-terminal : Terminal reimagined with AI and collaborative tools.
◆ warteschlangensimulator : A free, platform independent, discrete-event, stochastic simulator which allows to model queueing systems in form of flowcharts.
◆ wasistlos : Unofficial, WhatsApp Linux Client, formerly known as "whatsapp-for-linux".
◆ watched : A media player and a browser for Excellent entertainment.
◆ watchflower : Read and plot datas from your Xiaomi devices.
◆ watchit : Open movies everywhere.
◆ waterfox : A privacy-focused web browser engineered to give you speed, control, and peace of mind on the internet.
◆ waydroid-helper : App that provides a user-friendly way to configure Waydroid and install extensions, including Magisk and ARM translation (android).
◆ wazo-desktop : Wazo desktop client for wazo VOIP server.
◆ weakauras : App to provide missing link between Wago.io and World of Warcraft.
◆ weatherdump : A WeatherDump GUI.
◆ webamp : Winamp Player 2.9 reimplementation in HTML5 and JS.
◆ webcamoid : Unofficial. A multi-platform camera capture app focused on providing all major features required by power users with a very simple and intuitive interface.
◆ webcatalog : App store for web apps. Find the right software and services.
◆ webcord : A Discord and Fosscord client implemented without Discord API.
◆ webdesktop : WebDesktop make apps with just a text editor and nodejs.
◆ webkitty : Local web development IDE.
◆ webrecorder : A complete packaging of Webrecorder hosted service in Electron.
◆ weektodo : WeekToDo is a Free and Open Source Weekly Planner.
◆ westeroscraftlauncher : Custom launcher for modded Minecraft, game.
◆ wethr : Command line weather tool.
◆ wewechat : Unofficial WeChat client built with React, MobX and Electron.
◆ wexond : Extensible, fast and innovative web browser with material UI.
◆ wezterm : A GPU-accelerated terminal emulator and multiplexer.
◆ wezterm-nightly : A GPU-accelerated terminal emulator and multiplexer.
◆ whalebird : An Electron based Mastodon client.
◆ whatstron : Unofficial WhatsApp desktop client for Linux.
◆ whirlpool-gui : Desktop GUI for Whirlpool by Samourai-Wallet.
◆ whispering : Press shortcut → speak → get text. Free and open source. More local-first apps soon ❤️.
◆ whu-library-seat : Wuhan University Library Assistant, for Jinan University.
◆ wick-editor : A free and open-source tool for creating games, animations and everything in-between!
◆ widelands : Real-time strategy game with singleplayer campaigns.
◆ wiiu-downloader : Allows to download encrypted wiiu files from nintendo's official servers.
◆ wikilynx : A simple game browser made using Qt C++ for playing wikipedia speed-runs the right way.
◆ win11-clipboard-history : A beautiful, Windows 11-style Clipboard History Manager for Linux.
◆ winboat : Run Windows apps on 🐧 Linux with ✨ seamless integration.
◆ window-pet : Pet overlay app that lets you have adorable companion such as pets, anime characters on your screen.
◆ windows2usb : Flash Drive burning utility, MBR/GPT, BIOS/UEFI, FAT32/NTFS.
◆ windows95 : Unofficial. Windows 95 in Electron.
◆ wine : Unofficial. Run Windows programs, select a version from mmtrt/WINE_AppImage.
◆ wine-devel : Unofficial. Compatibility layer to run x86_64 Windows programs, Dev Edition.
◆ wine-stable : Unofficial. Compatibility layer to run x86_64 Windows programs, Stable.
◆ wine-staging : Unofficial. Compatibility layer to run x86_64 Windows programs, Staging.
◆ wine-staging-ge-proton : Unofficial. Run x86_64 Windows programs, Staging GE Proton.
◆ wine32-deploy : Tool for creating AppImages for 32-bit Microsoft Windows apps.
◆ winrar : Unofficial, data compression, encryption and archiving tool.
◆ wipeout-rewrite : Re-implementation of the 1995 PSX game wipEout.
◆ wire : The most secure collaboration platform.
◆ wireframesketcher : A wireframing tool that helps designers, developers and product managers. A desktop app and a plug-in for any Eclipse IDE.
◆ wireguard-gui : A wireguard client GUI for Debian/Linux made with nextauri.
◆ wireshark : Unofficial, the world's most popular network protocol analyze.
◆ wishdemo : A μ Tcl/Tk distribution statically linked, AppImage.
◆ wives : A beautiful, modern & feature-rich Terminal Emulator.
◆ wiznote : Create a powerful knowledge graph from personal notes to team wiki.
◆ wiznoteplus : The third party that supports the plug-in is Zhinote client.
◆ wkp : A CLI tool designed to fetch Wikipedia excerpts written in Rust.
◆ wled-gui : Cross-platform desktop app for WLED.
◆ wlx-overlay-s : Access your Wayland/X11 desktop from Monado/WiVRn/SteamVR.
◆ wnr : Work/Rest Timer. Stricter. Prettier. More features.
◆ woke : A REST client with grand ambitions and limited scope.
◆ wolai : A new form of document/note/information system, in chinese.
◆ wonderlab : A new generation Minecraft launcher.
◆ wonderwall : Wallpaper manager for Linux.
◆ woocommerce-pos : Electron Desktop App for WooCommerce POS
◆ woof-doom : Woof! is a continuation of the Boom/MBF bloodline of Doom source ports.
◆ wootility : Utility for configuring Wooting keyboards.
◆ wooting-analog-midi : Virtual MIDI device for, Wooting analog keyboards.
◆ wootomation : The official Wooting Macros software.
◆ wora : A beautiful player for audiophiles.
◆ workflowy : A notetaking tool.
◆ wournal : Simple "digitial paper" for note taking and PDF annotation. Heavily inspired by Xournal.
◆ wowup : WowUp the World of Warcraft addon updater.
◆ wox : A cross-platform launcher that simply works.
◆ wps-office : Unofficial, Office suite built from the official .deb package.
◆ wrapbox : An Electron wrapper for web pages.
◆ wsjtz : AppImage of WSJT-Z – fork of WSJT-X with automation features.
◆ wsocks : A light websocket based proxy.
◆ wsrx : Controlled TCP-over-WebSocket forwarding tunnel.
◆ wtfutil : The personal information dashboard for your terminal.
◆ wthrr : Weather companion for the terminal.
◆ wxmaxima : A document based interface for the computer algebra system Maxima.
◆ wxmedit : A cross-platform Text/Hex Editor, an improved version of MadEdit.
◆ x-loc : Extra localizations/translations manager for Stardew Valley.
◆ x-minecraft-launcher : An Open Source Minecraft Launcher with Modern UX.
◆ x-pixiv : CLI, pixiv downloader.
◆ xapkdetector : APK/DEX detector that shows an information about build tools, libraries and protection of APK/DEX files.
◆ xbydriver : Xiaobaiyang Cloud Drive - Powered by Alibaba Cloud Drive.
◆ xchat : Chat with other people using Internet Relay Chat.
◆ xcloud-desktop : An unoffical desktop app for the XCloud web beta.
◆ xde : The Expo Development Environment.
◆ xdelta3-cross-gui : A cross-platform GUI for creating xDelta3 patches.
◆ xdg-ninja : Script that checks your $HOME for unwanted files and directories.
◆ xelfviewer : A multiplatform ELF file viewer/editor.
◆ xemu : Original Xbox Emulator.
◆ xenia-canary : Unofficial AppImage of xenia-canary Xbox360 emulator.
◆ xenia-edge : Xbox 360 Emulator Research Project, fork of the Xenia emulator, with the aim of quicker iteration and improvements to Vulkan backend.
◆ xgetter : Download video on Youtube, Facebook, X(Twitter), Instagram, Tiktok, Bilibili, Douyin and more.
◆ xilinota : Note-taking app boasting instant syncing among devices and direct keeping of markdown files.
◆ xl-converter : Powerful image converter with support for multithreading.
◆ xlights : A sequencer for Lights and sequences manager.
◆ xm8 : PC-8801 emulator.
◆ xmachoviewer : XMachOViewer is a Mach-O viewer.
◆ xmedcon : An open-source toolkit for medical image conversion.
◆ xnconvert : A fast, powerful and free cross-platform batch image converter.
◆ xnviewmp : Graphic viewer, browser, converter.
◆ xonsh : Python-powered, cross-platform, Unix-gazing shell.
◆ xopcodecalc : Opcode calculator / ASM calculator.
◆ xoreos : Unofficial, A reimplementation of BioWare's Aurora engine.
◆ xournal++ : A C++ handwriting notetaking software with PDF annotation support.
◆ xournal++nightly : C++ notetaking software with PDF annotation support, DEV.
◆ xpeviewer : PE file viewer/editor.
◆ xpipe : Your entire server infrastructure at your fingertips. Manage all your servers from your local desktop. No remote setup required.
◆ xplist : Cross-platform Plist Editor.
◆ xplorer : Xplorer, a customizable, modern file manager.
◆ xtomarkdown : A cross-platform GUI application for converting documents to Markdown.
◆ xtool : Cross-platform Xcode replacement. Build and deploy iOS apps with SwiftPM.
◆ xtuber : Simple YouTube Downloader.
◆ xxh : Bring your favorite shell wherever you go through the ssh.
◆ xyce : Xyce Parallel Electronic Simulator.
◆ yaak : The most intuitive desktop API client. Organize and execute REST, GraphQL, WebSockets, Server Sent Events, and gRPC.
◆ yaf : Yet another system CLI fetch that is minimal and customizable.
◆ yaka : No fuss todo-list manager with full keyboard navigation.
◆ yakit : Cyber Security ALL-IN-ONE Platform.
◆ yakit-legacy : Cyber Security ALL-IN-ONE Platform (legacy).
◆ yam : Unofficial Game Updater for the F95Zone platform.
◆ yana : Note-taking app with nested documents, text search/editor, code...
◆ yandex-browser : Unofficial Yandex Browser AppImage, Stable.
◆ yandex-browser-beta : Unofficial Yandex Browser AppImage, Beta.
◆ yandex-browser-corporate : Unofficial Yandex Browser AppImage, Corporate.
◆ yangdownloader : Downloads best-quality audio and video from YouTube.
◆ yank-note : A Hackable Markdown Note Application for Programmers.
◆ yaya : Yet Another Yahtzee-esque Application.
◆ yazi : Blazing fast terminal file manager written in Rust.
◆ yesplaymusic : A third party music player for Netease Music.
◆ yet-another-open-file-converter : Simple Open Source Video and Image Conventer.
◆ ym-desktop : The YouTube music desktop app.
◆ ymir : Sega Saturn emulator
◆ ymir-nightly : Sega Saturn emulator (Nightly builds)
◆ yolx : A modern download tool developed with Flutter, powered by Aria 2 at its core.
◆ youtube-download : GUI and CLI for downloading YouTube video/audio.
◆ youtube-downloader : Download video/audio from youtube (and instagram) videos.
◆ youtube-music : Unofficial. Amazing electron wrapper for YouTube Music featuring plugins.
◆ youtube-tui : An aesthetically pleasing YouTube TUI CLI written in Rust.
◆ youtubeanddownloader : An app to use youtube and download videos as mp3s or mp4s.
◆ youtubesearchfilter : YouTube searches with/without a pre-filter from CLI.
◆ yt-dlandcut : Download and cut Youtube videos by providing url and time range.
◆ yt-dlg : A front-end GUI of the popular youtube-dl written in wxPython.
◆ yt-dlp : A feature-rich command-line audio/video downloader.
◆ ytarchive : Garbage Youtube livestream downloader CLI.
◆ ytdownloader : App for downloading Videos and Audios from hundreds of sites.
◆ ytermusic : An in terminal youtube music client with focus on privacy, simplicity and performance.
◆ ytmdesktop : A Desktop App for YouTube Music.
◆ ytmdesktop2 : Unofficial Youtube Music Desktop App, with LastFM support.
◆ yts-streaming : Stream or play yts and torrent movies.
◆ yubikey-manager : Configure your YubiKey over all USB transports.
◆ yup : Arch Linux AUR Helper with ncurses functionality and better searching and sorting.
◆ yuview : YUV player with an advanced analytic toolset.
◆ zap : Delightful command line AppImage package manager for appimage.github.io.
◆ zapdesktop : Desktop application for the lightning network.
◆ zapzap : WhatsApp desktop application written in Pyqt6 + PyQt6-WebEngine.
◆ zed : High-performance, multiplayer code editor from the creators of Atom.
◆ zegarek : A simple clock with millisecond resolution.
◆ zegrapher : Math graphing software.
◆ zellij : A terminal workspace with batteries included.
◆ zen-app-manager : Zen App Manager is a modern and lightweight startup manager that lets you manage startup applications from a single location.
◆ zen-browser : Experience tranquillity while browsing the web without tracking.
◆ zenity : Unofficial, A CLI utility that creates dialog boxes, GTK3 version.
◆ zenkit : A platform for collaboration and project management.
◆ zenroomstudio : Extensible IDE which targets multiple dev platforms.
◆ zettlr : A Markdown Editor for the 21st century.
◆ zfind : Search files, even inside tar/zip/7z/rar using a SQL-WHERE filter.
◆ zfxtop : [WIP] fetch top for gen Z with X written by bubbletea enjoyer.
◆ zk : A plain text note-taking assistant
◆ zmk-studio : ZMK Firmware. Modern, open source keyboard firmware.
◆ zmninja : Ionic app for Home/Commerical Security Surveillance.
◆ znax : Znax is a cross platform puzzle / arcade game using SDL2 libraries.
◆ znote : A Beautiful markdown editor inspired by Jupyter.
◆ zograscope : Syntax-aware diff that provides a number of additional tools.
◆ zoo-design-studio : The Zoo Design Studio app.
◆ zoom : Unofficial. Video Conferencing and Web Conferencing Service.
◆ zotero : Collect, organize, cite, and share your research sources.
◆ zoxide : A smarter cd command. Supports all major shells.
◆ zramen : Manage zram swap space.
◆ zsync2 : A rewrite of the advanced file download/sync tool zsync.
◆ zulip : Zulip Desktop Client for Linux.
◆ zx-poly : a multi-CPU ZX-Spectrum 128 concept platform.
◆ zxinfo-file-browser : Organize and manage your emulator files for ZX Spectrum.
◆ zy-player : Video resource player, simple, ad-free and high-value.
◆ zyfun : ZyPlayer. Cross-platform desktop video player, free and visually appealing.
